Friend recommended this place and took me here for dinner.  She had made reservations, which is a good idea bc there were people waiting around when we got there.  We were seated rather quickly.  Our server was okay, though we felt some pressure to order drinks, etc. which we did not.  Then he disappeared for a long time, and we were finally able to flag him down.  The food took even longer to come out, but I guess that's to be expected at a somewhat fine dining Asian restaurant with lots of white patrons. We ordered: -Bahn Mi Roti ($7) - The roti (bread) was in large chunks that we tore off and dipped in a small bowl of red curry sauce.  Delicious - curry was not spicy either but on the sweeter side. -Shaken Beef ($27) - Delicious, though the beef was rather raw inside.  Came with some side salad and onions.  Pretty small dish considering it was over $20 and you can get the same for half price down in Westminster.  But I digress... -Miso Chicken - This was another good and flavorful dish that came with a sweet soy/ginger miso sauce.  Chicken was very tender and came in boneless chunks.  Also came with purple yam chips, so that was unusual. -Jasmine Rice ($2) - Standard. Every dish we had was very tasty - I just didn't think the high prices justified the costs.  As I said earlier, you can really good Vietnamese food in S. CA for much less, but I know the Bay area is different.  I'm just happy that the food wasn't terrible AND expensive!  The three dishes were just right for two, but I think if we had been any hungrier, it might not have been enough.  The place is a little fancy, so don't come wearing your jeans and T-shirt like I did!  :)
I'm not sure I understand why Tamarine has such high ratings. I've been there twice -- once for lunch and once for dinner. Both times I had the same impressions: 1. This restaurant is unusually good at giving the impression that inexpensive or extremely simple-to-prepare foods belong in an upscale restaurant. When I look down at my plate, I kind of have the feeling that I'm getting ripped off. 2. The bill is always unpleasantly high -- I'd be delighted to pay more for delicious food, but I haven't had that there. 3. The service is a little...odd. Like the vibe is off. It's like they're aiming super-upscale and yet the actual quality of the service falls substantially short of that. If they had lower prices and more down-to-earth staff, I would give them three stars.
Finally a good Vietnamese restaurant in South Bay. Loved the ambiance, menu is limited but very diverse. Highly recommend the Empress Rice and Hazelnut Asparagus. Good selection of wines too Reserve your table - This place gets packed! Parking on the street - Limited to 2 hr till 6 PM and unlimited after that. It is towards one end of University Ave so you should get parking easily.
My first time stepping into this restaurant and it will be the last. We headed here for drinks and desserts. As we waited at the bar for a couple to leave, we were going to take their seats at the bar. Yeah with a party of 5, 2 of us were going to sit and 3 of us stand. As the couple left, the couple knew that we were going to take their seats so we inched closer as an older white couple is about to take our seats. The woman asks us "What? Is there something wrong?" "Yeah, we were going to take those seats!" What does the bartender say? "I've been keeping track of who's been waiting?   BS!!! The couple wasn't there at all, they just walked in the door. Alright bartender, we're not ordering drinks. Reading the other low rated yelp reviews for Tamarine is because of the bartender's rudeness!!!! Shouldn't management be doing something about this??? We did stay to have tapioca and banana beignets with coconut flavored ice cream. That was good! Only one star because the desserts were good! Bartender ruined our moods!!! Xanh's service is a lot better!
My favorite restaurant in Palo Alto! Love the ambiance, decor, service, and most of all....... the delicious food! We had the following, and every dish was so delicious: - Halibut Ceviche - Curried Long Beans - Hoisin Lamb Chops - Carmelized Prawns - Garlic Fried Rice (Get this, you won't regret it) Can I just add that...... the fried rice was soooooo scrumptious! :o) Seriously, I am a fried rice snob, and there's was the best. Piping hot, perfectly seasoned...... I'm really liking this "wok-fired with butter & garlic" stuff. It is so good, I would go back just for several servings of this alone, and then maybe dessert too ;o) Can't wait to go back!
I have been to Tamarine 5-6 times over the years and enjoy the food but something is generally off with the service. A couple of weeks ago, we were celebrating 3 Birthdays, including mine. The server was attentive at first, but when the restaurant got busy, he started to flake. I ordered a second drink, which never came. When the desserts came, they had put candles on 3 desserts; the server had placed 2 desserts in front of the Birthday people, but put the third one in the middle of the table (which was odd because it had a lit candle on it). On a previous visit, the server had recommended a wine, which was very good. When we tried to order another bottle, we were told that they were out but that there's a similar one available. It turned out that the other bottle was a different variety and was much pricier. We left disappointed that the server was more concerned about making more money than addressing our needs.
Before we actually came here, my boyfriend and I had a heated debate over what it would be like. He insisted it was a super-swanky, Xanh-esque atmosphere; my bets hinged on classy -- at least, as classy as a restaurant for rich old white men gets. Later that night, as we dined next to a couple of rich old white men, he admitted that I was right. To be honest, though, it's really more of a blend. The restaurant caters to everyone from older couples to classy young entrepreneurs, a fact attested to by its upscale decor and creative bar. Unfortunately, while the ambiance impressed, the food wasn't as consistent. We started off with the Spinach Salad and Ha Long Bay soup. While the salad simply tasted bad -- the truffled vinaigrette didn't go with the ingredients at all -- the soup was probably best described as "interesting." Luckily, the crab wontons complemented the flavor of the cilantro, and we ended up deciding we liked it. As for entrees, there's a reason everyone raves about the Clay Pot Cod! Its rich sauce and perfect caramelization makes it a real standout. I personally wouldn't pair it with the Empress Rice, though. While the rice is equally excellent -- the way they scramble in the egg is almost artistic -- it's too sticky and flavorful to temper another sticky and flavorful dish. Also, skip on the Caramelized Prawns and go for the Tamarine Prawns instead. The shells of the caramelized prawns were still partly on, which was annoying and a bit messy, and they didn't taste like much either. Ultimately, while I'd recommend a visit to Tamarine if you have cash to spare, I'd strongly recommend sticking to their classics -- Clay Pot Cod, Empress Rice, Tamarine Prawns, and appetizers over soups or salads. Sometimes, being too adventurous isn't a good thing. If I come again, I'll do my wallet some good, come for happy hour (half off appetizers!) and snack to my heart's content instead.
I had another phenomenal happy hour experience here last night! Tamarine updates their menu regularly, so I had the pleasure of trying several new appetizer additions. I started with my go-to lychee martini, my boyfriend opted for a cucumber infused vodka on the rocks. Drunken Octopus ( http://www.yelp.com/biz_... ): Baby octopus sauteed with kuochuang pepper, rice wine, soy sauce, and yukon gold potatoes - amazing flavors and spices in the sauce and the octopus was deliciously tender. Grilled Pork Lettuce Cups ( http://www.yelp.com/biz_... ): The grilled pork shoulder was tender and went well with the rice noodles that sat underneath the meat in the lettuce cups; on the side was some tasty nuoc cham (Vietnamese fish sauce dip), making this a perfect refreshing summer appetizer. Halibut Ceviche ( http://www.yelp.com/biz_... ): Wild Alaskan halibut cured with lime, chili, and cilantro sat in the bottom of the bowl, surrounded by  thinly sliced red onions and purple yams. This dish was simply gorgeous to the eye as well as pleasing to my palate. This was just so different from any ceviche I have had before and it really worked. Bacon Wrapped Dates ( http://www.yelp.com/biz_... ): Coachella dates with English cheddar & panko crumbs, served with a cumin-honey sauce. I have such high expectations for bacon wrapped anything, and although these were very good, they fell a little short. I would have loved to have more bacon flavor coming through and could have done without the panko crumbs. The dipping sauce, however, was amazing and I dipped a good amount of my Banh Mi Roti into it. We couldn't say no to dessert so we decided to try the Sundae with toasted coconut and brownie bits. This was not as heavy as we expected, which was a pleasant surprise. The toasted coconut absolutely made this dish. Not only did it add some tropical flavors to the ice cream and brownie bits, but it also rendered a nice crunch to the dish. Once again we ate way more than necessary and enjoyed every single second of it.
Tamarine is hands-down one of my favorite spots in Palo Alto for lunch, dinner, AND for happy hour.... Read more 
If I were just rating the food, I'd give it 1 star, but service was very good, so I increased it to 2. All of the dishes sounded soooooo good, so we got 4 starters and 4 different entrees and 2 different rices. As for the starters, none were very good: the calamari was tough, the halibut ceviche was bland and also did not come with anything crisp to eat it on, the tea leaf beef was just bland, chewy beef balls like the kind that come in pho, and I can't even remember the fourth thing. Entrees: The duck confit was a huge disappointment, not at all melt-in-your-mouth the way it should be, lamb chops just okay, and the clay pot cod would have been good, but it was slightly undercooked and so a little slimy rather than flaky. And the shaking beef everyone raves about? Cheaper and more tender at Khanh's in San Jose. Desserts: The molten chocolate cake was good, however not warm enough so the center was cool. The pecan butterscotch bread pudding DELISH!! I would not come back here unless other people really wanted to go, not my choice at all. No one really drank any alcohol, bill for 4 including tip: $267.
Excellent food. Am not a huge fan of Vietnamese cuisine, however was in my adventurous mode so decided to visit ... and influence my colleagues as well to go for a business lunch. We ordered Tamarine Prawns, Shaking beef and the lamb chops. I also had the water melon lemonade. Everything was absolutely yummy. I give them 5 stars for ambiance, food and service.
I went south to see whether Palo Alto offered an alternative to the Slanted Door in San Francisco.  While Slanted Door is huge and up-tempo, Tamarine is smaller and more sedate.  A more formal place with table cloths. I started with salt and pepper calamari that came with a cilantro based dipping sauce.  The calamari were encased in a too thick batter that had no taste of salt or pepper.  The cilantro added a bit of astringency but couldn't rescue a much too tame, even boring, plate of food. Next, basil tofu.  The crisped tofu were nice enough.  The basil added surprisingly little taste to the dish.  And the soy sauce in which the tofu sat was much too sweet. Finally, clay pot cod.  The cod was perfectly cooked and as good as one expects black cod to be.  But again the sauce was too sweet. It seemed to me that Tamarine has homogenized their food and replaced any edge with a good dose of sugar.  So for me Tamarine doesn't replace Slanted Door.  Maybe that's a good thing as I live in San Francisco.
great service and wonderful atmosphere! The kobe beef pho lived up the hype. Having that kobe style beep really made a difference in the pho. The pho itself I would consider fusion. I wanted to say I tasted some cinnamon in it? Some of the most tender calamari I've ever had too. And the sauce that comes with it?  Oh man, the sauce. yes please! Papaya salad didn't disappoint either.
This was my third time at Tamarine and it seems to keep geting better. Can't wait till next time.
My favorite restaurant in Palo Alto area! Friendly staff, nice atmosphere, good cocktails and delicious food. Always busy, so make a reservation. Things to try: Tuna tartare Tamarin Prawns Shaking Beef Empress Rice Banana beignets and coconut ice
Thanks to my fellow yelpers, my first dinner at Tamarind was a memorable n gastronomic success! I went to Tamarind w my girlfriends for an early dinner on Sunday. We were seated quickly without reservations. Vibes is hip,cool n cozy. Noise level is reasonable since you can actually carry out  a decent conversation. Good place for a date night. Our server Maryann was attentive n efficient. We had the lemongrass cocktail which was very refreshing n tasty. We shared some starters n entree- the tamarind appetizer for two that includes papaya salad w beek jerky, crispy summer rolls and beef wrapped in tea leaves and the tuna tartare w fried wonton, pancake roti w red curry sauce, empress rice and cod clay pot. Every one was pleasing to the senses, amazingly delicious,complex and filling. This is certainly one of my recent university avenue favs!
I have been in this restaurant a number of times mostly due to the inertia of my first visit a couple of years ago (which I enjoyed because of its newness). I have finally convinced myself that the food is completely average for the price that they charge. We had most of the recommended items like Kobe Beef Pho ($15), Tamarine Prawns ($27), Hoisin Lamb Chops ($27), Tamarine Taste ($20), and a couple more.  We paid an average of $50 per person.   Pretty much all of the dishes were worse than comparable dishes in other low cost  (but good) Asian restaurants.  The selections in Tamarine Taste (a combo plate) were particularly below average.  For instance, I have had a much better rice paper roll in Lee Sandwitches costing me a few dollars. What is puzzling is that the place was full.   My chair was hit several times by the careless waiter as he was passing behind our table.  In conclusion, generally nice people but completely average over-priced food.
Top-notch Vietnamese fusion. A bit better than Xanh, but Xanh atmosphere is cooler. Go on business so you do not have to worry about the price. Tables are tight, so it feels like everyone around you is interviewing. Filled to the ceiling with white people. :-) That's gotta mean something.
Yelpers are complaining about Tamarine being overpriced, but everything I've gotten here has been so incredible that I don't think it merits that label. Also, there are some good sized dishes on the menu that are labeled as sides or starters that can definitely substitute one of the entrees, and are much less expensive. You HAVE to at least start with the Roti. It and its sauce is the tastiest combination of buttery, flaky bread and curry that it really is unavoidable.The Garlic noodles are so simple yet so tasty, and often serve as main dish. The long beans are an incredible addition to any of the menu's meal. The empress rice is delicious, the starter calamari is always fresh and the cilantro sauce is great too. Tartare would be the one thing I would probably not order again - it just didn't stick out in comparison to the rest of this incredible menu. As for the mains - Clay Pot Cod and Shaking Beef are amazing. The Cod has this glaze that you just never want to go away, and the Shaking Beef is super tender and is accompanied by some refreshing greens with cherry tomatoes and sliced red onion. The service doesn't stand out as incredible, but I haven't found it to be distracting either. YUM!
Took my girlfriend here for her birthday dinner and was truly confused on how to get into the restaurant when they had their drapes down in front. The ambiance of the restaurant was very nice and romantic. We started off our meal with the tuna tartare. For someone that eats their fish medium to fully cooked, I really enjoyed this. We got the popular clay pot cod, empress rice, and crab garlic noodles as entrees and it was really good. I definitely recommend the empress rice and even the table next to us asked about it! The only thing that I did not enjoy was our waiter. He was SUPER awkward and barely paid attention to us. When he did, he just hovered around us. I would have given this place a solid 4 stars, but even though I mentioned to the hostess that it was my gf's bday, the waiter didn't bring out anything for her. Other than that, the food is great.
Pretty space - ambience is nice even when crowded it's a decent noise level (though our table was too close to the next one - waiters kept bumping one of our folks when serving adjacent table. Excellent cocktail. Over priced & very uneven food quality. Geez, just cause people have gobs of money in this community and the rent is probably astronomic on University, it's not the sole justification for high prices. Food has to be a notch above. It's not. We only had vegetarian options. no real stand-out, some sauces too salty, some weird veggie combos, and underdressed salad. At $12-$19 a plate it really should be much better. But heck if the folks there are willing to shell out - more power to 'em. But if your more a food person than an ambience/scenester, then I'd skip it.
We ordered couple of appetizer Calamari , shrimp cupcake , roti, tea leaf beef. Calamari is the best of all. For main course, I have clay pot cod,side of asparagus and emperor rice . The cod was really good but I think I overdid it ordering the emperor rice which is a sticky rice top with fried rice and drizzle with sauce . I should have stick with just plain white rice
If you're looking for a place to eat in downtown Palo Alto, look no further! TAMARINE IS IT! Surprisingly, it wasn't too packed when we came for lunch around 12noon, but that might be attributable to the enormous size of the restaurant. So, grab a reservation if you can! Getting straight to the food....... Tuna Tartare: it was good, but I would advocate serving it with something besides glorified monster chips. Sardine Toast: so yummmmmy (despite its name). Banh Mi Roti: MY FAVORITE!!! The sauce was delicious, as was the pan-fried wheat bread. I could eat this for DAYS. I had the Tamarine Prawns - they give you six giant prawns drenched in a rich yummy sauce and topped with I-don't-know-what but it tastes amazing. The prawns are served on top of a bed of crispy noodles (which was just OK). Our table also shared the roasted brussel sprouts, served with roasted chestnuts (nomnomnommmm...). By far, the best Asian fusion food I have ever tried. Yum! Can't wait to come back :)
Tamarine had been a suggestion from friends along with several other restaurants in the area.  We selected Tamarine and were glad we did.  Food was great, Clay Pot Cod, Lemongrass Seabass, Empress Rice, long beans all very nice. We were seated immediately in a very elegant and simple decor.  The only down side was the waiter. He didn't mention specials and seemed very detached.
An amazing restaurant with a good vibe and great food.
Very nicely decorated and the staff was friendly and helpful. The food, however, was overpriced and underwhelming. I understand you must pay Palo Alto prices for your Palo Alto restaurant experience but you should expect to get enough food on your plate for what you are paying. The clay pot cod, although delicious, was the kicker in all of this. $25 for a 3 oz filet of cod for lunch was unacceptable. There are plenty of other Vietnamese fusion restaurants in the area better than Tamarine. Better yet, just go to a real Vietnamese restaurant for half the price.
This review is for their weak version of happy hour (note: no discounts on alcohol) and it was completely underwhelming. With 50% off appetizer prices, the food was fairly priced. I can't imagine paying full prices for non-special food. The best part of Tamarine was the upscale decor. It definitely had a nice feel and the bathrooms were clean and the paper towels were the really nice cloth-like ones. What we had: Tamarine Taste sampler (Taro Root Rolls, Tea Leaf Beef, Shrimp Spring Rolls & Papaya Salad) $10 HH price Halibut Crudo (ceviche) $7.50 HH price Roti $3.50 HH price The portions were all pretty small and I can't imagine paying the full prices for the items, especially since nothing stood out. The taro root rolls were just fried egg rolls (couldn't even tell they were taro) and the shrimp spring rolls were not better than good ones you can find at a cheaper Vietnamese restaurant. The halibut crudo did not have that much fish. Roti was good, but I suppose it is hard to ruin. Do note: there are no discounts on drinks during happy hour - full price cocktails, beer and wine. Why call it happy hour? Just call it discounted appetizer hour! My friend had two Saigon Export beers at $6.00 each. What bugged me the most was that I just had a diet coke and the bartender grabbed my glass when I was done with the first glass and refilled it without asking me. Then I get my check and I was charged for two sodas at $2.50 each. If you're going to charge for additional soda, you better dang well ask instead of just grabbing it and filling it up. Totally unprofessional and knocked this place down to two stars. Like Straits Cafe, just another example of paying for ambiance and a safe Asian dining experience. You are overpaying for Asian cuisine that you can find other places for much better prices. Verdict: If you want to try the place, I would try discounted appetizer hour first and go from there. I'm glad I did, because I won't be coming back to this bad rind.
This place is fancy, definitely where I'd take parents or people I want to impress. They offer a what seems to be a fusion of foods which sometimes I think is just an excuse to serve everything. It's not particularly notable, but the food is always good.
I can't believe I forgot to write a review for this place. We went on a Wednesday or Friday night. I do remember it was packed! We did not expect it to have so many business dressed and business people cutting deals at this restaurant. It was a little awkward. Whatever, we survived. Ordered: - Taro root rolls which were good. - Shaking beef, I ordered because that seems to be a hit among yelpers...and they were right! I don't remember what my friend ordered, but she wasn't too pleased about her dish. The service was great. I'd come back, but I will be more prepared about the business atmosphere.
Tamarine has a pleasant and welcoming atmosphere. The service was efficient and polite. Our waitress had just the right balance, attentive yet not intrusive. The menu offered an array of specialties to suit every taste and the dishes we ordered were very good (some menu items did not stand out above other Vietnamese restaurants) and nicely presented. Tamarine Taste sampler (Taro Root Rolls, Tea Leaf Beef, Shrimp Spring Rolls & Papaya Salad): The beef was the stand-out here, the spring rolls and papaya salad were fairly standard, and the taro root rolls were basically fried egg rolls (did not taste the taro at all). Basil Tofu: Tofu cubes were crispy on the outside and soft on the inside, as hoped for. The accompanying sauce was tasty, though the crispyfied basil leaves didn't add much to the dish. Solid. Squash green curry: A flavorful, mildly spicy green curry featuring tofu cubes, eggplant, zucchini, red pepper, and... oh yeah... squash. A hit. Curried long beans: Nice for veggie lovers, but not outstanding or surprising.
Yes, this place is pricey, but you can still get a good meal for a decent value. Don't expect a full meal for under $10 as you can get at a sandwich/pizza spot in downtown Palo Alto, but I was able to spend $25 for a fairly gourmet Vietnamese lunch and I think that's worth it when the food quality is fairly high! I ordered two sides and my friends got the prix-fixe "Power Lunch" that was $18 for a starter and an entree. Both were good deals; I didn't go for the prix-fixe b/c I already researched what I wanted and these items were only on the regular lunch menu. MUST-HAVE: Empress Rice!! * Green Papaya Salad - 3 stars (Shredded green papaya tossed with basil & served with dried shredded beef. $11) The dried beef reminded us of asian beef jerky and had that splash of intense savory flavor that went well with the fairly muted papaya. The bit of tart/vinegar-y sauce was good too. In general I'm not the biggest fan of papaya salad (hence 3 stars) but this is probably the highest rating I've ever given a dish of this type. * Barely Cooked Salmon - 3.5 stars (Poached local Wild King Salmon served with sauteed spinach & passion fruit-butter sauce. $25) We were really impressed with how truly barely cooked the salmon was. Every inch of the fillet was extremely evenly cooked - just enough so it's not raw - on the outside. The inside was soft, tender, and just raw enough. The spinach was cooked to be soft and its slight bitterness balanced the salmon well. I wish there was more flavor overall though, this was a fairly flavorless dish as they seemed to have been banking mostly on the subtle flavors of the ingredients themselves. * Basil Tofu - 3.5 stars (Crisp tofu wok tossed with garlic & basil in a seasoned soy sauce; finished with crisp basil. $12) The sauce was sharp and tasty. Each square of tofu was evenly crisped on the outside, soft and silky on the inside. It was almost too crispy though - it should have been either less crispy, or they should have really gone all the way and crisped/fried it even more with breading so it was nice and crunchy. This texture was an odd in between that was hard but not quite enjoyable to crunch through. * Empress Rice - 5 stars (Sticky rice, garlic, leeks, ginger & egg; served with a sweetened soy drizzle. $8.5) WOW this was fantastic! The server comes out with a plate of rice topped with a soft-cooked sunny-side-up egg and mixes it all together right in front of you (I wish I had a photo pre-mixing, it was visually a really impressive dish at that point). We all took a bite and were just amazed at the perfectly soft and chewy texture of the rice. The well balanced sweet/savory soy sauce was just the perfect kick of flavor. Needless to say, we were scraping the plate to get every grain of rice!
My favorite upscale restaurant in Palo Alto.  Every single bite is incredibly delicious!  There is a wide range of meal options, centering around Vietnamese cuisine but very innovative in its creations.  It's very pricey, but definitely worth it if you want optimal quality.
Somehow I finagled my way into a work dinner at Tamarine and boy am I glad I had the opportunity to try them out.  Such a great restaurant.  Walking in the restaurant was dimly lit with a beautifully decorated interior (I was seriously under dressed).  I was seated promptly where we began to have a deep conversation for fifteen minutes.  The server was kind enough not to interrupt, but after a while we had to call him over to take our order. One individual, who has been to Tamarine several times, was kind enough to order for the group.  I was a little hesitant at first, but she made some great picks.  We started off with the calamari which came with a fantastic cilantro dipping sauce.  Then for the main dishes we had the sea bass, Tamarine prawns, squash green curry, and basil tofu with sides of the garlic noodles, coconut and brown rice. The food was phenomenal.  The sea bass was cooked to perfection and had a side of a delicious noodle salad with mango.  I fell madly in love with the basil tofu, probably my favorite dish of the evening.  It was crispy with a fantastic sauce.  My friend loved the green curry and practically licked the bowl clean.  I don't eat prawns, but the sauce covered crispy noodles were delicious.  For dessert my friend and I shared the bread pudding which was just as amazing.  I'm pretty sure you can't go wrong with anything on their menu. This is definitely a great location for a romantic evening.  It is a bit pricey, so I'll probably only return for a special occasion (or if I can convince someone else to pay).
i came here with my girlfriend on our anniversary. very very classy place. the ambiance is quite romantic. make sure to make a reservation because it gets packed! food here is pretty good! here's what we got: the Pomegranate Duck, Shaking Beef, Emperor Rice, Garlic noodles, and taro rolls. the pomegranate duck was the favorite of the night; very flavorful. the portions were just right. our tab came in a little bamboo case, pretty neat. i'd recommend this place
Shared a great dinner here with some very close friends. While I've been up and down University, I never thought of coming to Tamarine until I won a gift card here at a networking event. I invited two galpals to come join me, and the rest was a 3.5 hour meal that I shall reminisce upon fondly for quite some time. We shared the calamari and tuna tartare as starters - the calamari were flash friend in big pieces and lightly battered (almost tempura-like). The cilantro emulsion it came with was flavorful though I could have used a bit of heat in it (of the spice ilk). The tartare was good, though we ran out of chips before we ran out of fish. We shared 2 entrees - the famous shaking beef (wonderfully moist and perfectly medium rare), sous vide duck breast with pomegranate-tamari reduction (this was a delight to eat), and paired them with sides of garlic noodles (solid but not fantastic), and roasted brussels sprouts (yummy). The service was a bit slow at first (our wait staff switched a quarter through our meal), but the server we ended with was fantastic and because of her we got suckered into sharing 2 desserts as well. We tried the lemon tart with meringue, and some sort of tapioca pudding with sorbetto that was delicious! As you can imagine, we were stuffed afterwards but were having such a great time we sat there until they closed... and then some. But the whole time the staff was extremely gracious and never made us feel rushed. That definitely was appreciated, especially when we realized we had overstayed!
The Verdict: "Fine Vietnamese Fusion Dining." I'm a sucker for ambiance and of course tasty food, so Tamarine naturally hit some high marks for me. I went with some friends and ordered the shaking beef, tiger prawns, crab glass noodles and a mixed veggie dish. My favorite was the shaking beef and watermelon lemonade. The beef was so tender and full of flavor. The lemonade was just plain refreshing. The noodles were ok but a little too over-peppered. Serving sizes are pretty decent and can be shared family style. Service was on the spot and very attentive. Overall, this is a great place for a special occasion and some pretty good Vietnamese fusion cuisine. Would I Recommend It? Yes, I'll be back to try some other items on the menu.
Pretentious, Poor Management, oh....and the food was good but not great. Yelpers, you usually get it right.  But this time you got it wrong.  The 2nd highest rated restaurant in Palo?  I don't think so.  We arrived without a reservation and noticed Armanis in the front window.  Feeling underdressed, my wife and I asked for a table and were seated in the very back of the restaurant, but not before we were asked if we would be done by 7:15 because they had a reservation coming in. Really?  We would have been done but the service was astronomically slow.  It wasn't our waiters fault.  He had the whole back room of poorly dressed IT types all seated around the same time. Appetizer plates were covered in fingerprints.  My wine glass was Reidel but had a big chip in the base.  Took forever to get our appetizers.  I had the shrimp cupcakes which were quite good but nothing amazing.  Waited again forever to get our entrees.  I had the shaking beef which is suppose to be the signature dish but it was just really good teriyaki beef.  My wife had steamed veggies and salad.  First glass of Syrah was ok.  I decided to go with a cab for second glass but it sucked so wanted to change to another but again took forever.  The maitre de came out and I complained the service was incredibly slow and our waiter was overwhelmed.  No apology and didn't give me the second glass free.  I upgraded to a Napa cab for twice the price but only slightly better.  Never was asked how it was. The decor is  W hotel with the W Hotel music to go with it.  On the way out no one asked how it was. You can do better in Palo.  Maybe this place was great at one time but that time has past.  Really disappointed in this one.
Tamarine holds a special place in my heart, it's where the hubby and I went on our first date and it's where we dined the day he proposed - so of course Tamarine is special to me. Cocktails: -lemongrass drop - 100 times better than an ordinary lemon drop, the lemongrass adds depth of flavor seems is more refreshing than a regular lemon drop. -kaffir cocktail - slightly lighter than the lemongrass drop, tastes more like lime even though lemongrass syrup is used. Starters: -salt and pepper calamari - calamari with an asian twist with flavors of garlic and onions, not bad -taro root rolls - I love taro so was super excited to try this dish, think fried eggroll with taro, so delish! Dinner: -clay pot cod - omg, so good...this dish made me want not only a second bowl of rice but a third!  the cod is cooked in a sweet molasses and the sauce is so good over rice...yum! -shaking beef - beef was cooked perfectly and the watercress salad coated in the soy makes a perfectly tossed salad. -basil tofu - the tofu is cooked in a soy sauce mixture and topped with some crisy basil, the crisy basil by itself is so flavorful. -empress rice - think fried rice except with exceptional asian ingridents like ginger and leek, it goes really well with the clay pot cod. The food here is consistenly good and the service here is excellent.  While there are other more authentic vietnamese restaurants around they fail in comparison to Tamarine's attention to detail and ambiance. Overall:  Tamarine knows how to make a special occassion that much more special by going that extra mile!
Been here twice, once for dinner once for lunch. It's pretty awesome and the Shaking Beef has lived up to the hype. I also really liked the salt & pepper calamari. Little pricey, but the ambiance is swanky and the service is great.
If you scan the reviews, you'll see a strange combination of people who think this place is amazingly tasty, and people who think it is overrated and overpriced.  Neither side is wrong. Everything we had was yummy.  The papaya salad with shredded beef, and the brown rice served in a banana leaf might have been my favorites, but everything was good.  But many of the things were not so good that they were obviously better than food from a hole-in-the-wall Vietnamese place in San Jose or San Francisco.  Noodles with garlic and crab were the most disappointing.  All taste of the delicate crab was lost and left behind somewhere in the cooking process.  My Sauvignon Blanc was also alarmingly tart. On the other hand, you can't linger for two and a half hours at many of those hole-in-the-wall places, nor are any of them in downtown Palo Alto, which is where I frequently want to eat.  Tamarine dresses up the flavorful, lowbrow stuff for fancy company.  Is it worth it?  No.  Is it good in absolute terms?  Definitely yes. I feel like those two questions and answers describe virtually all of the fine dining scene in downtown Palo Alto.
Finally tried this place and it was really disappointing. Cannot compare to Xanh in Castro.  Everything is very mediocre.  We tried Bahn Mi Roti, green curry mussels, garlic fried rice and basil tofu.  None of these make me want to come back to eat.  Not sure why this place has a 4 star yelp review.  Will not go back.
Avoid the bar at all costs.  The bartender is super rude and unpleasant recently.  It ruined my evening and shouldn't ever happen at a restaurant this pricey.  (Or any restaurant really)  It was so bad I was traumatized for the rest of the evening and we didn't even end up getting any food.  Horrible experience. Tamarine is still probably ok if you get a table, but that requires reservations - and they often don't answer their phone. Tamarine, despite having tasty food (if on the greasy side for some dishes), has fallen far down my list of places to go.  The snobbish attitude of the staff or outright hostility of some means it's not a guaranteed good experience anymore. Perhaps if you are old and grey or very dressed up they will treat you with more respect.  Personally I would stick to takeout, but it's pretty expensive for takeout and I don't like supporting such a hostile environment.
Good flavors, somewhat expensive.  Excellent place for gluten allergies. Tamarine has a separate... Read more 
Delicious food. But Oh so expensive! Vegetarians should try the Curried Long Beans with the Garlic rice. Prawns were really nicely done and the presentation was unique. The Tamarine mojito was rather refreshing. Cons: Price vs Quantity
OMG, the flavors just get better and better. This is one of our favorite places to go in downtown Palo Alto. Favorites include Popcorn Cups, Bacon-wrapped dates, Claypot Cod, and the French Lamb chops. This time we had the oil/butter with garlic fried rice. What outrageously wonderful flavors. We practically ate the plates! Banana Beignets were good and rest of desserts sounded good too. They make a knockout Mojito too. It continues to be one of our go-to places.
Delicious! I took clients for dinner on Friday night. Nice atmosphere- not too loud. Really good food. Shrimp Cupcakes were fabulous. Octopus was superb. Entrees we shared included shaking beef, miso chicken (a bit bland- but with hot sauce was outstanding), shrimp with fried noodles, clay pot cod- Wonderful. And don't miss dessert- The beignets were devine.  Will go back if/when I'm in Palo Alto again.
Loved this place! It's a bit pricey but totally worth it. The service was awesome, food was delicious and I can't wait to go back there!
Love Love Love- love this neighborhood gem...excellent Vietnamese fine dining fusion...everything especially the clay pot, empress rice and Kobe beef pho are killer...and banana beignets for dessert...that's our go to order...sometimes we even order a Kobe beef pho to go its so delicious...vibrant and sophisticated evening crowd and ambience...wonderful wait staff!  Highly recommend!
Delicious is so many ways.  Tamarine is compact, trendy, and pricey (does this sound like a lot of other Palo Alto places?), but the food is fantastic.  Vegetarian items are marked on the menu, and the kitchen can prepare any vegetarian item as vegan, which means that there are enough vegetarian/vegan items to overwhelm a party of two.  Reservations recommended, even the bar seems get full at times.
Fantastic food and service is spot on too. Clay Pot Cod- UHmazing! This other fish dish wrapped in paper was superb too. Great spot for a date or with family and friends.
My hubby and I went here on a double date with our friends (one of whom has the exact same birthday as mine), and it was very delicious and memorable! It had so many choices for both meat-eaters and vegetarians/vegans.  We ordered the veggie style Tamarine sampler appetizer which gave us curry dip w/ Roti triangles, a couple of fresh and fried spring rolls and a papaya salad.  I'd say the curry dip w/ Roti triangles were my favorite out of the 4. The hubby and I ordered fire wok lettuce, green curry w/ tofu and eggplant, and panko-crusted tofu and banana beignets for dessert.  Our friends ordered the crab fire wok fried garlic noodles, cod, and lamb chops and banana bread pudding for their dessert .  They said the cod dish was exceptional! The service was very nice, the ambience peaceful, and overall we had an amazing time.  I probably could have been less vent-y in my conversations, but I was thankful to have a delicious meal with good friends.
I came with a group of co-workers for lunch and everything was tasty, fresh and cooked perfectly. The service was excellent as well. We started with green papaya salad topped with beef which added an excellent flavor and some warmth to an otherwise cold dish. The curried long beans were fine but the only thing that didn't stand out heads above other Vietnamese restaurants. Ginger soy chicken had a wonderful sauce to top on the brown rice. And our final dish was the sous vide duck with no hint of game-y flavor. Unfortunately no space left for dessert. Thanks for an excellent lunch!
Tamarine provides an interesting dining experience. The wait staff are both knowledgeable and enthusiastic. I was at a business lunch with a big group so got to sample a number of their specialties. Especially memorable were the signature tamarind shrimp, which had a unique smoky-tangy-bitter flavor. The garlic fried rice was also very good. There were a couple of vegetarians among us, and a number of the dishes listed as fish or meat convert to vegetarian on request. Only thing I'd avoid would be the Vietnamese fried bread with a panang curry dip - its quite alright but the fat-to-pleasure ratio is high enough that its healthier to avoid it.
There were a lot of things to like about Tamarine, but also a lot undesired for. As I'm sorting through all the details in my head about my first experience here, I've concluded that it will probably also be my last. While the ambiance and pricing geared more toward a fine dining experience, the food did not. The cilantro emulsion in the calamari starter was a great condiment, flavorful and paired nicely with the garlicky punches in each piece of fried calamari. However, just like the egg rolls and practically every other dish we ordered, the portions were ridiculously small. Our waitress even suggested doubling up on some orders just to be able to feed every mouth of our party of 10. Sad to say, even the double order did not fill our appetites. While we felt skimped on the portions of each dish, they surely felt generous with the garlic in the crab & garlic noodles. A bit too generous. Even after washing it down with my refreshing glass of white peach sangria, I still couldn't get the intense garlic taste out of my mouth for the remainder of the meal. From there on out, everything just tasted like garlic to me. One of my favorite dishes of the evening was the Empress rice, which was a small bowl of sticky rice, garlic, leeks, ginger, & a poached egg on top that our server scrambled into the entire bowl. I would probably order this as an individual entree for myself along with a side of shaking beef. But $26 for a plate of shaking beef? Seriously? If you think that's absurd, wait until you get the $14 bowl of beef pho. I don't ever recall paying more than $6 for a heaping bowl of pho, so this blew my mind. There wasn't anything extraordinary about their pho, except for a hint of cinnamon spice in the broth, but I highly doubt that's worth an $8 difference. As much as I love family style dining in order to try a little bit of everything on the menu, this meal cost an arm and a leg for unsatisfying portions. At least the service provided was very accommodating. There's normally a $25 corkage fee, but our server was kind enough to speak to the sommelier to open our half bottle of dessert wine free of charge. After spending $300+ for this family meal, it would have been a crime to not comp corkage on such a small bottle. I don't feel a sense of entitlement, but I also don't feel it's right to be ripped off. Overall, it was a pleasant experience in a quaint, upscale venue that delivered attentive service, but I've endured much more desirable food at other places where prices weren't sky rocketing high. Best part of the meal: the cocktails.
Second time I came here. Reason I put 3 stars, is because it is way overpriced. Way, way, way overpriced. Food was good but really does not worth the price (unless you are an early investor or founder of one of the neighbor companies.). For instance a Beef Kobe salad dish about 26 or 27 dollars. C'mon! I would put no more than 18 for such dish in this restaurant / context. We had a reservation. Our table was ready about 20 minutes later (on a Friday night). One of the waiter kind of liked us and offered us Champagne while we were waiting, which was really nice. Waiters and service were nice, nothing bad to say about it. However we had an eyelash in one of our dish, It was not from one of us (we were only girls with thick mascara... so not ours). Nice from the restaurant: they did not count the dish. OK this happens... We all have hairs falling, right? Also what I did not enjoy, is the noise... We had a hard time hearing each other. So conclusion: Food was pretty good Price was not very nice.
...for Vietnamese food in the bay area, this is the place.   Really good food, good service and a hip atmosphere.   I've been eating here since it first opened, and I haven't been disappointed once.   Unlike my other reviews, few words are needed here....check this place out. Bottom-line --  I recommend it!   Check it out and I'll see you there!
The place was heaving on a Tuesday evening, good sign. Waited at the bar, then got a nice table and average-good service all night. Excellent food, particularly the fish that was masterly cooked. Also enjoyed the prawn cupcackes starter, both yummy and original. Definitely recommend it, both for business and pleasure.
The meal wasn't bad, but very overpriced. Drunken octopus: this was one of my favorite dishes from the lunch. It was flavorful and not overly greasy Shrimp cupcakes: thank goodness it didn't resemble cupcakes at all. The "cups" that they were served in were something that looked more like doritos scoops with a hint of coconut flavor. Tamarine Taste: this is a sampler of four different appetizers. The taro root rolls were delicious, but we didn't really taste the taro flavor. The non-fried shrimp spring rolls were not bad. Crab and garlic noodles: it's a rather simple dish, literally just grab and garlic and noodles. But it's not bad. I'd recommend. Tamarine prawns: huge prawns! Deliciousness. Clay pot cod: my favorite dish!! I highly recommend. The cod is caramelized just right while the fish itself is still tender. :) I was extremely delighted by this dish. Lemongrass sea bass: not bad, but it paled in comparison to the cod, and also slightly burnt, though I am not sure it was meant to be charred. Shaking beef: interesting name, but really just regular sauteed beef. Not bad but not worth $25. It really should be less than $10. Barely cooked salmon: do not order this! It really is aptly named. The salmon is barely cooked, and does not taste that well. Again, no reason why it is $25. Conclusion: come here for date nights or work functions. The ambiance is quite nice. Go for the cod! Stay away from the salmon.
Make sure to make a reservation ahead of time! (: Ambiance was chic. They seated my boyfriend and I in a nice little table for two. One thing that threw me off a bit was the bar seating in the center of the restaurant . It seems a bit awkward sitting with a bunch of random people. Food was great. We got the Pom. Duck, Shaking Beef, Emperor Rice, Garlic noodles, and Taro eggrolls. the taro eggrolls werent anything special, but everything else was perfect (: The duck was definately the favorite.
I was looking for a fancy-ish restaurant for a nicer than usual dinner. Tamarine is definitely a great date spot with a ultra chic modern vibe with hints of the asian theme resonating in items such as chopsticks, rattan menus, and selective artwork gracing the walls. After dining at Vietnamese establishments like Slanted Door and Heaven's Dog, both of equal caliber and located in SF, I was just slightly let down by Tamarine. However, this is not to say that the meal wasn't enjoyable, but rather that parts of it weren't as great as the other locales. We ordered: - Banh mi roti w/Penang curry sauce: Dumfounded by how good these were at a Vietnamese establishment! I've ordered this starter dish in countless Thai/Malay/Singaporean restaurants and it has never been THIS good. The portion size was fabulous, too! We gobbled up every last piece. - Wok fired garlic noodles: I didn't realize egg noodles could be this light! Really great, simple, and uncomplicated noodles for garlic-lovers. - Ginger soy chicken: Some pieces were definitely overcooked and dried out -- my one main pet peeve of eating chicken in restaurants. Serious gamble. Restaurants of this caliber should have their act together -- overcooking is a serious no-no. Overall, the dish was very lightly flavored with hints of ginger. Soy was the predominant flavor. Just okay, but I wouldn't order this again. We also ordered the curried long beans, but somehow this was forgotten and we were never served them. Nonetheless, the food was plentiful for the two of us. I was hoping for a 4-star review, but I'm giving it a 3-star until I return to sample some of the other entrees, which have received better ratings.
Tamarine never disappoints.. fairly consistent with their service and food. They allow corkage , which allowed us to enjoy a lovely bottle of cab. Appetizers: Roti was excellent texture, Pork crisps is a Miss! Beef samosas and Taro rolls are super good. Shaking beef and Duck are good entrees, tasty and good portions. Goan shrimp is a miss! Crispy cashew tofu was surprisingly good for a vegetarian choice. Its not your everyday tofu, More like vegetarian patty (cutlet) with extra grilled veggies on the side. The Dirty Martini and Golden eye were well prepared cocktails, and attentive server always equals well made drinks! We did not try desserts, because there were too many other places nearby to sneak in a sweet indulgence and pull out the night.
I went here several years ago for a business lunch. I thought the food then was very good, and I don't normally choose these types of restaurants as a first pick. Not sure why, because I came back here with a friend last week for lunch and ... yup, still think it's great. Everything on the lunch menu looked good, but they had a prix fixe "power lunch" menu that had stuff I wanted to try - included an appetizer and main course for under $20. Not bad at all for a place like this, higher end in their service and food. For some reason that day I was in one of my childish humor moods and cracked up at the presentation of the food I got -- both my appetizer (Salt Cod Croquettes) and Dessert (Fried Plantains with Ice Cream) were very, uh, phallic in their presentation and could not stop laughing. I felt bad taking the first bite. But you know - it's all good. I think the waiter was smirking too. I love him. Go. Whether it's for a business lunch or a date, totally worth it.
Kobe Pho tai is the benchmark for pho. Calamari and shrimp cupcakes are crazy! Tamarine is a super pretentious and pricey joint that I would not go to if the food wasn't so amazing. Not my demographic I guess... The decor is gorgeous. I really enjoyed the quality of the artwork as well. Service is good but slow (1.5 hour lunch). If the pho ever comes off the menu, I wouldn't return.
Seated promptly, dinner was delicious, atmosphere a bit lacking as the bar side was packed with folks and the tables side a bit lackluster.  Worth a trip though!
I recently visited Tamarine in Palo Alto. This Vietnamese place has been on my "To Try" list for a long time, so I thought I should check it out. We ordered: Banh Mi Roti -- Really amazing, soft roti with a great panang curry dipping sauce. Could have used a bit more spice in the sauce, but it was scrumptious as is. Chili-Lime Aubergine -- I really love eggplant, so I had high hopes for this dish. It was just ok. I felt that the temperature was a little off and scallion shreds on top had a weird texture. Panko Crusted Pressed Tofu -- Wow! This dish was absolutely amazing. It was crispy without being oily and came with a great bell paper & eggplant stew. Coconut rice -- average. Overall, it was a good meal. The bartender was really knowledgeable about the food and friendly. I had a great ginger and lemongrass cocktail that was really well-made (but unfortunately the menu online doesn't seem to list it) I will probably come back. Happy hour ends at 6 pm and its half off all appetizers. The crowd was a little more working professional adult than I usually hang around, but it was still a nice change. (I wish I could give it a 3.5) Check out http://ThinkSweet.me/Tid... for this review and other food recipes & reviews :D
After reading the reviews, I completely agree w/ everyone else that listed their fav foods. We eat @ Tamarine for lunch about 1x/week & the boss takes execs out for drinks/dinner about 2x/month. Consistantly good food, sometimes slow service (depending on your waiter), and beautiful ambiance. Favorite restaurant in Palo Alto, would eat here more often if not so pricey. Take-out is always fast & nicely packaged. Try: -the Vietnamese Iced Coffee. As good as Slanted Door. -Beef Samosas -Shrimp Spring Rolls -Ha Long Bay Soup -Wok Pho Beef Noodles -Tamarine Prawns (OMG, so sweet & delish! -Clay Pot Cod (my fav dish) -Shaking Beef -Sweet Potato French Fries (good flavor, but can sometimes be soggy) -I prefer the coconut rice (slightly sweet), but the boss likes the Empress Rice (savory)
The first time I went to Tamarine was for a debate team dinner back when I was a student at Stanford University. The place has stood fondly in my mind since then, and I wanted to give it a five-star review on Yelp, but I figured it wouldn't be fair to the Yelp users if I tried to recreate an experience from almost a decade ago. It would be much better if I wrote a review while Tamarine was fresh on my mind. So, that's what I did; I went back to Tamarine, in order to verify if it really is as good as I remembered. Well, it is. When you walk into Tamarine, you're immediate struck by the swanky, romantic atmosphere. It's dimly-lit, with beads hanging from the ceiling lamps. Along the walls of the restaurant are paintings done by Asian artists. (My favorite is the painting of the monks in the back of the restaurant, on the right.) All of the paintings are on sale, and you can have any of them for the modest price of $3000-$4300 (depending on the painting). This time, I sat at the bar during happy hour, and was served at various points by one of three bartenders on duty. They were all very friendly, and very efficient in getting my food out. As appetizers were half off during happy hour, that's all I ordered. I started with the tuna tartate. Golly, this was just perfect. They toss the tuna with coconut milk, ginger, and chili, and give you several crispy wonton chips to spread it all over. The flavors are balanced just perfectly, with the spices complementing the flavor of the tuna. It's a relatively small portion, so I went ahead and ordered a second appetizer; this time, I went with the banh mi roti, which is a roti (Indian bread) served with a red Penang curry sauce. The curry flavor was good, although I would have preferred if it were a bit spicier. Also, the proportions were a bit off. I ran out of curry long before I ran out of bread to dip in it. A culinary delight, and with half off during happy hour, it cost me only $10 (before tax and tip). How can you complain about that? Overall, Tamarine is a wonderful experience; I waited far too long before returning to it, but I certainly won't make that mistake again!
I'm not a big fan of Vietnamese cuisine, so when my friend's planned a dinner at this place, I was not that excited about it since it was our very last meal on our San Fran vacay.  Not only was it Vietnamese food, but it appeared to be a fusion type of restaurant, and normally I don't think too highly of Asian restaurants "with a twist". I don't think I'd make it a point to come here on future visits to the Bay area (there are too many other places that I'd rather go to), but, I still give it 4 stars because the food and service deserve it. Shrimp cupcakes -  I'm not a fan of coconut flavored hot foods so this didn't sit well with me. Crab and Garlic Noodles - loved the crab, but the dish as a whole did not have a lot of flavoring Tamarine Prawns - YUM! Clay Pot Cod - YUM! Shaking Beef - YUM! Curried Long Beans - not bad Empress Rice - YUM! For dessert we ordered the lava cake and tapioca - both were YUMMY!!!
Mmmm...Tamarine ranks high among the many upscale restaurants in downtown Palo Alto.  I particularly like the clay pot cod and shaking beef. Very nice ambiance and the wait staff has been excellent each time I've been there. Main drawbacks: The portions are a bit small and the price tag runs high quickly.
Overpriced Vietnamese food? Well of course, you're on University Ave! I didn't get to experience the dine in part, we ordered to go. The place was packed and very up scale looking. What we ordered: Salt & Pepper Calamari- this was pretty tasty, even after sitting in a box and getting soggy, it still held it's texture, I can only imagine how it would be if I dined in. Issan Grilled Sausage- this was very flavorful as well. Shrimp Spring Rolls- just your average spring roll from any place you can get it, did nothing special to it. Taro Root Rolls- fried egg roll! Good option for the veggie eaters. Crab & Garlic Noodles- made with glass noodles, different, wasn't strong in the garlic department, plenty of crab chunks, pretty good flavors. Good portion. Clay Pot Cod- this was saucy and flavorful. very small portion. Lemongrass Sea Bass- good taste, cooked nicely. just one fillet. Shaking Beef- beef was well marinaded, good dish. good size. Chili-Lime Aubergine- grilled eggplants, different, but not much flavor going on, must dip it in their sauce to get some flavor going. Festive Rice-Steamed long grain rice, coconut, turmeric & salam leaves- small portion of rice, pretty good flavors. Overall, food might have tasted waaay better dining in, but the experience of dining out was pretty darn good. They're a little pricey and the portions are ok, the fish portions were tiny for the price they were charging. I would be disappointed if that was my entree and had nothing else to eat, I'll be hungry. I'll be sure to come back and try the dining in experience.
This restaurant is the de facto expense account lunch for my department at work.  Since everything is served family style it isn't outrageously expensive and is great for a group.  In fact I brought my husband here after having eaten so many amazing business lunches and can definitely say the experience with two is just not the same as with a larger group (too limited in the dishes you can try, whereas with a group you can be more adventurous). A couple recommendations and tips: Starters Calamari with cilantro emulsion sauce, honestly the calamari itself is just alright, but the sauce is so amazing (on everything!) - it's the reason to order it! Papaya salad with beef - it's so good and I don't even know why because it doesn't sound like it would be good, but it's one of my favorite things on the menu Skip the shrimp cupcakes - waiter pushed them and honestly I thought the name alone sold them (I work in marketing after all), but they needed a spice or something for my taste - quite bland Mains You pretty much have to order the old standbys: clay pot cod and shaking beef (they are the best of the best for a reason!) I've ordered the duck several times and I never think it comes with enough sauce, and the confit potato cake that comes with it is again one of those items that sounds way better than it tastes in my opinion Overall, you can expect an awesome meal here, great innovative flavors and terrific ambiance.
Had dinner with the Mrs for valentines day. They had a special menu of 4-course dinner. The food was great!  Their filet mignon is excellent. If it's on the regular menu, you have to try the sea bass, it is the best sea bass anywhere.  They have an exclusive collection of wine that you cannot find anywhere else...don't know how they did that! It is a true Wine & Dine experience a this Viet-French restaurant.  Our waitress was excellent and very accommodating. I highly recommend this restaurant for an upscale dinner experience. It was a true wine
I went to Tamarine for a work event so we were treated to several aps and courses. We got to try half their menu and everything we had was amazing! I will definitely be going back. You cannot go wrong here.
My girlfriend and I had a great meal here. PROs: 1) The restaurant ambiance feels very warm and intimate, despite the tables being somewhat close together. 2) The wine list is very good. 3) The food was very tasty - go for the garlic crab noodles. 4) The cocktails are fun! 5) Attentive but not overly attentive service. CONs: 1) The food was good, but not amazing. I would still go back though. 2) The wallet took a wallop, but it was a celebration so, meh. Will go back!
This restaurant is a gem. I feel really lucky because I came with someone who knew the menu thru and thru and ordered all of the delicious things my little heart desired. I can't list all of the things I tried because there were so many: + calamari is great + delicious cocktails + awesome eggy fried rice type thing + fried prawns are delicious + SHAKING BEEF for the win! (so tender so delicious) + Mango iced tea (for the non alcoholics) is outstanding.... I'm craving it right now as I type! Great service here. Definitely a great place to come with a group or a date. A real treat!
Finally got around to trying Tamarine. One question now: what took me so long? Everything is family style unless you can't handle it...I recommend you just go with the flow as there are so many delicious options on the menu - why restrict your taste buds? We ordered: Shaking Beef (a true competitor to the Slanted Door's version), a Chili-Lime Aubergine side dish (possibly the best Asian eggplant dish I've ever tasted), Green Papaya salad (so fresh!) and Salt & Pepper Calamari (way too fried for my taste). Besides the calamari, I thought the dishes were exquisite - well seasoned, not overcooked, full of complementary flavors. Even the plating and delivery was divine. Oh and if you like fried food, you should try the calamari - my dining companion was into this dish as well. Oh and just a suggestion...Tamarine would be a great date spot...very light, white linen tablecloths, velvet curtains.....
Most people seem to really like Tamarine but I had a terrible experience here. The service was horrible and the food mediocre. First, the service:  Even though we had a reservation we ended up waiting for 45 minutes to be seated. Then, after we were seated, we ordered relatively quickly but it took another 45 minutes for our appetizers to come out and another 30 minutes after that for out entrees to come out. Yes, they were busy that night, but that's just ridiculous. Our server never filled our drinks or even offered too, nor did he bring us plates to actually eat our food in. We had to request them. Twice. Now, the food: Mediocre. My husband ordered a shrimp dish where the shells were left on the shrimp and no shrimp fork was given. I ordered the clay pot cod, which tasted like old, gluey fish dunked in molasses. It was so sweet that I didn't bother did dessert. It's possible the chef and staff of Tamarine were just having a bad night. Unfortunately their incompetence cost me $100, so I won't be returning.
Fantastic shaking beef and Lemongrass Sea Bass dishes! Came here for dinner on the day after Christmas, a monday evening. Even though the rest of University Ave was quiet, this place was packed! We made reservations for 2 earlier in the day. The service is good, and leisurely. Really enjoyed the ambiance- good for date, dim, pleasant noise level. We started with the Tamarine taste, a sampler of their appetizers: Taro Root Rolls, Tea Leaf Beef, Shrimp Spring Rolls & Papaya Salad. The first 3 were standard, nothing special. My favorite was the papaya salad: it had a crisp, vinegrette taste. The Festive Rice went well with the entrees- plenty for 1 people. Next time I'll stick to coconut rice or brown/jasmine rice since this was nothing fancy. With wine and cocktails for both of us, our bill totalled about $110- all well spent!
I had the cod and the beef, both were flavorful. however the fried rice was nothing to boast about, rather dull and dry. portions could be bigger. great atmosphere and friendly service.
This is Vietnamese food?  'Upscale Vietnamese'?  Whatever you want to call it, it was delicious! Went there for a business dinner and the menu was set for us.  I remember having at least a dozen different plates from appetizers to desserts and everything was tasty.  I also remember thinking, isn't that Indian food, or Malaysian food, or Chinese food, or Thai food, etc...   It was all over the map, but again, it was still good. The restaurant is not roomy and felt very cramped.  It was crowded and I felt claustrophobic.  I need my elbow room and personal space.  Not really my scene either - stuffy crowd.  But I guess you'd expect that in Palo Alto, in an upscale Vietnamese(?) restaurant. lol It's a great place.  I'll be back.
I am not sure why this place is so highly rated, to the point where it's apparently difficult to make a reservation (I didn't make my reservation, a friend did, and she said it wasn't easy). It isn't bad, but I don't see it as a four star establishment. Drinks: I got the anti-oxidant mojito. Decent flavor, but wished it had a bit more pop/fizz in it, so that it would be more refreshing. Overall, still decent. Appetizers: Ordered the Banh Mi Roti, which was a waste of time. If you've been to South East Asian restaurants like Banana Leaf or Layang Layang, then you'll know that this is basically a roti canai with thai curry. First, the bread is basically the frozen pratha that you can buy at most Asian grocery stores; and second the thai curry is a bad match for this type of bread (traditionally, you would pair this with a fish curry). Don't get this. We also go the Tamarine Taste, which is basically the pu-pu platter of their appetizers, a little bit of everything. They messed up our order, because we asked that the papaya salad be made vegetarian, but it came out with beef on it. They did take it back and replace it with tofu immediately. This doesn't bother me, but since everyone raved about their service, I did think I should point this out. The appetizers were decent, with the taro rolls being the weakest and their beef roll being the best. Entrees: We got the wok friend garlic noodles, the madras chili tofu, and the chili lime aubegine. The noodles were simple and flavorful, I was pleasantly surprised. It was not something I expected from a restaurant like this, where everything seems to be a little bit more fanciful than necessary. It was a nice homely dish, that I would expect from a hole-in-the-wall type place, not this type of place. The shaking beef was a complete waste of time. Mildly flavorful beef cubes with a side salad, that's what the dish is, and I don't understand the price ($27) and the hype behind it. The madras tofu though, was the star of the night. From the flavors, to the perfectly done mushrooms, it was by far the most popular dish. This one is worth coming back for. Dessert: Got the pecan bread pudding and banana beignets; both were perfectly fine, nothing terrible wrong (not too sweet), but nothing amazing either (though I would rate the coconut ice cream that came with the banana beignets as above average for sure). Conclusion: Perhaps, I just don't really like fine Vietnamese cuisine, or I ordered all the wrong dishes, but I just don't get the hype behind this restaurant. This place isn't bad, but I don't see the greatness in it either. For those who've been to Le Colonial in Chicago, I would say that Le Colonial is slightly better (and I don't even rate that place that highly). Overall, the madras tofu was good, but I probably won't be back here given the price and the popularity (given how hard it is supposedly to get a table).
I consistently have a good experience at Tamarine. It's no surprise that they are often packed. The staff are knowledgeable and very friendly. The atmosphere makes me feel like I'm in a trendy NY restaurant. Lots of beautiful lighting and gorgeous, calming colors. Food is just delicious. Love the sea bass (not always on menu) and peppered shrimp. The aubergine (eggplant) is very tender and delicious. Oh and the calamari is distinctive in it's presentation with a sauce that's unique and just right. The shaking beef is also tender and consistently delicious. Yummy! Crowd tends to be 30+. We've met really interesting people at the bar quite often. It's a little pricy but to me it's worth it and makes for a special treat. Really like this place!
Tamarine has long been a staple of downtown Palo Alto.  Trendy, beautiful, and always popular with the weekend crowds, Tamarine is like the more popular sister to my favorite Vietnamese restaurant, Vung Tau. In fact, Tamarine is actually more than just like a sister, it IS the actual sister restaurant to the family's original Vung Tau restaurants (I, II, and III) that spawned the daughters' opening Tamarine and the now defunct, Bong Su in San Francisco. In many ways, Tamarine does things well that fit the area.  It's more contemporary than Vung Tau and the bar area, where you can also order dinner, is a hubbub of activity.  The staff are efficient and more culturally diverse than the staff at Vung Tau.    The waiters help explain dishes and even help teach you how to eat certain foods.  They even have vegetarian options, can custom order to-go orders, and accept all credit cards.  Sounds great, right? In the end, just like that stereotypical prettier, but more superficial, sister, Tamarine really can't compare to Vung Tau, because while all those things are nice, it's about the most important things that truly count.  And for restaurants, that's the food.  The food at Vung Tau is significantly better and more authentic. The depth of flavor, especially of dishes they both serve, is at another level for Vung Tau.  So if you're looking for a place to just hang out and grab a quick drink or snack, Tamarine might work for you, but if you want a long term prospect, there's no matching the original Vung Tau. Our order: Banh Mi Roti - despite the name, it had nothing to do with the popular banh mi sandwiches that you see sold everywhere.  The banh mi translates more accurately into bread and really this dish is just the standard roti appetizer, served with panang curry, that you see at a range of ethnic restaurants.  $6 Wok Fired Garlic Noodles - another item that is very ubiquitous at Vietnamese restaurants, including the competing chain of restaurants from the An family and from Slanted Door.  The version here is good, but nothing special.  $8 Tamarine Prawns - the signature item on the menu and, at $26, a pricey one.  5 jumbo prawns are flash fried and served with tamarine sauce.  I personally was disappointed with this one.  It was too sour and the sauce was a poor mimic of the version at Vung Tau.  Momma's still does it best. Kobe Beef Pho - I'll admit I was pulled in by the kobe beef.  A largely average noodle soup preparation (I'd guess not from scratch) topped by very tender kobe beef that allows them to price it at a crazy $14. Overall, we had a good, but not great, meal at Tamarine.  The place was crowded, the ambiance alive, and the people well-dressed and attractive, but the food just quite didn't do it for me, especially at the higher price point.  I did like the fact that they sat us at the bar and that we were able to eat at either a communal table or the bar area rather than wait hours for a regular table. It's a good place if you're going to expense your meal (as many business folk appeared to be doing) or if you're looking for a trendier, rather than tastier, option. Tamarine accepts credit cards, including American Express.
Upgrading my rating based on a back-to-back series of great experiences. Food still great... scene still great... and the 'tude of the hostesses has gotten noticeably better... dare I say welcoming! Latest experience was dinner with my wife and son. We started with a couple glasses of Deutz Champagne (a great one to have available by the glass!) and the salt & pepper calamari (my son's fav). We moved on to the crab with glass noodles (delicious and flawlessly executed every time) and then the duck with cognac sauce, which paired very nicely with a bottle of red Burgundy. Again, I have to go out of my way to point out how well constructed the wine list is... great mix in terms of price and selection... some real cherries on the list if you know what you are looking for... I won't say any more 'cause I want them to be there when I go back. :) I encourage people to order lots of dishes and eat family style. The menu is well-suited to this approach. Tamarine is also a great destination for private parties. They have the ability to section off the restaurant in many different configurations and accommodate many different sized parties. We hosted one here this past year and were extremely happy with the results. All the guests commented on how wonderful the experience was. I also learned that the GM and sommelier are ex-Fleur de Lys folks. Explains a lot... they take service very seriously and go the extra mile. They are very approachable and pleasant.
Love the food. Love the scene. Hate the attitude. Think of this as a little piece of NYC right here... Read more 
Tamarine provided solid, reliable service and fare. The experience was good, their corkage not exorbitant, and their cuisine eclectic and quality. Favourite first courses: Roti Beef samosas and Taro Rolls Main: The Shaking Beef was excellent, as was the Roasted Duck The bar staff were competent and able to prepare solid, authentic requested cocktails. They got my GoldenEye right (well, the lemon peel wasn't that narrow, but that's a slight detail) and it was very enjoyable. The noise level is a bit high. I needed to project to the wait staff, but they were patient and adaptable.
We were a group of three and while we were waiting for our reserved table we sat at the bar and then it was all down hill after that...met this bar tender who was acting like a know all and made certain comments that were racist and that just turned me off completely!...The waiters at serving at the table were also not very friendly and were acting really uptight!...I have definitely been to much better restaurants with amazing food and better ambiance!...IT A BIG NO FROM ME!
*********************** 663 ************************** Same family with Vung Tau restaurant in downtown San Jose, lots of familiar dishes, except for Palo Alto real estate rent, the fod here cost 3 times more than Vung Tau, it makes sense! The dining room itself is always packed, tables are so closed to each others that I can smell the girl perfume next to us!  The bar is a better spot. Some of these bartenders have been here for a while and they can whip up some major well drinks. A few dishes to try: - Tamarine Taste - sampling plate of  Taro Root Rolls, Tea Leaf Beef, Shrimp Spring Rolls & Papaya Salad. - Green Curry Steamed Mussels - PEI mussels simmered in light coconut milk, Vietnamese mint, scallions & chilie - nice to use the sauce to pull over steamed rice. - Crab & Garlic Noodles - Peeled Dungeness crab wok fired with glass noodles, garlic, ginger & soy sauce; finished w/ Chinese celery - nice and well balanced taste. - Shaking Beef  - Cubed beef tenderloin seared with soy, garlic & onions; served with a watercress & mizuna salad - small portion, but good. - Tamarine Prawns - Flash-fried jumbo prawns tossed in Tamarine's signature tamarind sauce & served with crisp noodles - sweet and tangy, nice with rice. - Sauteed Water Spinach - Water spinach wok tossed with garlic, chilies & rice wine - 1 of my FAV dishes here. Decent service, I prefer to come here on Tuesday or Wednesday, much better food and service! On the pricier tab, but it's Palo Alto standard!
Had dinner with my colleague and friends. Lots of vegetarian choices. Squash Green Curry was excellent with very rich aroma. Lots of appetizer choices, I tried Banh Mi Roti, which was delicious but bit oily, I should have noted it was pan fried. Overall great dining experience.
I came here with a large group of people for a friends birthday dinner. I liked the good service, and the fact that our waiter suggested that we do it family style and split a bunch of appetizers and entrees, we ordered 6 appetizers and 6 entrees and a little rice and a few veggie dishes. Nobody had alcohol and we all came out paying $40 each... I wouldn't have minded if I didn't go home hungry!  It was certainly not enough food for 12 people, I could have easily eaten the entire entree by myself and I am not a compulsive eater or anything! The food was nice, but not $27 for a few bits of beef on a plate, nice. I am a young professional, and although I am not counting my pennies, I am not able to blow a wad of cash just for fun. I felt like that is what we all did tonight. We had some pretty nice food and got kicked in the wallet.
It's definitely a happening business lunch place. Price-y for sure (but there is always the $18 prix fixed power lunch menu).  We went a la carte which by default means expense account. Shaking Beef - the beef was very very tender, but too thick for my taste and could have used more overall taste. Emperor rice - uh... it's sticky rice with soy sauce and a poached egg, pass Garlic rice - meh...  overpriced Tofu rolls of some sort - they were good Roti - delicious shrimp cupcakes - good lamb - okay Basically, it is a good "fusion" restaurant, but not great.  But on University Ave, most restaurants fall short on the quality side.
I really, really wanted to like Tamarine. If I was just rating food, I would give an enthusiastic 4 stars.  We ordered the Tamarine Taste which included 4 of the appetizers (serves 2) - very tasty and well portioned, I think it was the perfect starter.  We also had prawns served over crispy noodles, the duck (this was just OK), and crab & garlic noodles.  All were delicious.  I would have loved to try dessert, but I had no desire to stay after we finished our entrees (see below). The -2 stars is for overall experience due to ghastly service from our waiter.  It was THAT BAD.  Perhaps he was having a bad day; maybe his bracket was ruined after Saturday's NCAA games; maybe he is just a not-so-friendly person.  That being said, hoping for one of the first 2 scenarios, I will probably give Tamarine another try in the future because the food was great.
Visting a college roommate who lives in Mountain View. Living in SoCal and within close proximity to Westminster (Little Saigon), I know good vietnamese food when I see it! Sadly, there aren't many options in Los Angeles (LA proper, not SGV I'm referring to). What we enjoyed (3.5 girls and this was plenty of food.  The 0.5 refers to my pregnant friend): hue beef rice noodle rolls: basically spring rolls; overly cooked outer spring roll layer made it rather mushy than my preference of "al dente".  Still, seasoning and dipping sauce were delicious. crab and garlic noodles: my FAVE!! Generous portions of crab, lightly seasoned noodles. panko crusted trout: OMG I wanted to finish the leftovers even the next day, huge fish that you definitely have to share; nuoc cham  dressing complements the mango and basil crusted trout garlic rice: simple yet complements the above. Can't wait to go back next time I'm in NorCal
Tip #1 - make a reservation! But even if you wander in, the wait is worth it. Here's the rundown: -- Appetizer sampler is definitely a winner, those taro rolls paired with the green papaya salad is fantastic -- Clay pot anything! -- The simple garlic noodles are a great accompaniment to any dish -- Fried banana profiterole thingys, need I say more? Consistently good food with occasionally slow service that actually forces you to sit and savor the meal. A+!
Spotted. Dressed in hues of hunger and hopefulness, Foodie J and Trim J make way into Tamarine. But they're not kidding anyone, they don't have a reservation. Will it they be sent packing and left to scavenge for a rebound, or will they score a ticket into the big boys' dining club? Gossip Girl, anyone? I actually haven't watched the show but my +1 for the night told me he feels like we're Serena van der Woodsen and Blair Waldorf on our dinner dates... and I think Gossip Girl does these "Spotted" things, so I figured it a good time as any for me to take a stab at it! But shifting back to Tamarine, my Upper East Side Sunnyvale partner-and-crime and I spontaneously decided that we wanted to go to Downtown Palo Alto for dinner and found ourselves walking down University fifteen minutes later. At 7PM on a Friday night, Tamarine was starting to get lively, so we hoped for the best but expected the worse coming in without a reservation. Luckily there was a couple finishing up at their seats at the communal counter and after a quick wait at the bar, we were seated. Great service from the Vietnamese hostess, but aloof service from the Caucasian hostess which came with free sides of judgment and annoyance. Our (Vietnamese) server, Nga wasn't any better. Pretty derogatory. "Khong coi minh ra nhu gi" is a perfect Vietnamese phrase that translates to "she didn't see us as anything." She was sweeter to the (middle-aged Caucasian) people sitting next to us though, and that's why she probably received a larger tip from them and standard 15% from us. Reinforcing her assumption of us not being worthy customers? Perhaps, but that's all on her; her own sabatoge. Between the two of us gossip girls, we ordered: lamb pot stickers, the hoisin lamb chops, the beef shortrib rendang, garlic fried rice, and brown rice. Lamb Pot Stickers: The pot sticker wrapping was kind of thick and hard, but the ground lamb inside was good. I didn't like how hard it was at first but the strong taste made up for it. The ginger garnish was sliced so exquisitely thin and it along with the light citrusy and sweet glaze, made this small plate quite delightful. Hoisin Lamb Chops: BUCKET LIST MATERIAL. These things were delicious! Each lamb chop was thoroughly marinated and cooked perfectly. My aunt actually makes this amazing marinade sauce that tastes very similar but I've only ever used it on spareribs so it was a nice change to have lamb in this flavor I love to pieces. Prices on their website menu aren't updated; this dish was $34. Beef Shortrib Rendang: I was very disappointed in the presentation of this dish, and equally saddened over the taste. I chose this over the other dishes because I rarely cook with coconut milk, but ended up finding this dish to be too much. The portion was generous and the shortrib was so tender that it tore when you tried to cut it, but the sauce was so heavy and overbearing. Jasmine rice would have been a better side to it than the brown rice. And a soup and some greens to wash it down. So Vietnamese of me to need some canh (broth/soup) to wash it down! :) Garlic Fried Rice: Large portion and very good! It wasn't oily but had a strong garlic taste. Worth the amount, I'd say. Some of my earliest and fondest restaurant memories are of weekly dinners at Vung Tau in Downtown San Jose with my parents. I don't think Tamarine is a good place to take them (they didn't like Three Seasons or Xanh), but I like it and would come back for this familiar but slightly altered cuisine. The ambiance is actually a lot more casual and relaxed than I thought it would be. I'd welcome a chance to dine at one of the booths next time and hope for an even more cozy feel.
Four words: Overpriced mediocre Vietnamese Food. We went there per a coworker's recommendation. I should probably not have taken his words seriously. :) The ambience was quite nice. The service was fine as well. However, the food was definitely overpriced, given the quality wasn't the nicest among all the Vietnamese places I've ever been to in the bay area. They certainly focused more on the presentation than the taste of the food. I was least impressed with the quality of the food. Your money is certainly worth being spent somewhere else if you want better quality Vietnamese food, provided there're abundant good Vietnamese restaurant options in the bay area.
Greeted at door with, "We are not serving dinner yet!"  Maybe because we were in work clothes from Stanford?  Had Happy hour here after work and had appetizers and a drink-WAY too expensive for what you get.  Bartenders were not friendly or attentive.  Had Tuna tar tar with 4 chips not enough to scoop tuna....taro rolls meh! and spring rolls OK, but not worth the price, and happy hour drinks starting at $12-......nan, not worth it.
Well prepared food with good ingredients.  Good service.
Superb. I came here for my birthday dinner a few years ago and chose Tamarine to have a large family dinner recently. Stand out items : the green calamari dipping sauce, the Clay Pot Cod, the Beef Shortribs in Rendang sauce (with coconut rice), Shaking Beef, Chili Lime Aubergine, and the Crab Garlic Noodles, Kobe beef pho broth. It's best to eat family style so you can not only try many dishes, but also sample the different rice offerings they have. We got to try almost all the various rice options including the Empress rice which is like Chinese sticky rice. My favorite has to be the coconut rice. The presentation of the rice is also pleasing. Their drinks are pretty delicious and mighty. I went with the Ginger Trois and I had to nurse it throughout my entire meal as to not get too drunk too quickly. Also they were very accommodating and gave us free corkage for our half-bottle of dessert wine! I love Tamarine because the cuisine is familiar enough for my Asian family yet different enough that it's like a whole culinary experience for everyone! Plus eating family style allows us to try so many different things. And it's surprisingly affordable. Highly recommended.
Food is OK, even good. Attitude can be a killer. Service is not on par with the level of the food (and the prices). Friday night, we had reservations, were seated immediately. After asking our waiter for his opinion on some of the dishes it was clear that he was there to make sure we ordered the pricier options, not those that would better fit our palate. The food was good, not great. We had the spring rolls (too dry & sauce was uninspiring. Would've loved more peanuts!) and the mussel crepes which were recommended by some reviewers (only meh, a bit oily). We then had the sea bass (really good!) and the tempura rolls, which really should be half the size and served as an appetizer as it gets boring after eating two portions. We skipped desert as nothing looked tempting enough. As to service, we had to eyebrow-raising incidents: 1. When clearing the appetizer plates the waiter removed my partner's used chopsticks from his plate and left them on the tablecloth. Huh? He did take mine, which makes it even more questionable. 2. We asked for a bit more sauce for one of the dishes and it took two tries and more than a few minutes until they brought the right one (the one that came with the dish).
We showed up 15 minutes late to our reservation at 6:30pm, but they were totally okay with it. I had forgotten we were in a Vietnamese (fusion) restaurant because literally, I was the only asian - the staff were all caucasian. Pretty contemporary restaurant, right next to the parking garage on Cowper. They have this pretty cool curtain that blocks the entrance when it's rainy - smart design! We were seated near the end of the restaurant, at the (only) table with a sofa on one side and two chairs on the other - a bit large for 4 people, but appreciated! Note, I've been to very few legit Vietnamese restaurants, with the exception of convenient Pho places, so I can't compare to other places. We started off with a Tamarine Taste platter, which is essentially 3 different kinds of spring rolls and a small salad in the middle. Sadly, I can get the exact same thing at the Pho place down the road from my house - not worth it. However, the Smoked Paprika Prawns were surprisingly good (wouldn't get it again, but the rest of the table would differ). Our last starter was recommended by our waitress, Lamb Pot Stickers - again, not so good, skip it. The rest of the meal was enjoyable and I loved everything, with the exception of the shaking beef - nothing special at all, maybe it was a miss, skip it. The clay pot cod has this absolutely incredible sauce that I LOVE and it was my favorite of the night. There was some plain spinach from another dish and I drowned it in the cod sauce before eating it. We also tried the basil tofu (liked the crispy basil more than the tofu) and on the side, we paired everything with empress rice (enough for two people). Since we didn't have enough rice, we ordered a generic coconut rice, but thought only the empress was good!. The portion was larger too. Typically, I dislike lamb chops because I can't stand the aftertaste of lamb, but the Hoisin Lamb Chops were different and it's one of the few times I'm able to enjoy lamb without cringing over the aftertaste and smell. Didn't try dessert, had it elsewhere down the street. Overall, it's not AMAZING, but I was impressed, and will definitely be back. Service is a bit slow, but our waitress was very enthusiastic and our table liked that! ---- Now for photos!! Tamarine Taste: http://www.yelp.com/biz_... Smoked Paprika Prawns: http://www.yelp.com/biz_... Lamb Postickers: http://www.yelp.com/biz_... Clay Pot Cod: http://www.yelp.com/biz_... Empress Rice: http://www.yelp.com/biz_... Hoisin Lamb Chops: http://www.yelp.com/biz_... Basil Tofu: http://www.yelp.com/biz_... Shaking Beef: http://www.yelp.com/biz_...
My 1st time at this restaurant for group holiday dinner,  I showed up at reservation time and check in with the hostess.  It must be a busy night, even though only 6 PM, the restaurant quite empty, I was greeted with very cold and rude attitude,  she indicated that I should wait for the rest of my group to show up.  No place to sit, the bar is small and full.  Unfortunately, I stood right in front of the host stand  for 10 min until my 2nd coworkers show  up, she still refused to sitting us.  During this time other parties showed up with only 1 or 2 people, but they was seated immediately.  I could not figure out why it happened to my group,  just being single out. Overall the food is above average, the service was excellent, but my first experience was spoiled by the hostess, unfortunately. If you are in a big group, be aware that the hostess services may not be consistent,  show up late could be a solution. Not coming back!!! Meh. I've experienced better.
A PA staple. good for all occasions. the word is out but this place continues to be excellent
Pricey $120+ for 3 people for dinner. If you like Vietnamese food better to go to San Jose near King/Story/Tully areas for authentic food. Flavors are more authentic with better portion sizes for price. You can learn more about the Vietnamese culture if you go South, lots of things you don't see like Rau Ram in chicken soup, etc... Tuna Tartare: served in spoon, about 3 TBSP served with chips. Shrimp Spring Rolls: vietnamese spring rolls with shrimp, lettuce, bean sprouts, mint served with peanut butter/hoisin sauce. Standard Spring Roll. Pricey at 8$ for 2 rolls. Salt and Pepper Calamari: not Vietnamese. Fried, very good execution. Only served squid body. Shaking Beef: 6 pieces Filet Mignon served with salad Coconut Rice; dry, steamed rice with coconut flakes. Seems like Americanized Vietnamese food. Still good place.
Great spot with delicious food.  Definitely order the green papaya salad and the clay pot cod (although the dish hasn't been consistent for me).  Their brown rice is also particularly delicious.  The down side is that it's pretty noisy and the tables are very close together...makes it difficult to have a private conversation.
This place sells themselves as better than they are.  Our ($12) cocktails were artificially perfume-y.  The hostess told us (unsolicited) that we were being seated in a "very nice" section, only for us (table for 2) to be surrounded by tables of squirmy, noisy kids and their families. (Note: if they try to seat you in the rear, refute unless you have children with you!) The food was ok, but not at all exceptional or worth the price point. Best dish: lemongrass sea bass.  Prawns tasted dirty in Tamarind Prawn dish. The service has not evolved to meet the price point.  When I asked about choosing between two whites by the glass, the server could only tell me that one was "very nice" more than four times.  This joint not at all worth it!  When we told hostess of our disappointment at being seated amongst screaming children, she scolded us for not asking to move tables! They are representing themselves as something that they are not.
Tamarine is without doubt the most excellent dinner date spot I've come across in Palo Alto. A special occasion date, given the price, but the best nonetheless. I came to treat my boytoy to an extra special birthday dinner, and Tamarine certainly delivered. We dressed up, which I'm glad we did, given the interior and the clientele looked as classy as you'd expect for a hot spot for local financiers and housewives of Palo Alto. We arrived a little before our 8:30 reservation, and the place was packed. We immediately got the attention of one of the hosts, and she led us soon after to our table where we discovered a little birthday note and box of cookies for the birthday boy. The food and cocktails were beyond compare. The starters of shrimp cupcakes were so unique and delicious with their spicy sauce I would come back just for those. We also ordered the sea bass and empress rice, both of which were absolutely delicious. The empress rice was slightly salty, but for once I thought that added to the singularly savory taste. The sea bass was perfectly cooked and so light and perfect. For dessert we ordered butterscotch pot de creme which arrived with candle and syrup spelling 'Happy Birthday' around the plate, a thoughtful gesture. The bill came out to 80 for the starter, rice, entree, dessert, and two drinks. Overall, not bad for a special dinner and the service was beyond reproach, so this place is more than worthy of a 5 star rating.
Food was ok, a step above PF Changs, but the price was quite high and the service quite low.  The time that passed between each dish we ordered was more than 10 -15 minutes, which is a snail pace for us and I lost interest after a while.  I wanted to cancel some of our last dishes because it was taking so long. Basically I will not be going back, but the ambiance was nice.
This place is one the best Vietnamese restaurant around Bay Area as I know so far. I love their shaking beef, this is the same owner with Vung Tau but I still think this 1 is a bit better. I also like their garlic rice, it was awsome. Overall, nice atmosphere, reasonable price with ok service, the only thing i didn't enjoy was those hostess, mean look and did not say goodbye when i left
Trendy, chic, good ambiance, over spilling of venture capitalists talking about the next Facebook potential, investment bankers and lawyers elbow to elbow discussing deals -- not your typical vietnamese restaurant descriptors but despite its 'non-authentic' elements, Tamarine actually consistently exceeds my expectation for a University Ave restaurant.  Let me be clear - my favorite non-pho Vietnamese restaurant is still Vung Thau and the food there is still  better than Tamarine's and roughly 60% of the price.  As I have also learned that Tamarine is actually owned by Vung Thau, which explains the consistently great food. I have been to Tamarine a number of times - large and small group, corporate and individual events, lunch and dinner - so I feel like I have sampled many of their menu items. Food:  Overall - 3-4.5 stars (more on this later) Service: Overall - 3 stars - it amazes me no matter what time of the day or how crowded overall the restaurant is, the service is really really slow Value: Overall - 3 stars, where Value = Total Experience/Total Price.  If you want just the good food and none of the descriptors above and willing to drive to San Jose, Vung Thau is a better choice. Food: Tamarine Appetizer Sampler (3 stars) - consists of grill meal rolls (a bit too salty), fresh rolls with prawns and pork (very average), spring rolls (filling a bit too salty) and papaya salad with beef (excellent, tangy and spicy, yum) Shaking beef (4 stars) -- it is filet mignon, how can it not be good right? I still think the version at Slanted Door is better Tamarine Prawns (3 stars) -- the taste itself is actually 5 stars but you only get 5 prawns and for $20+ for this dish, it really is poor value -- I know prawns are expensive but still, it is a bit much.  The prawns are succulent and I love that they put them on this bed of crunchy noodles, yums. Lamb chops (5 stars) - I do not like lamb chops and the version here is really is that great.  They miranate them in hoisin sauce first I think before grilling them - and it doesn't have a lamb smell - just tender, succulent and delicious. Claypot cod (5 stars) - absolutely fabulous - meat of the fish is very tender and flaky, the caramalized flavors are usual and has a lot of depth and texture Beef noodle soup (3 stars) - ok and not very memorable.  Probably not worth the $9 to get it here since you can get something similar at a pho restaurant for half the price Fried Banana/ice cream (3 stars) - it is fried food but generally not distinguished Brown rice (4 stars) - I know this is not something people will point out normally but I find their brown rice to be very exceptional. Overall, I do recommend Tamarine because considering all the other University Ave restaurants of the same caliber charging similar prices, the food here actually taste pretty good. In summary, here's when Tamarine is appropriate: when you are on a date or trying to impress your venture capitalist/investment banker/lawyer friend or on some company-sponser dinner And when you just want high quality Vietnamese food, drive a little further south and get some Vung Thau!
Appetizer good. Spring and egg rolls are just okay. Beef wrapped in leaf was yumm! Cold cantaloupe soup tasty and refreshing. The spicy oil on top gives it a nice kick of flavor. Shaking beef was so tender. The pieces were large and marinated so well. Tasted so good!! Lemongrass sea bass was so delish! The crust from the spices were made the fish so tasty. The sea bass itself was melt in your mouth good! the vermicelli salad was good too. Had lots of cilantro and mango on top to make it fresh tasting. Garlic noodles were good. I like the pieces of garlic i had throughout the dish. The noodles felt kind of overcooked though. For drinks, the peach sangria just tasted like peach sangria. The peach was sweet but not overpowering. The asian pear martini was good. It also wasnt too sweet. I love the watermelon lemonade! The watermelon was sweet while the lemonade made it a bit tangy. The blended watermelon juice and the pieces of lemon pulp was a nice addition to freshness. The mango limeade was good but a bit too tangy for me. It was a bit thicker in consistency than the lemonade. If you like more sour and tang, this is the drink for you! For dessert toffee bread pudding was amazing! The toffee was good and not overly sweet. The vanilla bean icecream with the hot bread pudding is always a great combination. Joshua, a manager, was very sweet. He greeted and sat us. He even helped us with our menu selection. Great choices, josh! Thank you. I can't wait to come back!!!
Hm, I don't know if I can recommend this place It's really expensive for something that isn't worth the price. I had their Watermelon Lemonade which was good, The Banh Mi Roti was probably the only dish that was good and worth it (it was $3) I brought my cousin here and we had the "Power Lunch" and had a total of 4 entrees which were on the small side. I can't justify coming here again unless I was trying to impress a date and spend a load of $. Sorry Tamarine!
I was last here more than a few years ago and the fond memory of the dinner never went away.  I recall I had a duck entree of some sort (nonexistent now) and delicious vegetables. Came back with a lovely gentleman recently and had a memorable meal.  Made an Open Table reservation for 5:30, found parking close by, and were seated right away on time. We ordered the Taro Root Rolls, Garlic and Crab noodles, Shaking Beef, Tofu and Basil side, brown rice and coconut rice.  Plenty of food for 2 people. -Taro Root Rolls weren't anything special and I had thought there would be more taro in them... -Garlic and crab noodles were good, but I was a little annoyed that I had to stir them to mix the crab from the bottom.  I'm all for DIY food, but why didn't the restaurant mix it up before serving?  Slightly odd.  The waiter came by and even mentioned it a bit after-the-fact.  Was I supposed to know it wasn't mixed together already? -Shaking beef was really tender and flavorful.  Accompanied really well with the rice combo we ordered.  I love meat. -Tofu and basil side was probably my favorite.  I could eat that side dish with plain white rice and be supremely satisfied.  Seems easy to make at home. I had an Asian Pear cocktail that was delicious and light.  The gentleman had a smooth Manhattan. On the post-meal side, looking at the rather extensive yet non-fusion dessert menu, we decided to both try the Yamazaki Coffee.  TERRIBLE CHOICE.  SO BITTER.  And oddly presented... with a dollop of whipped cream just plopped in the glass.  It looked like cooking fat.  Very unappetizing.  So much so that I returned it.  A test of good service is that it didn't appear on the bill afterwards (which should always happen when something is returned). All in all, a satisfying win.  I'm glad that Tamarine has upheld its high standards for delicious cuisine and good service through all these years.
This place was surprisingly really good. Its more of an upscale Vietnamese fusion place. It may be a little pricey if you just want to go out and grab a quick dinner. I love downtown Palo Atlo in general... you can dine then take a little stroll down the avenues. We ordered: Papaya Salad - I always order this wherever I go (if they have it) I'm not much of a vegetable person, but this is one of the veggie dish that I can actually eat and enjoy! Tuna Tar Tar - I do not eat raw dishes, but according to my date, he gave it a thumb up... Clay Pot Cod - this is one of Vietnamese famous dish. I give it a five star! I recommend this dish to anyone, but if you are not a fish sauce kind of person, this might not be the dish for you.. but even so, I think you would love this dish even if you're not much of a fish sauce person. Shaking Beef- ahhh... shaking beef.. my favorite dish of all time.. MUST TRY!
The shaking beef was delicious and the clay pot cod had lots of flavor. The clay pot has alaskan cod and the fish oil goes well with the jasmine rice. The oil gives extra flavor and makes the rice taste less bland. The jasmine rice came in bamboo leaves, retaining the moisture in the rice. The shaking beef is very tender and juicy, perfect bite size pieces. TL;DR; Get the shaking beef and clay pot cod.
Shaking beef was gr8.
Sometimes I really wish I could give 1/2 stars on Yelp.  The true rating of this place or me is 4.5. Why the extra half? The food here was delicious! 1. Shaking beef- full of flavor, meat is extremely tender and not over done 2. Lemon Grass Sea Bass- delicious fish, great flavor. crisy on the sides 3. Green Papaya Salad- fresh papaya with a great tangy sauce...topped with really good stringy beef jerky 4. Prawns: ginormous, juicy, and tender shrimp with garlic sauce 5. Clay Pot Cod- full of flavor, comes steaming hot! But SO SMALL of a dish. =( 6. Empress Rice- enriched rice with egg running through it all There tarmarine mojito was pretty bomb too. Almost felt like a smoothie! Now..why didn't I give them a 5 if the food is soo good? Well...our waitress apparently didn't hear that we ordered their Basil Tofu, and by the time she realized it...we were stuffed. So I was bummed about that. I was looking forward to my tofu. Hence, I'll have to come back and try some more delicious dishes!
OBSESSED with this place. Fancy-Shmancy Vietnamese food -- I didn't know existed until I came here. The shaking beef is awesome. I mean seriously everything I've had here I liked. The cocktails are delishhhh & the red wine glasses are so pretty (you eat/drink with your eyes too). Definitely make a reservation before coming. Every time I come the place has been packed (F&SAT nights). Love.Love.Love. & don't leave without trying the shaking beef, seriously.
If you're looking for a place to hold a business dinner...bump this rating up by a star or two.  (If you're on the company dime, anyway.) The service is quite good.  The presentation is attractive and the chef has always been willing to modify things for those pesky vegetarians.  (I am one of them!)  The food is tasty and from an ambiance perspective it's close to a rather fine-dining experience.  Not Gary Danko, Fifth Floor kind of fine dining, but pretty darn good.  It's fairly quiet.  The drinks are well done. If you're looking for a nice dinner out with a good friend or date, I'd steer clear.  Particularly if your dinner mate happens to be a foodie...even an amateur one.  As I said, the food is tasty.  It's also RIDICULOUSLY over-priced for what it is and any foodie will spot this fact immediately. I'd love to give Tamarine more stars and I've eaten here a number of times, but because of the pricing - I just can't.  It's not good 'bang for your buck'.
Wonderful, attentive service. Great selection of wine. And while there are plenty of protein dishes to be had, Tamarine happens to be a great restaurant option for vegetarians. Go here just to eat their Shaking Beef and Empress Rice!!
Overpriced? Yes. Pretentious? Yes. Will you be hit on at the bar? Yes. Well, probably. More than likely. Am I addicted to their Shaking Beef? Yes, but I admit my addiction. Worth it? Occasionally.
Went here last night for a "combo" birthday dinner with another couple, which is always cool cuz then you get to sample more food!   I agree with Connie - I need a "half star button". We ordered the Shrimp Summer rolls, and although there were 4 of us, the other woman can't eat shrimp, poor thing, but this could have turned out to be a GOOD thing for me because she wanted to try the Salt & Pepper Calamari, which I probably wouldn't have ordered and it was fantastic.  It' served with a Cilantro Sauce that's a pretty pea green color and tastes nothing like cilantro but yet compliments the calamari.   If I had to guess I'd say some chef used rice flour to coat the calamari, but it was SO tender and light as a feather without the detraction of heavy breading -- trust me, if you like calamari, you need to order this. For our main course, it was Shaking Beef, Hoisin Lamb Chops (big ooh, ahhh from tablemates when that was presented) and the Sea Bass.   The bass was like buttah!  Not easy to cook a piece of fish that thick so perfectly.   When asked about this, our server, Brandon, who was AWESOME was completely knowledgeable about how it was marinated (and in what) the day before, how it was cooked, etc.  Obviously the kitchen and the staff are working in unison.  Very impressive. As for the staff in general - the hostess sat us promptly - none of this, "you have a 7:30P reservation, go sit at the bar until 8PM when we call you"; although the restaurant was packed, everything "flowed" - no "we're in the weeds" or any indication that they weren't professional who could handle a busy Saturday night. Even tho we were stuffed, my tablemates looked at the dessert menu.  I averted my eyes as self protection.  When I heard "Sticky Toffee Pudding" I knew they were in trouble because all 3 of them LOVE that.  So, one order, 3 spoons and they said it was great. The other great thing is that this restaurant was my pick, and is there anything worse than recommending something only to have friends say "WHY did you tell us to go THERE?"  Both of them loved the food and complimented me several times on my choice, so a good time was had by all!
Seriously?  I've never written a review for Tamarine...that is just, wrong.  I've been here for lunch countless times, dinners at least 10x and Happy Hour is a MUST. This is one of my very favorite places on the Peninsula.  **Disclaimer: I'm a vegetarian, so if you're looking for meat reviews, sorry folks. I just returned from a trip to Vietnam and the cuisine here at Tamarine has much less French Colonial influence than a traditional Vietnamese restaurant in Hanoi or Ho Chi Minh City.  Its cuisine has been given a cool, Californian modern vibe and cast that adds to the subtlety of flavor and gives the presentation a serious whomp, in a good way. Since everyone talks about the ambiance and the main entrees, I'll devote myself first, to the wine.  My friend John, is the Bar manager here and he knows his wine.  He is an oenophile.  It shows.  The red selection is wide-ranging and eclectic, with enough standards for those who need that CA robust cabernet sauvignon with their meal no matter what. Their cocktail list is also substantial and everyone is a winner for me except the lychee-flavored items.  not a fan.  Personal preference, not a skills thing.  The bartenders are warm, welcoming, professional and don't steer you wrong.  The Kaffir Cocktail is a killer. Favorite dishes: -Pani Puri: Semolina puffs filled with chick peas, potato, tamarind & coconut chutney; finished with green lentils. -Taro Root Rolls: Crisp roll of taro root, onion, Wood Ear mushrooms & carrots; served with a chili-plum sauce. - Green Papaya Salad: Shredded green papaya tossed with basil & served with dried shredded beef. -- No beef please! - Wok Fired Garlic Noodles: Egg noodles wok fired with garlic, butter, Parmesan cheese & black pepper; served with fresh cilantro & lime. - Chili-Lemongrass Mi Can: Seitan sauteed with king oyster mushrooms, young jack fruit, lemongrass, Thai chili & madras curry. Get the Empress rice or the Jasmine rice.  Delish. Decor and ambiance.  Cool, elegant, modern, spare, contemporary.  Makes you feel cooler to just be there.  The music is great and matches with the ambiance.  Service is outstanding at both lunch and dinner.  Happy Hours are popular and the bar area is small.  The back bar is gorgeous however, a great place to have a glass of wine.  In fact, I'm headed there tonight.  Nice way to end a Thursday.  :)
Still a fan.  Clay Pot Cod was amazing.  Service is still spectacular, and the wine list is great.
We had our holiday office lunch at Tamarine and without looking at the prices... I found everything... Read more 
Yum! 8 pm on a Wednesday night and still packed with people... Fancy fusion Vietnamese food is usually a hit or miss but this place was definitely a hit. We ordered: Papaya salad (done very well with slivers of beef) Shaking Beef (my favorite dish because of the perfect tenderness of the meat) Seabass (also prepared extremely well - not overcooked at all and served with glass noodles) Sauteed Spinach with raisins (I do not like raisins but oddly this mix worked very well for me) Empress Rice - sticky glutinous rice, soy sauce, and sunny side up egg (3 of the best things in the world...so tasty!) Can't wait to go back...
Delcious asian food.  We had sushi, miso soup, stir-fry, and some sides - so not sure what to call it exactly.  But it's delicious. It gets extremely busy so I recommend a reservation.  We made the mistake of thinking we could just show up at 6pm on a Tuesday only to be told that the first available table for 2 was at 8:45pm.  Fail :) So we came back on a different night (with a reservation) and were thrilled.  Everything was declious. A gem!
The ambiance of this place is very upscale chic. I love it! I started out dinner with the Taro Rolls, which for those of you who are familiar with Vietnamese food. It's just egg rolls, and let me tell you these were awesome!! Very crispy and of course what's Vietnamese egg rolls without the famous dipping sauce! My entree was the Tamarine Prawns. The prawns were huge and the tamarind sauce was very good, reminds me of my mom's cooking, minus all the fancy garnishments. =) I well say this about the Tamarine Prawns, since the sauce is tamarind base it does have a tangy-sourness to it and the spice adds a kick to it. So for those of you who likes saltier dishes, this may not be for you. But if you don't mind something more adventurous than do try this! My dining companion had the Panko Crusted Pork Cutlet and it was o-m-g amazing! Especially with the caramelized apples!! We also ordered sauteed water spinach, because we can't forget about our vegetables! It was yummy as well. The jasmine rice was very moist and came wrapped in a banana leaf! Finished dinner off with the Banana Beignets. Ahhhhhh!! To die for!! Ugh! I'm so craving it now that I am writing about this. I'm from Southern CA so this is torture of the worst kind! If you're in the Palo Alto area please don't miss out on this neighborhood gem!!
My bf and I were in the area so we decided to stop for dinner before heading back home.  At about 8 PM, the place was packed.  We didn't have reservations, but the hostess suggested she could seat us right away at the big, long tables in front of the bar.  No wait...sweet.  The waiter was really nice and he suggested the guava and mango lemonades which were both okay.  Since Vietnamese food is usually tangy, the lemonades didn't pair too well since it just made everything even tangier.    After browsing the menu, we decided to go with the following: -pork lettuce cups (wouldn't order again - dry, lacked flavor and was super spicy) -green papaya salad with shredded beef (super duper tasty) -kobe beef pho (hella good) -lemon grass seabass with mango noodles (light, nothing special) Meh...overpriced food that was just okay.
I ordered some food to go and they said it would be ready in "10 minutes". I showed up at the restaurant about 15 minutes later and not only did they make me pay and wait for my food at the bar (wth???), I also had to wait at least 10 minutes for my food. Wait... didn't they tell me it would be *ready* in 10 minutes? I don't mind waiting, but don't give me an unrealistic time frame. The food was delicious, so I will be back to try it again. This time I will try actually sitting down at the restaurant... maybe the experience will be better.
My husband and I had dinner here for our anniversary.  I had heard so many good things about this restaurant, so we just had to try it out! On a Monday night, the earliest reservation available for a party of 2 was 8:00 pm... yes, this place is packed, even on weeknights - so be sure to make a reservation! Here's what we had: - Calamari appetizer: unlike any calamari we've ever had before! They give you the actual "body" rather than just the tentacles. And it's not super-oily. And the breading is nice and thick! - Shaking beef: cooked to perfection - soft and oh-so-flavorful - Empress rice: zomg rice with an egg on top! Awesome! - Lemongrass sea bass: pretty good, but I've had better sea bass elsewhere Service was excellent; decor is nice; ambiance is classy but crowded - there are constantly waiters grazing/bumping your chair if you sit near any of the walkways/aisles. Overall, it was a nice dinner for a special occasion!  While the food was good, I wouldn't say it's "$92 good" -- so I don't plan on returning unless someone else is footing the bill next time :)
Can't say that I was impressed with the food and service. My partner and I had two appetizers and two main dishes, only one can be rated at very good, the rest were OK at most. Service should be improved. When asked the waiter for recommendations, we got no help and the way the table was cleared between courses left much to be desired.
Went here for a dinner date a few weeks ago, and have to say this places has a great atmosphere with good food but is definitely pricey. Things we ordered: Guava lemonade - 5 stars - refreshing and delicious! Calamari - 4.5 stars - big portion size and tasty dipping sauce Claypot cod - 4 stars - delicious but such a tiny portion for a $25 dish Hoisin lamb chops - 3 stars - too much fries/veggies (as filler) and the meat was tiny and overcooked Empress rice - 5 stars - you can't go wrong with mixing a fried egg with flavorful rice
When I think of scrumptious food - I usually don't think basil tofu or clay pot cod, but this modern asian fusion does it PERFECTLY! They have a nice wine list. If you're into a rose type wine, the ALICE wine is a must have.  Not just because that's my name, but you have to hear the waiter spice it up and call it the "A-Li-Che." Great service at a decent price for what you're getting.  Usually, the company also adds to a fine dining experience and this does the trick!
Hmmm... good, but not that impressed honestly. The tuna tartare was good, but left me wanting more chunky tuna rather than almost ground tuna... also felt it could definitely use a bit more citrus. The banh mi roti was too greasy in my opinion and the sauce really quite watered down in flavor in my opinion.. The best was the tamarine prawns -- nicely done, good flavor Shaking beef was pretty good, but didn't really stand out tremendously. Bayleaf and ginger chicken -- average. Basil tofu -- again average. Sweet potato fries -- average. The empress rice I was most disappointed with. Loaded and soaked in grease.. really wasn't very appetizing...
Great food. Probably the best in its class of cuisine in the area. More formal than not - so good for a nice sit-down.
Tamarine consistently is an outstanding restaurant. They are vegetarian & vegan friendly, waiters/waitresses are knowledgeable about such options, & the menu is marked clearly for vegetarians. The food portions are not large & the quality is very , very high. We always enjoy the food there. Basil tofu & the banh mi roti are always good choices. The cashew fried tofu is probably one of the best dishes ever. Roasted brussel sprouts with chestnuts were also very good. The taro dumplings were not bad, but I would not order them again - they were bland. The cauliflower soup was also bland, but had a good buttery tast, but given other good items on the menu, will skip. The coconut tapioca desert was ok. Lychee orange salad was good, but light on the lychee. Taro root rolls were like any spring roll. Grilled hazelnut asparagus was good, but not heavy on hazelnut. The garlic friend rice is double the portion of the coconut rice. Vigin mojito & watermelon lemonade are good.
Tamarine consistently is an outstanding restaurant. They are vegetarian & vegan friendly,... Read more 
The most delicate Vietnamese food ever had - and taste very good. A bit pricey...
I came here for my wife's birthday with a bunch of other friends. This place has a really nice ambiance and ok service. The servers took away the leftovers without even asking if we wanted to doggy bag them, which kinda annoyed me. However, the food is tasty. We ordered a whole bunch of dishes and shared family style. The clay pot cod is really tasty. The calamari for appetizer are big chunks of fried calamari. So good. The crab glass noodle dish is also really good, and they actually give you a decent amount of crab.  Their garlic rice wasn't that good, don't recommend. Shaking beef was ok. I also recommend the Hotachino Japanese beer. Very tasty and have yet to find another restaurant that serves it. All in all a good dining experience. There's also a parking garage in the back, which is convenient. The design is horrible with the ramps making it a pain to go back down floors if you have a big car. Anyone who's parked there before will probably know what I'm talking about.
I would really give this place 3.5 stars- but unfortunately that's unavailable. http://www.yelp.com/user... We went here for a pre-Valentine's Day dinner. We ordered the Clay Pot, Tuna Tartar, something Eggplant, and Crab Garlic noodles. The Clay Pot was very good. The fish was made well to flavor - this was our favorite. The Crab Garlic noodles tasted pretty good, but definitely over priced for what it was. I'm sure I can find it elsewhere for a more reasonable price. There was hardly anything else but the noodles and there was barely any crab in it. The Eggplant was ok - maybe a little bland?  We ordered the Tuna Tartar because of all the reviews here, and I'm not sure if it was just that night, but it was very bland. It was fresh, but no flavor at all.  We did enjoy our drinks - something Lychee and Pear Bellini. I would say the food here was pretty good, but definitely not worth it for the price.  I know you can find good Vietnamese fusion food elsewhere. The server was so so. Not so great for as nice of a restaurant this was. I really don't mind spending money on real good food, but with the pricing here with this kind of food,  I just don't feel it's worth to come back.
Amazing as long as you don't venture away from the sure things. I've been here 3x, have tried several of the dishes, and a few of them completely outshine the rest. I've had: - shaking beef: never met a shaking beef I didn't take a liking to; 4.5 stars - tuna tartare: also hard to go wrong here; 4.5 stars - the cod: absolutely amazing. When I came with work, we got 3 servings of this. 5 stars. - pho: so good, especially when I went hungover. Better, healthier, and somehow cleaner tasting than your average pho; 5 stars - calamari: good but not mind-blowing; 3.5 stars - crab & garlic noodles: eh. not bad but the crab was buried deep under the noodles and it was kinda like a treasure hunt to find any. 3 stars - tea leaf beef: decent but i'd go with the shaking beef if i had to choose; 3 stars - lemongrass sea bass: slightly bland and pales in comparison to the cod; 3.5 stars I'd definitely go back. And order the same deliciousness over and over again.
Had a delicious but fuzzily remembered birthday dinner here a few years ago [no fault of Tamarine's; the memory is fuzzy because of the champagne downed prior to arriving], and brought my mom for dinner another time. Both times I do remember excellent, helpful service, good-sized portions, and inventive takes on some classic dishes. Mom really enjoyed her selections and the restaurant has a nice energy level but isn't so loud that you can't have a conversation. The bar is pretty; the restaurant is elegant. There is convenient parking [although, all of University Ave has convenient parking] behind the restaurant in one of the garages, with a nice little cut-through walkway.
The garlic crab dish was to die for, and then my mom had this vegetarian dish that was also excellent.  They get super busy during the lunch hours on weekdays, so reservations are usually needed.  But they are most definitely worth the wait.  Oh and the bartender is the nicest guy ever, he suggested the dishes that we selected.
One of the top 3 Palo Alto restaurants. Consistently really great food with awesome options. If you are scared of "Asian Fusion" go safe with Shaking Beef but you still will miss out on a ton of great food. Empress Rice is a nice treat with any meal and I don't think I've had a bad serving through my 10+ visits to this place. It's better than the highly acclaimed Slanted Door in SF.
I don't know where to start. An amazing experience to be had at Tamarine. My husband and I came here on a particularly happy Friday to celebrate some good news. Tamarine didn't disappoint. We started with the Tamarine Taste - we wanted the Shrimp Spring Rolls (they're the fresh kind with rice paper and crunchy veggies)... they surprisingly turned out to be our least favorite on the plate! Tea Leaf Beef rolls were full of flavor, the beef was really juicy and the tea leaf wrap was a good compliment to the meat. Taro Root Rolls were a nice crunchy fried addition to the plate and really nicely put together. Papaya Salad was fresh and tasty. The Chilled Melon Soup was ok... but being that I've had the amazing melon gaspacho at Balaboosta's (New York), this tasted like cantaloupe flavored baby food to me. We also tried one of their featured dishes, the Lemongrass Sea Bass. I loved the Bass with the mango and cilantro noodles, the fish was cooked perfectly and the flavors paired really well. Lastly we had the Empress Rice - if I had more room, I would've cleared this plate. Sticky rice with garlic, leeks, ginger and a fried egg on top? Spectacular. They mix the rice table-side, which is a nice touch. Our waiter was really friendly and gave us good food and wine suggestions. I can't wait to go back!
The Shrimp Spring Rolls were bland and the peanut sauce uninspiring.  My Clay Pot Pork was rather tasty; the meat tender, and the portion size was large enough to take a nibble home for Barbie.  The brown rice came wrapped in a banana leaf which proved to make it difficult to manage and the portion size was slightly more than a dollop. It is amusing how service can overcome a multitude of minuses; Kami was polite, prompt, and attentive to our needs.  After reading the reviews and looking at the pictures I was prepared for an enjoyable Vietnamese meal and it proved to be sort of good, not spectacular.  Tamarine is a trendy upscale restaurant apparently interested in the art of food presentation and for the price -- IMHO the value wasn't there.
Lots of love for this place from the reviews. See all the 5 star reviews below for the food quality descriptions of why this place rocks. Let me add some value as best I can to the reviews and explain the knocks against Tamarine 1) Slowest service I have ever experienced for a non tasting menu meal. Every single time. I literally fear going here when I have less than 2 hours to spare since it is SO DARN SLOW service wise. 2) Price. Astronomical for what you get. Yes, what you get is delicious, but it is without question priced too high, especially some of the appetizers (3 pieces of shrimp, the newest app as of June 1 2011, was $12 for example, and I could have had 4 of these as my dinner and not been full --- they add potato filler on the side for a reason). 3) Location. AT the end of University Ave away from everything. Not a big fan of the location. You won't have a bad meal, sure, but at least be aware of the above 3. I am still giving it 4 stars since the food is so good (calamari, sea bass in particular).
Good food but too expensive for what you get, methinks.
I really love the ambiance of this restaurant. It's dimly lit, elegant, and not shouting out fancy but still appears classy and just very comfortable. The servers and waitresses are all very nice as well. My friend and I came when it wasn't too busy and was seated at a really big booth, which was very comfortable. We were both not toooo hungry so we shared a few things: +tuna tartare; super delicious! the wonton chips that came with it were also super yummy. the portion isn't very big though, i definitely wanted more of it! +shaking beef: definitely a highlight. i've always loved this dish at vietnamese fusion restaurants, and this time it didn't disappoint me either. the beef was cooked very tenderly and just melted in ur mouth! +garlic noodles: what seems like a very simple dish was SO yummy! went along very well with our other dishes as well We also got a couple of cocktails. I got one of their flavored mojitos, which was very delicious as well. Definitely would love to come back again to try more of their signature fish and desserts!
Four stars for the food.  Very satisfying --- great tuna tartare, shaking beef and crab noodles.  My 2 co-workers and I did not hold back and ordered multiple appetizers, entrees, dessert, wine/drinks.  Service was a great and decor  --- cool and comfortable. However, ZERO STARS for the host/maitre'd/manager(?).  We were there on a weeknight and there was a typical small crowd at the bar waiting for a table.  As soon as we finished our dessert, the host/maitre'd kept walking over to our table and staring at us with a look of disdain.  (We noticed immediately.)  During the third time he came over, he asked us if we wanted anything else (to which we said no) and told us directly there were people waiting for our table. (It was less than 10 minutes after we had finished our dessert.) Really??!?  Is that appropriate?  My co-workers and I are not jerks, so we were going to leave anyway.  Had he just waited one or two more minutes, we would have gotten up on our own.  Because he did that, we felt like we got kicked out and left with a really bad taste in our mouths.  Really overshadowed the delicious meal we just had. Tamarine Management:  If you are reading this, please note our displeasure and rethink doing that again to your customers.
My wife and I tend to go to Tamarine on special occasions, and it's never disappointed. Depending on where you sit, however, it can be either romantic/intimate or tailored toward large crowds. We've sat in in the room behind the bar as well as the back room, and I highly recommend staying away from the latter if you're on a date and want to be able to hear the other person. Love the roti bread (and especially the sauce it comes with), and we always get the shaking beef too. Really delicious all around. However be prepared to shell out some cash when coming here, it ain't cheap!
This place would be 4.5 stars, I just rounded up. Great environment, pretty attentive servers, relatively attentive waiters/waitresses. Prices are not cheap but you pay the premium for the venue. I have had (not all in one sitting!): - Prawn Brochettes: really good, just very few of them - Short Rib Lettuce Cups: didn't really like this as much, it reminded me of the McRib, where it's like deboned "ribs" in lettuce cups. - Papaya Salad: we didn't realize that this was a GREEN papaya salad until after it arrived. We were expecting something sweet and fruity. The beef on top of it is like chinese beef jerky but the salad itself is just literally shredded green papaya, which is actually pretty flavorless. It comes with a sauce but still wasn't great. - Crab & Garlic Noodles: I liked this a lot, very buttery. The flavor is pretty light and the crab is actually peeled, not watery out of a can. - Tamarine Prawns: I love this, it's tart and very well done flash fried, but it comes in a very small portion. - Halibut en Papillote: I thought this was so-so, the flavor just didn't go together as well. It just tasted like sun-dried tomatoes sitting on fish. - Lemongrass Sea Bass: My ABSOLUTE favorite here. The noodle salad it comes with is so good!! Definitely try it if you like lemongrass. - Shaking Beef: It seems like this is a really popular dish, it is pretty good. It's very flavorful and amazingly tender beef cubes. - Sauteed Spinach: I think it is okay, nothing special. - Empress Rice: this was a bit of a surprise, we only ordered it because my brother LOVES fried rice, but it turned out to be really good! They mix it up right in front of you. -Coconut Rice: comes in a little tea leaf encasing, super good.
Been here several times.  It's quite good, but the price will keep me from going back unless someone else is paying. The crab noodles had some shell in them...but at least it was real crab.  I miss the meatballs with cherry sauce that they had one time-- their menu changes a lot.  The clay pot choices are always solid, and the empress rice is fabulous. They have some good lunch specials, too. I also do not like the whole "communal table" idea (I've been elbowed frequently) and the servers have been a little pushy about drinks.  If you don't want to sit at the public table thing, make sure to make a reservation far in advance.
I would consider the quisine more pan-asian than Vietnamese per say. With that said it was excellent. The shaking beef was absolutely fantastic, as was the Sous Vide duck. The beer selection was excellent (not too extensive, but very well chosen). The portions are on the smaller side
A somewhat fancy Asian place in Downtown Palo Alto. We were able to make reservations at the last minute but if we didn't, we probably would have had to find another place to eat, so make reservations!! Anyway, most of their dishes aren't traditional Asian plates, but more modern and unique. My table got the lamb chops, duck, trout, and appetizer sampler, along with garlic rice and white rice. Everything was just ok. Good, I liked it, but nothing that would make me crave this place often. My favorite were the lamb chops as it was the dish with the most flavor but most of my table liked the trout the most. Apparently the shaken beef and cod clay pot are supposed to be the best dishes so if I ever come back, I will try those. Service was really good, but the atmosphere is a bit stiff. Not for little kids who scream and are loud.
A Palo Alto institution, Tamarine is one of my top pics for exotic yet upscale dining.  The menu is perhaps a little overpriced for what you get, but the preparations are always reliably good.  And hey, you're paying for atmosphere and service.  If you really want straight-up Asian food, head to your corner joint. The chefs know what there doing.  They have a deft hand at seasoning.  Rarely do I ever find a restaurant where dishes consistently come out well-seasoned every time.  Fried items are always non-greasy and light.  Salad-y dishes always dressed just right. Individual favorites in no particular order: - Tamarine Prawns.  Big prawns, split and cooked in shell (yay shrimp shell flavor!) and tossed with a lip-smacking sweet and sour tamarine glaze.  If only they left the heads on! - Salt and Pepper Calamari: always expertly fried and tossed with onions and jalapenos.  Tasty coriander dipping sauce.  Really nice balance of flavors here. - Crab and garlic noodles: a little pricey here, but very good.  The addition of the chinese celery is nice.  Only gripe: put the celery on the bottom (so that it can steam and cook a little) and put the crab on top.  No need to cook that anymore! - Lemongrass seabass: served with a tasty mango noodle salad. - Papaya salad with really tasty dried beef morsels.  Think sophisticated beef jerky. -Shaking Beef: I always request this rare (if usually comes about medium).  Melts in your mouth. Service here is top notch (save a rude older bartender who needs to go ASAP) but the manager Robert is the greatest asset the restaurant has.  Gracious, funny and almost too charming for his own good.  He runs the show! Another tip for the owner: don't pack the restaurant as much!  I don't like waiting 15-30 minutes PAST my reservation time.  Minus one star for this consistent problem. Another problem:  need a better wine list.  Who wants old burgundy, and big cabs with their Vietnamese fusion??  More heavy whites, rieslings (but not super sweet german ones)- more from Austria, more from Alsace!  Minus half a star, but I'll round that up to 4!
Food: Banh Mi Roti - Not the best I've ever had. Banana Leaf's version is much better. But it does the trick. Tofu Spring Rolls - A layer of mushroom on top. Served hot and really tasty Clay Pot Cod - I know this one is a favorite. But I'm not the best fish person. However, for fish in general, it was pretty good. The best part is the tenderness of the fish. Reminds me of the butter fish at Roy's. Ginger Soy Chicken - Really a disappointment. The chicken was dry, the soy was non-existent. Requires lots of chili to support it. Ambiance: Nice and classy. Lots of younger people. This is definitely a date place. I saw a lot of young couples here on their 2nd - 6th date. The guys here were clearly trying to impress their date and hopefully get some action at the end of the night. I've been their brotha...I ain't mad at cha ;) Pricing: I know, I know, it's expensive. But seriously people, you already know this, don't go here if you don't want to spend ~$50 a person. Their are so many restaurants in MTV or Sunnyvale that will have similar quality food. They are pricing for certain kind of clientele, if your not that type of person, then just don't go and stop bitching about their prices. Overall: 4 stars - The food was good, not great. It is expensive but a nice place to take a date or meet with some of your 20 something friends who have no real bills and don't know what a 401k is. Also, if you take a date here...well, good luck. I ain't mad a cha ;)
Service was very slow.  Clay pot cod was way too salty and basil tofu was dry and overcooked.  I'm pretty sure that we won't be returning to Tamarine again.
Good food, nice atmosphere. Worth the money. Customer service was top notch. Will visit again. Me and my family had a great time.
The food and service at this place are both absolutely outstanding. Do yourself a favor and skip the appetizers( those were just ok) and order some entres with their garlic fried rice. The shaken beef was one of the best ones I ever had. To all my Cosmo lovers: order their X-tini, take a sip and drift into a flavor heaven. The only reason I give it 4 stars is the price(entres start around $20) and because they changed the way they prepare their duck(which used to be my favorite dish). Besides that, it's a must for any foodie out there!
Came here with 3 women, one of whom was a vegan.  The meal was wonderful, with many choices for anyone with dietary restrictions.  We ate family style.  I am so glad we did because I otherwise would not have had the lemongrass fish dish and the shaking beef.  Both dishes were seasoned beautifully and cooked to perfection.  The fish was moist and flavorful with the lovely aroma of lemongrass permeating the fish, but without the nasty pieces of tough lemongrass in the dish itself.  I had to restrain myself on the beef dish because the beef was meltingly tender and luscious tasting.  The eggplant dish was also lovely.  The service was very nice and unobtrusive.  Even though we stayed after the table was cleared and leftovers presented in clear boxes and a carry out bag, we were welcome to stay and enjoy our wine and each other's company.  If I get to Palo Alto again, I will return for sure!
Their claypot cod and beef dishes are really good. I would consider this an upscale Vietnamese restaurant with a lot of pretty artwork from Vietnam on display. Nice ambiance and nice place to take business clients for a nice meal.
Appetizers - salt + pepper calamari, Roti Dessert - Lava chocolate cake, Toffee pudding Spiked tea - aroma was strong and interesting, Entrees - seitan,  duck, seabass, tofu, jasmine rice 3 scotches, 1 red wine, spiked after dinner tea, guava lemonade The duck was nasty. The other entrees were ok in terms of asian fusion taste, the dishes were not as experimental as they could have been, which is good. The desserts and after dinner drinks were themselves delicious and deserve 5+ stars. The restaurant atmosphere was nice and the crowd a little more casual than dressy though still on the dressy side. The service however was awful. With an 8:30 p.m. reservation and $50+ per person you'd expect less rushing but rushed we were. The 2/3 eaten entrees were cleared off from the table without our assent as were the 2/3 eaten desserts. In addition when I ordered the after dinner tea, I was repeatedly told that it had alcohol as if I was deaf and had to be told twice. That was irritating. So for this restaurant overall I did not like the experience.
One of my favorite restaurants in the Bay Area.  I LOVE Tamarine. The mango mojito is good.  I had white sangria here also, won't be ordering that again.  Stick with the mojitos. I always love Calamari as an appetizer.  Tamarine's isn't especially amazing but it is good. Really, come here for some of the Entrees that are just amazing. Lemongrass Sea Bass - one of the best basses i've ever eaten. soooo good. Brandy Peppercorn Duck - serving is on the small side, definitely something I'd not get again. Shaking Beef - very good and tender. Lamb Chops- Some of the best lamb chops I've had in my life. And if you are only getting one rice, the Empress rice is the best! But the garlic rice is also great.
I went for a birthday dinner to Tamarine a few weeks ago. Wow! Had a great experience the food was excellent! Great ambiance and the presentation of the food was excellent.
This place gets pretty packed so reservations are a definite yes is you want to be sure that you have a table. This place serves their take on traditional Vietnamese food with a twist. The duck I ordered was cooked perfectly and delicious but came with this curry type sauce that was weird for my palette considering it is Vietnamese food, after all. I enjoyed the sampler plate, my favorite being the eggrolls. I also had trout, which had to have been my favorite, it was delicious. It was definitely Vietnamese, with the fish sauce, has perfectly crisp skin and flaky meat. The eggplant was also good. The service was good and the place was very clean. It was an overall good experience but nothing that has me dying to go back. Maybe I need to try other things on the menu.
Usually when black and blonde are together, all the boys drool and pitch trouser tents. Not so this time!  Justine H. and I came here 20 minutes to 5:00 PM on Wednesday for early drinks and appetizers. The bartender told us to come back when they were open. REJECTED!!! We took our wounded hearts elsewhere for alcohol until Tamarine finally re-opened for dinner. The same bartender told us he would give us a free appetizer to make up for turning us away earlier. Score! We ordered three appetizers and eight Mango Mojitos. Can you tell we like our cocktails? These alcoholic concoctions are God's gift to women. We even made friends with the employees: Oscar, Luis y David. Hola guapos! And then, a horrible thing happened. Justine wanted another Mango Mojito and the bartender wouldn't let her have one. HE CUT OFF HER ALCOHOL SUPPLY AND SHE WASN'T EVEN CRUNK! What a bully! Anyway, I've obviously tried the food here too: -Calamari is a must order! The pieces are thickly cut and accompanied by a cilantro sauce. -Chicken Skewers are average. Good but nothing outstanding. -Delicious Tuna Tartare!!! An anorexic's dream meal! -The Taro Root Rolls are deceiving. I could not taste any taro at all! -Clay Pot Cod tastes like a salt mine. -I was excited to try the Shaking Beef, but my experience was anti-climactic and sodium-rich. The moral of the review is: come here for the ambiance, appetizers and Mango Mojitos. Skip the entrees and make sure to sit far away from the bartenders so they don't know how much you've been drinking. Oh, shit. I just remembered they confiscated one of my unfinished mojitos. WHY?!
We went here today for a team lunch hosted by our senior VP.  6 people total. First off - Tamarine is pricey - 6 people - tab was about $300 with tip (and no alcohol) The ambience is excellent - quiet enough for business purposes and I'm sure it's real cozy in the evening for dinner with someone special.  Loved the decor and table placement - never appeared cramped or crowded and the booths were large and comfortably furnished. I noticed the table settings here were appropriate for the price level - this is definitely leaning towards upscale with heavy cloth napkins (fror lunch, I think that's pretty classy), matching silverware (a pet peeve of mine when they don't match) and a pair of high quality wood chopsticks. We were seated promptly and the waiter was very attentive, getting us drinks and making recommendations from the menu. We decided to eat "family style" so we all got to sample all the dishes (except the shellfish that I couldn't eat due to my allergies) For appetizers, we had the salt and pepper calamari ($11) - it was great though a tad bit more oily than I would have liked - it was not very crunchy and only lightly browned - I actually liked it better this way, stopping short of the deeply fried fare that I've been used to when I order calamari.  The cilantro based dipping sauce was heavenly!  3 stars - it was great but if you like your calamari crisp and well fried, you'll want to stay away from this. Next appetizer - soft shell crab rolls ($11).  I didn't taste it but it was plated beautifully - and seemed very popular with the others. Third appetizer - tuna tartare ($13) - this was awesome.  The tuna was delicious and it had the right amount of ginger and cucumber - with a hint of chilis which gave it a nice kick.  A definite 5 stars. Next up - entrees. First - Tamarine prawns ($24) - again, presented beautifully, on a bed of some kind of noodles and sprouts that everyone ignored.  The prawns were huge and again, appeared extremely popular.  Unfortunately, I couldn't try them. Next - Crisp fish penang curry ($19) - a nice take on a traditional curry - it had crisp fish (duh!!!)  - a fried catfish and eggplant (which I'm not crazy about), and some other veggies.  This is a spicy dish and I enjoyed it but the rest of the table found it to be too spicy - wimps!  I give it 3 stars - it was interesting and the fish was good but I've had better curry elsewhere. Next - two orders of the Shaking Beef ($24) - this looked like some pieces of beef cut up in cubes and stir fried and served on greens.  Boy, was I wrong - should have read the menu.  This was a filet mignon (it really is a filet mignon) that was cubed - it was so delicate - the beef literally melted in your mouth!  I must say I prefer my filet cooked traditionally and rare - but this was such an extraordinary dish that I made an instant exception.  I am leaning towards 5 stars for the Shaking Beef. Then, to keep us healthy, we ordered two vegetable entrees the Basil Tofu ($9) - this was also very tasty - the basil was slightly fried - it appeared to have been tossed in a wok with the tofu - the entire dish was seasoned with garlic and soy sauce.  For those who have read some of my other reviews, you probably know that I give 4 stars to basil if it were served on a plate by itself =).  So, the basil tofu... very good - 4 stars. Final entree was the curried long beans - these were so much better than I had expected.  Crisp beans with red chillies and tossed in a wok with seasonings and curry powder - this was a great selection.  For being a vegetable dish that I found so tasty, I'm going to give it 5 stars since it overcame a sizeable handicap just by virtue of being a vegetable and not meat =) For the table, we had an order of the Empress rice ($6) which comes topped with a runny fried egg and is mixed tableside - amusing.  We also tried an order of the coconut rice ($2.50) which has vanilla and roasted coconut flakes in it.  I tried the Empress rice and it was quite good.  I passed on the coconut rice. We were done but the waiter succeeded in his nefarious attempt to make us spend more money and convinced us to order dessert. For the table, we ordered the profiteroles, a butterscotch concoction and a chocolate tart.  I'm not a huge dessert person - I sampled them all and they were great but I can't say much about the relative merits and strengths of these.  The plates were wiped clean - that must count for 3 stars at least. Now, to sum up, I can't comment on whether or not this is authentic Vietnamese food.  But it was real good food, served in a good ambience and attentive waitstaff.  And it was great company (with a special interesting someone =) which made for a fun and memorable occassion. Overall rating, 4 stars.  I would easily go back there again, especially for a nice quiet evening with someone special for dinner and some fine wine. #23
After attending a tacky estate party down south, Connie, Kristina, Andy and I threw in the towel decided to reward ourselves with a nice dinner. Tamarine, an upscale Vietnamese joint on the Palo Alto strip, was a welcome choice on a street that seems to be dominated by Italian fare. We walked in without rezzies and I immediately noticed the hipness factor and the fact that the place was packed. Just when we started to worry, we were whisked to the communal table (brilliant!). Next thing I knew our curries, shaking beef, crab vermicelli and papaya salad had arrived and we were digging in with wild abandon. Connie reminded me that the last time we were in Palo Alto we ate at Taco Bell. Well, Tamarine was no Taco Bell, but it certainly hit the spot. Maybe even an excuse to go south of the border?
Tamarine is a thoughtfully designed and beautifully executed restaurant, from the flavorful food to the gorgeous decor.  I bookmarked this restaurant to try a long time ago, and was excited to go here with my husband for a special dinner out. When I made a reservation and I asked if they use MSG - they said they don't, just as I suspected of a fine restaurant like Tamarine. We totally splurged and had a really delicious and decadent meal: * Tamarine Taste - A sampler for two with Taro Root Rolls, Tea Leaf Beef, Fresh Spring Rolls (we opted for veg w/o shrimp) & Papaya Salad * Ternion of Mushroom Soup - Shiitake, Enoki & Oyster mushrooms in a chicken stock infused w/ chili, lemongrass & Kaffir limes leaves. * Clay Pot Cod - Alaskan Black Cod caramelized in onion, garlic, black pepper & molasses. * Shaking Beef - Cubed beef tenderloin sauteed with soy, garlic & onions; served with a watercress salad. * Empress Rice - Sticky rice, garlic, leeks, ginger & egg; served with a sweeted soy drizzle. * Coconut Rice - Steamed long grain rice, vanilla & roasted coconut flakes. * Chocolate Lava Cake with raspberry coulis, vanilla gelato, and a glass of the wine the sommelier selected that pairs with this dessert. The service was attentive and helpful.  The waiter suggested the Empress Rice, which was one of our favorite dishes.  Other standouts included the soup, taro root rolls, shaking beef, and chocolate lava cake (which had the best, freshest raspberry coulis I've encountered). Our taste buds were singing.  It was expensive, but we felt, totally worth it. The only discordant note in this 5 star dining experience was the music.  It was obtrusive, somewhat jarring, and didn't seem to go with the vibe I was feeling that night.  Maybe if I'd been drinking at the bar, I'd like the loud up-tempo music, but it wasn't working for me for a cozy romantic dinner. I have to admit, my husband was dancing in his seat and playing air drums with his chopsticks.  At first I thought it was a "happy food" dance, but it may have been because of the strident jazzy music. At the risk of sounding like an old fogey, could you turn down that damn music?
Service was slow. Clay pot cod was too salty. Basil tofu was over cooked. Very disappointing.
The finest Asian restaurant overall for decor, food, service and ambiance that I have experienced.  Pretty tall statement from this foodie veteran, but Tamarine simply "blew me away". Went is for early dinner at 5:30pm. Was graciously greeted and seated in the far back room.  We were the first ones there (of 8 tables), and we had it to ourselves for about a half an hour.  Then it filled up to capacity. The restaurant elegant in decor.  Felt like I was in a French Indochina restaurant from the old flicks, but modernized for up to date.  Great paintings of Vietnamese scenes throughout and other very appropriate decor. Simply a very "feel good" place. Our server was great.  Offered a complete overview of the menu, and volunteered to match the wines with our choices. Service was outstanding throughout the entire meal. We decided to get as many different tastes and dishes as we could.  So we started with the Tamarine Tray which has 4 of their appetizers.  Our waiter ended up recommending a Chennin Blanc and Sancerre depending on for what dish.  We took him up on his offer to bring a half glass of each which was just perfect for our food. We continued with the crab/noodle dish, the scallops/squash in curry dish and hainan rice (ginger plus a mix). The appetizers came first.  Scrumptious.  Each morsel provided an explosion of spices and taste very unique.  The regular spring rolls with peanut sauce were very fresh and tasty, the spicy meat wrapped in seaweed was out of this world, the vegetable rolls with dipping sauce were fried just right, and finally we had the shaved papaya with beef strips on top.  Simply stunning assortment of food and tastes. What more can I say. Main courses of the crab and noodles was to die for. I could have ordered and ate another one by myself, but did restrain myself. The scallops/squash in the light curry broth went great when put over the hainan rice. Other entrees on the extensive menu that caught my eye: Shrimp Spring Rolls Banh Mi Roti Wok Pho Noodles Salt and Pepper Calamari Hoisin Ribs Shrimp and Corn Fritters Honey Roasted Quail Lemongrass Beef Skewers Ginger Chicken Salad Ha Long Bay Soup Lemongrass Bass Rice Wine Salmon Citrus Brined Pork Chops Hoisin Lamb Chops Bun Cha Shaking Beef Oh, yes, dessert time.  Unbelievable.  We both had the banana chocolate mouse cake!  Yes.  It is real, and it is one of the most delectable morsels of dessert ever to pass by my way. Overall experience was just wonderful.  Cannot remember a place or time where I had as good as food and thoroughly enjoyed the entire experience. Price:  about $45/person; not including wine.  Shared appretizers and 2 main dishes. Not unreasobable IMHO given the food quality and tastiness. My highest recommendation, for sure!  Absolutely, positively the place to go for fine Asian Fusion/Vietnamese food.
Why do we eat? For calories. To ease hunger pangs. Because we are bored. Because we love to cook. Possibly. OK, but why do we eat OUT? Because it's about more than the food? And because things taste better when they are free? Yes. And yes. Tamarine's fusion SE Asian fare probably is great if you have to pay, but it's so, so much nicer when you can ignore the dollar signs and focus on the INGREDIENTS. Order based solely on what sounds like it might also TASTE good, too. Pick 5-6 items from the starters. Then 5-6 main dishes. Then 5-6 deserts. And you pass and taste and laugh and easily go through two bottles of Alsatian Pinot Gris to wash it all down. Tuna tartare Shrimp croquettes (little bursts of flavor) Roti w/ red curry (simple but satisfying) Tea leaf beef (rolls off the tongue) Shrimp spring rolls Salt and pepper calamari (perfectly flash fried) Pan-seared hamachi Hoisin lamb chops (superb) Lemongrass sea bass Poached duck breast w/ sunchoke and edamame puree (delicious) Chili-lime aubergine with fish sauce Long beans sauteed in red chili, and Kaffir lime leaves (lovely) Coconut panna cotta (the taste lingers in my memory) Chocolate volcano cake Other things ... Sounds like a pretty nice dinner, doesn't it? It was.
Ample parking in behind the restaurant in the public garage between Cowper and Webster. Service is always A+.  Staff if very knowledgeable on every dish and make very good recommendations.  The menu does change occasionally.  I have have never had anything that I didn't like there.    For drinks, I recommend the kafir lime cocktail.  Fabulous.  It's a very friendly atmosphere and you will often see regulars there.  Personally I go there at least once a week.  It is my favorite restaurant.  Asian Fusion. If you are going there for a special occasion, let the server know, they can usually do something special for dessert like write "Happy Birthday" in chocolate and provide a sparkling candle.  Great way to end the night. Great wine list.
Anticipation.  The handbag you've had your eye on.  The Hugh Jackman film you're dying to see alone in the theater so that you can just stare without interruption.  The man you've gotten to know around the office / club / neighborhood and have wanted to get to know better.  You've wondered what the handbag / Hugh film / powerful man would be like; of course, the fantasy is golden and life exists on a pink cloud of ecstasy. And then... Reality.  Never quite what you thought it would be.  The handbag goes out of style three weeks after purchase.  Hugh's latest movie flops.  The man finally asks you out and he is a narcissistic windbag with halitosis. Tamarine was on my radar.  There was anticipation.  Significant anticipation.  Reality was not as good as the fantasy. I dined with three friends / colleagues for a dinner / meeting.  Our server, Brandon, was awesome!  Five stars for him all the way.  The following is what was consumed at our table: *Starters* Summer Corn Fritters Shrimp Cupcakes Lime Cured Beef Salad Onion Rings *Entrees* Three orders of Shaking Beef One order of Hoisin Lamb Chops Jasmine Rice Coconut Rice I had a glass of the Zinfandel *Dessert* Carrot Cake Coconut Rice Pudding Chocolate / White Chocolate Pudding No, this meeting was not for the lumberjack convention.  The servings are not that big!  :) Honestly, the service and atmosphere deserve five stars.  The food was okay.  I didn't care for the Lime Cured Beef Salad at all, and the Shaking Beef was marginal.  I was hungry so I ate it, but it wasn't over the top.  The Hoisin Lamb Chops were excellent! The Onion Rings were a bit greasy. I hope to go to the bar at some point but may not eat at the restaurant again. Brandon, you rocked!!
Tamarine is generally overrated by most diners and yelpers. Here's who the over-raters are: 1. Most don't know Vietnamese food well 2. And/or want an alternative to the dismal dives they had it before 3. They want some of the flavors in a yuppified environment 4. Prefer a huge wine list and Sommelier, to better dignify it 5. Willing to pay 5 times more than a Viet place in San Jose 6. Want to be around more white people when they eat asian food 7. Hated the dumpy-dive-grumpy-service their Asian friend took them to 8. OR are Asian and brought their non-Asian friend here to impress them 9. OR are white dudes with non-Vietnamese Asian dates A Vietnam native and I went here to check it out. We had reservations, at 6:45 but came early, and were promptly seated in perhaps one of the best tables in the house, the corner table in the back room. Many of the seating choices are community tables on bar stools, so a draped table in the far corner was much more elegant and quiet, perfect for you romantics. Tamarine Taste (combo appetizer, $16) consisted of 2 Cha Gio (taro egg rolls), "tea leaf beef" (aka Bo Lo Lot) which is 2 small beef sausages covered with tea leaves,  2 Goi Cuon Banh Trang (shrimp spring rolls), and a small Goi Du Du Kho Bo (Papaya Salad with beef jerky strips). Aside from the portions being smaller, these were generally OK, but better in a standard Vietnamese place in Little Saigon. Ha Long Bay Soup ($13) we split. It came in a large bowl with a ladle, and two small bowls, with 4 crab won ton pillows in a coconut milk. It was "meh" at best, as you could get a better version in most southeast asian restaurants, and most will serve you the soup into your bowl with the ladle, which our server didn't bother to do. Pineapple Bass ($27). This was good. A lightly battered and flash fried bass, then cut up into bite size pieces and well plated. Cumin Spiced Duck ($24). This was poor. The duck was just little slices on a plate, with little flavor, and the sprinkled powdered cumin didn't help. It was on a bed of mung beans, also very bland, like veggie-mush. 2 sides of Jasmine rice ($1.50/ea), served in a banana leaf. This may seem exotic, but in Vietnam, this is the way it is often served in roadside stalls. They gave us Coconut Rice first, and just before we started to eat it, they whisked it away to another table! We had a glass of Merlot and Pinot Grigio (both $11). Our server gave me my Grigio, I took a sip, and a minute later she whisked by, picked it up and said "I gave you the wrong one!" I guess she didn't see me take a sip, and didn't care! Our server was also indiscrete, as she would come by the table, and announce in a large voice, did we like the last dish?, or other such standard lines, as if she was announcing our entry into the Kings Ball in a Fairy tale. A bit unsettling, between the service mishaps and the pronouncements tryng to draw out gushing compliments from us. (We gave none, maybe that is why she kept getting louder?) Tamarine has Vietnamese family chefs mixed with latin helpers. The patronage is 85% caucasian, with 10% white guys with Asian dates, and the rest all non-Vietnamese Asians curious to the cuisine. The food is decent, just a lot more expensive than what you can get 20 miles south. Tamarine has an SF restaurant, Bong Su. You know the old saying about ethnic restaurants.....if you see a lot of Vietnamese eating there, you know it is good. My date was the only one there (eating, not cooking!).
Tamarine is a great restaurant for a party of more than two so you can order a few pre entre apps and share. The scallops and green curry was tasty but very, very mild and the wok pho noodles with beef were standard. The service was perfect and the ambiance decent if a little on the older side. Honestly, I felt full and not much else after walking out of Tamarine. There are many Vietnamese restaurants that I prefer. Best part of the night was my cute dress and the specialty drink I ordered (wish I could recall the name.)
It felt more like Asian fusion then Vietnamese cuisine.  Gorgeous interior and bar with elegant service and food presentation. My favorite dishes were the Banh Mi Roti appetizer, Tamarine Prawns, Hoisin Lamb Chops and the Coconut Rice.  I would order all of them again in a heartbeat. Not a fan of the Salt & Pepper Calamari (Sel Gris in Portland has set the bar far too high) and the curried long beans weren't as special as I'd hoped. This is an expensive place, but three of us left completely full after splitting two appetizers, two small plates, a vegetable dish and assortment of rice. I've got to note a pet peeve - no prices printed on the cocktail menu. ($11/12 if you ask).
I finally ordered the right items & recognized the goodness that is Tamarine: -Tamarine Taste, fantastic 4some: spring rolls, taro rolls, papaya salad & tea leaf beef. - Hobo's Purse Soup, delightful soup with cabbage wrapped pork dumplings. -Shaking Beef, tender, well marinated -Chili Ginger Barramundi, sauce a bit on the sweet side, but fish was seared perfectly. -I love that they have seven types of rice to choose from. Prices are reasonable when you factor in the food & ambiance, if we didn't order our bottle of sake, the bill would have been about a bill.
For Palo Alto, this is a good choice for contemporary Vietnamese cuisine, I'm bumping this up to 4... Read more 
Never in my life have I been rejected.  Princess?  Sure, I get everything I want.  Every since the blonde met the black, aka Miss Suan W., it's only gotten better.  No one can say no to the blonde and black.  I was wrong. I had a terrible day at work and needed booze and calamari since everyone knows that those are the secret ingredients to fixing any problem.  The bartender told us that we had to come back at 5pm.  So 20 mins later we come back and  proceed to order tons of food.  All I really cared ABOOT was the calamari. Next thing you know Suan and I are having a Lifetime for Women moment while we have amazing Mango Mojitos.  In every great Lifetime movie there is a mysterious heart-breaker.  Enter old man, who claims to be a doctor (can't fool me).  He proceeds to talk about his lady woes and I, being the kind soul I am, have to drink to endure such treachery.  I never said I wanted to be a shrink when I was young!  Next thing you know the old geezer buys me a shot of tequila and since I asked for a pineapple chaser the villain of the film (enter Mr. MEAN BARTENDER) tells me I'm cut off! Since when did wanting to have a nice tasting cooter become a bad thing? Tamarine, I cut you off!
I just spent $110 on lunch for 2 (no alcohol), and I'm happy about it!  That pretty much sums up Tamarine --- a tad pricey, but always a great dining experience.  For lunch today, we ordered the following: Watermelon lemonade ($4) (2) Clay Pot Cod ($20) Shaking Beef ($24) Roasted Brussel Sprouts ($9) Jasmine Rice ($2) (2) Sticky Toffee Pudding ($9) Banana Beignets ($9) The watermelon lemonade is a seasonal item, so be sure to try it at least once when you get a chance.  It's incredibly refreshing and flavorful.  Only complaint?  It's gone in about 2 gulps!  Like most clay pot dishes, the clay pot cod goes best with plain white rice.  The Shaking Beef is tender and delicious --- but I prefer my beef medium rare.  (The Shaking Beef isn't even a little pink on the inside).  The highlight of the meal was something called "Sticky Toffee Pudding".  You know what?  It's NOT PUDDING.  It's a wonderful moist cake served with toffee sauce and a scoop of vanilla ice cream.  The next time you come to Tamarine, try the Sticky Toffee Pudding for dessert instead of the "traditional" fried banana beignets.  You won't be sorry!!!
One of my favorite restaurants on University Ave. The decor is very elegant and contemporary, with beautiful artwork on the walls from various Vietnamese artists. We made reservations for a late dinner with friends here on Friday night, and the place was packed. We started our evening there with some yummy lychee martinis. Between the four of us, we shared 4 main dishes. The menu listed them as "small plate entrees" but they really weren't that small. We also shared the Tamarine crab and garlic noodles and 3 orders of jasmine rice (2 orders would have been enough for 4 people). They used mung bean noodles in the garlic noodles dish, which was different than any other one I've had, but it was still good. For our entrees, we had the Jumbo Tamarine Prawns, Clay Pot Cod, Shaking Beef and Hoisin Lamb Chops with sweet potato fries. Everything was fantastic, but if I had to choose a favorite, it would have to be the Lamb Chops. We polished off every dish -- it was the perfect amount of food for 4 people. BUT we still had room for dessert! For dessert, we definitely indulged! We shared the Banana Beignets, Chocolate Pot de Creme and Chocolate Lava Cake. It was all wonderful. The lava cake was quite rich, and it was a good thing that we added 2 scoops of vanilla ice cream because it would have been way too sweet on its own. The banana beignets were one of my favorite versions of F.B.I. The pot de creme was yummy too, I just wished it came in a bigger bowl. Great ambiance, food, service, and company. It was a wonderful way to end the Year of the Dog!
After a wonderful experience for a small office dinner at Tamarine, I decided to book reservations through OpenTable again for 2009 NYE. A few days before our dinner, a lady called to confirm my reservation and emailed their four course Prix Fixe menu as a teaser. When we arrived at 6:30pm, we were immediately seated and given menus outlining their menu selections and beverages. We already knew what we wanted and decided to select one different item from each course to get a good variety of flavors and creations. First Course *Oysters on the Half Shell: 4 small fresh oysters on their half shell. Nicely presented in a rectangular white ceramic plate. *Masami Beef Rolls: 3 rolls on top of hoisin sauce, thinly sliced marinated beef rolled with lettuce, avocado, and papaya inside rice paper. Fresh and delicious appetizer. Second Course *Oxtail Dumpling Soup: Strong hot broth infused with cilantro, basil, and scallions with one large wonton floating among kobe beef slices. Excellent comfort food. *Winter Frisee Salad: An exotic spring mix of blood orange slices and pistachios with a light tangy mouth-watering vinaigrette dressing. Third Course *Pan Roasted Kurobuta Pork Loin: Steaming hot slices of two-tone pork loin (looked like light and dark meat) sprinkled with Kubota squash relish, tomato ragu, and a side of brussell sprout and fried bacon hash. Perfectly cooked, tender, and succulent pork loin slices. *Kobe Beef Tenderloin: Thick and absurdly tender Kobe beef slices arranged like a fan on top of a distinct white truffle mash. Steamed and sauteed wild mushrooms were garnished around the plate. A light glaze surrounded the beef slices. I've never consumed beef that perfect and addicting to want more and more. Fourth Course *Coconut Panna Cotta: A scoop of coconut sorbet on top a vanilla bean panna cotta in shape of a snowman with a dried crisp sliced peach topping it off. The whole dessert was bordered by a guava puree. Tart yet forgiving on the palette, it was superb. *Warm Banana & Coconut Tapioca Pudding: Two slivers of warm banana drenched in a coconut tapioca pudding presented in a blue rice bowl. Simple. Beverages *Ice Water with lemon *Mango Limeade: Tangy, sweet and sour. I could distinctively taste the difference between lime and lemon. *Peach Lemonade: Tangy and strong peach flavor. A big variation of taste from lime. *Vietnamese Drip Coffee: Very Strong with less condensed milk. Pow! Every dish was delicately prepared and tasted delicious to match. Prior to the start of our first course, the waiter brought out shots of what appeared to be a Tangerine liquid concoction to help cleanse the palette. The meal was wonderful and I was very satisfied with our selections. At $70 per person before gratuity, I must say the price was well worth it. I was even able to use my $20 OpenTable check applied to my bill. Total bill came to $166.06 after tax and $20 check was applied but before tip. I couldn't have asked for a better meal to end 2009 with my wife at such an exquisite location!
I made reservations at Tamarine for my wife and I with their 2009 NYE priz fixe 4 course meal for... Read more 
I crashed a friend of a friend's birthday party here.  I don't get the complaints about the decor.  I shared a number of entrees with a few other people and shared appetizers with the table.  I loved every single thing I tried.  I think my favorites were the tuna tartare and the papaya salad...though I really loved the seared scallops as well. They handled our large (14?) group well.  They have some kind of policy where they don't charge corkage for a bottle of your wine when you buy a bottle of their wine...so you can go 50:50 on that.  Personally, I think this is better than straight up corkage but I think that corkage as a concept sucks...not as much as pet rent, but still sucks nonetheless.  I'm about to start sneaking wine into restaurants the way I sneak fast food into movie theaters.  $5 for a poorly made hot dog?  You've got to be kidding me.
Yes, it's pricey. Yup, you can get Vietnamese food five times cheaper somewhere else. BUT, this isn't where you go for traditional Viet food (trust me, I'm Vietnamese).  If you want to try staple dishes with a California/French flair, come here.  Vietnam was colonized by the French and this food leans more toward that time.  Very similar to the food my aunt served at her restaurant in Bordeaux, France. For me, foodwise it's better than Ana Mandara and Slanted Door.  Probably the only place in the Bay Area where I would pay $24 for Lemongrass Bass. Think of it this way, sometimes you want a Johnny Rocket burger and sometimes you want a Chez Maman burger.  Some days you want a $5 rice plate with a pitcher of already made nuoc mam (fish sauce) on the table and other days, you want jumbo prawns in a delicately made tamarine sauce that oozes with flavor in a more upscale place. We don't have to bash this restaurant because it's not your typical Vietnamese establishment.  It is what it is and if you enjoy solid food, you'll like this place.
I still remember my very first bite of their shaking beef...I was speechless as it melted in my mouth. Then came the clay pot cod, panang curry and ginger chicken, all superbly flavorful. Everyone at the table knew that we were coming back for more. As for the rice, we usually order brown and hainan. A reservation is a must, but you can always kill time at the bar and enjoy some of their exotic drinks. Can't wait to try their sister restaurant, Bong Su, in SF!
We dined at Tamarine on a Thursday night to celebrate our girlfriend's birthday.  When we arrived at 7:45, the place was packed.   The bar was full and the tables were as well.  Thankfully, we had reservations for the night.   We got some drinks before we were seated and we were happy to find that the drinks were reasonably priced and fairly strong. The food was excellent.  We shared the following dishes: Salt and Pepper Calamari- (crisp calamari wok tossed w garlic and spring onions.  Served w a cilantro emulsion)  This dish was excellent.  The calamari are larger pieces of squid and perfectly fried without too much batter.  The cilantro emulsion complemented the calamari perfectly. Imperial Rolls- (crisp rolls of crab, shrimp and pork)  This was a great appetizer...the rolls were perfectly fried and hot inside.  Perfect to wrap in the lettuce provided. Shrimp Spring Rolls- (shrimp, pork, mint, lettuce soft rolls)  Tasted good.  Nothing amazing, it was pretty standard. Wok Pho Noodles- (wok flashed rice noodles, tossed w Chinese broccoli, seasoned beef & eggs)  I thought these were going to come with pho rice noodles, but it came with chow fun.  This dish tasted great, it reminds me of the Thai dish Pad See Ew. Tamarine Prawns- (jumbo prawns in tamarind sauce)  Five jumbo prawns served with shell on.  Perfectly cooked and tasty. Lemongrass Bass- (lemongrass & garlic seared sea bass)  Really great dish...bass was tender, moist, and had great flavor.  Also came with a cold mango glass noodle salad which was great. Shaking Beef- (cubed filet mignon seared w garlic & onions) This was by far our favorite entree.  The beef was perfect.  Get this dish!!! Banana Beignets- (fried bananas and coconut ice cream) YUM.  This dessert was delicious! Chocolate Lava Cake- this was just ok to me, I've had better lava cakes. The appetizers we ordered ranged from $8-$11.  The main entrees were around $25 each.  Entrees are expensive considering the portions aren't very big.  However, they were all delicious, so I didn't mind paying more. The crowd looked to be in the late 30s to 40s.  It seemed like there were a lot of dates and business dinners.  Our rowdy group of girls got some disapproving looks from some of the diners...I guess we were a little too loud for them! My only negative comment on this establishment would be our experience with the birthday dessert and bill.  We mentioned it was our girlfriend's birthday while she was away in the bathroom and they said they would bring something out.  We also wanted to order the chocolate lava cake and banana beignets to share.   So they ended up bringing out the lava cake for her birthday dessert and the banana beignets.  Where was the other one that we ordered?  I guess it didn't matter since we were full.   But when we got the bill, we realized that they charged us for her birthday dessert.  I find that pretty wimpy coming from a nice restaurant like that.  They also included tip on the bill for the five of us.  Maybe because the reservation was originally for six? Overall, I would definitely come back to Tamarine for the food.  It is a nice change of pace from San Jose and Santana Row.   Tamarine is much better than any of the other Asian fusion restaurants like Sino or Straits.
Am I missing something here? I came here with the bf for an early Valentine's dinner thinking that with all the great reviews from Yelp it would be the perfect dining experience for the occasion. I'd been wanting to try this place for some time, and he decided to surprise me by taking me here. But I'm sad to say that it wasn't what we were hoping for. Romantic atmosphere? I think not. Maybe if you're able to score one of the semi-private booths, but we were seated in one of the two-person tables up against the far wall. We were so close to our neighbors that I probably could have leaned over and picked something off their plate. We were also able to hear people's conversations without even trying. On the bright side, we got a good look at what everyone near us ordered. The dim lighting seemed kinda dark at first, but our eyes quickly adjusted. Our waiter was nice, but it took FOREVER to place our order and get our food. We started out with drinks and the calamari appetizer (which when I look back was probably the highlight of the meal). For our entrees we ordered the Pan Seared Hamachi and Poached Duck. Both were disappointing. The hamachi was not "seared" (assuming your definition of seared means that it's cooked on the outside and still a bit raw in the middle). Our piece of fish was thoroughly cooked and somewhat dry. The duck was not moist and fatty like I'm used to and it came out at room temperature. We also ended up getting the garlic fried rice (I'm not really sure why because for $6 all you get is Jasmine rice with butter and garlic). Not exactly something that you can't make at home and for cheap. Anyway, I took home the leftover rice and duck for lunch the next day and I think it tasted much better reheated in the microwave than it did in the restaurant. The good news? We were seated right away since we had a reservation (which ended up being a smart choice since the place was packed). Overall, everything seemed over priced for the amount of food that you get, and you find yourself continuing to order things that aren't that great just to fill yourself up. Although maybe that's the whole point...
We stopped by for appetizers and wine. The food had rich and unique flavors and our waiter was knowledgeable about the wine. I had a lovely experience at Tamarine and hope to return for a main entree soon.
I'm sorry.  I really am.  But I don't get it.  I just don't understand people's love of this place. I suppose if you love fried foods and butter, than this must be paradise.  But we don't - one of the reasons we usually enjoy vietnamese is because it's easier to find light, healthy dishes than in other asian cuisine. But we couldn't finish one dish, immediately feeling bloated and disgusting.  Everything was fried and heavy.  I felt guilty as I asked them to take the 1/4 eaten plates away. Call us SF foodie snobs, but Tamarine was a huge let down.  We won't be going back.
Wow.  I sure have love for the "fusion Vietnamese-maybe not very authentic"  food.  This is my 3rd joint..and I really am loving the genre.  So yeah...it might not be authentic and it does not cost 2.99 for a full meal, but it sure feels good in my tummy.  Maybe it's because I was with my "lucky" charm, but we were treated like royalty.  Adam was an awesome bartender serving great mango mojitos and wonderful information about the joint. He mentioned that the artwork on display sells at an annual auction they have. The proceeds benefit various charities and the auction is open to anyone; realistically, you too can also  enjoy the show of watching people with lots of money-go to town. Back to the food... My group ordered Lemongrass Bass, Shaking Beef, Ngo Om Chicken, Hawaiian Blue Prawns.  We paired that with some red and coconut rice.  Definitely an explosion for my taste buds! For dessert we had the chocolate lava cake, and the banana beignets.  Wow...that was awesome!  The waiter(I can't recall his name)was very attentive and friendly.  It was pretty packed on Thursday...both the bar and the restaurant.  I now can see why.  I really had a nice time with great friends, great food, awesome art, and fantabulous drinks!
Great place for a business lunch and a special occasion place.  When I worked in Palo Alto, I would frequently take my clients here for lunch.  The decor is nicely set and the uniforms of the waitstaff are very polished. I think lunch is the best time to go as their menu is the same at dinner but cheaper.  I would categorize the place as fusion/upscale Vietnamese.  Its more doctored up and smaller portions than Le Cheval or Slanted Door, but still tastes very good.  When going, I highly recommend the Shaking Beef, clay pot chicken, and scented jasmine rice (I love it when restaurants make fragrant rice).
I guess if you rate a restaurant on ambiance and style alone, Tamarine would rate fairly high.  On the food, it'll be average. I had the opportunity to dine here after hearing so much about it.  And, I was a bit disappointed.  The food....it's really the same thing you can find in any authentic Vietnamese restaurant.  However, it's just a lot more expensive at Tamarine. I find it pretty comical that some ppl consider the food here as "exotic" and "fusion".  Because, it's really not exotic nor fusion.  It's just typical Vietnamese cuisine but presented in an upscale manner.  But, considering the options in the Palo Alto area, I guess it's a refreshing and "different" choice from the norm.  Hence, the popularity of the place.  Definitely a good choice to bring out-of-towners if you want to impress.  You probably won't find many actual Vietnamese ppl raving about the place though.  It'll be similar to finding actual Chinese ppl raving about P.F. Chang's.
My boyfriend took me here on a whim one day afterwork for dinner and I was pleasantly surprised by this gem in Palo Alto. The ambiance here is great (I felt a bit underdressed in my Stanford Friday work attire (7 jeans and a henley) compared to the smartly dressed Palo Alto young/middle aged professionals). Nevertheless, they still served us ;) I ordered the Black Bean Seared Tofu ($17), one might ask themselves why you'd pay $17 for tofu, well, this is some damn good tofu. I don't even like black bean sauce but this was sweetness. I'm still trying to figure out how they were able to shread the tofu so thin, almost as if it were tofu filo dough. (Definitely recommend ordering rice with this dish). I can say that hands down this is the best tofu dish I've ever had. ever. I've also checked out Tamarine with a girlfriend for happy hour (5-6:30 p.m. in the bar) and had some yummy appetizers and a chocolate martini (a staple in my diet). Friendly and fun bartenders were a delight! My only complaint is that there's not too many vegetarian dishes to choose from but with the menu constantly changing it's possible that they'll be adding more vegetarian dishes, at least I hope so! The restaurant is modernly decorated and has a wonderful and warm ambiance. I would recommend dressing nicely (not super formal though) and making reservations (the place can get pretty crowded!). Bottom line, I'll definitely be returning to Tamarine - a great happy hour and date spot in downtown Palo Alto!
Tamarine is a decent contemporary Vietnamese restaurant in south bay, however it pales in comparison with high quality Asian Fusion restaurants in San Francisco.  If you have extensively tried out Unicorn and Dragonfly from the city (just to name a few), there is nothing you'll miss from Tamarine, not to mention its higher price tag. Here is why: Imperial Roll- Basically a fried spring roll with shrimp, crab, and pork.  The taste is overly bland and relies heavily on the fish dipping sauce.  The Albino Roll from Unicorn is a vastly superior choice.  Even without the sauce it is full of flavor. Cumin Spiced Duck- Good quality duck breast, but lacks any seasoning for adequate flavor.  The green beans and gastrique that come with it offer no help at all, as they equally lack of any flavor whatsoever. Avoid at all cost. Shaking Beef- Now this is the best dish of the night, the beef is soft and tender, and it is marinated with strong garlic flavor.  Very tasty indeed, but the Beef Look lok from Dragonfly is on par with quality and about 50% cheaper. Overall this is a good restaurant in the fancy Standford neighborhood with elegant decor, just the food simply cannot justify Tamarine's premium price tag. aka Overpriced.
Apparently this place is the go-to spot of my new workplace since it's so close and the food is good.  Btw, this is also a quick heads up to my fans that I'll be working the Palo Alto downtown area for reviews now...  So here we go! Earlier this year, I had my first dinner at Tamarine and it was delish.  A bit pricey for me but it was a special occasion so I tried to ignore how much lighter and thinner my wallet felt...  Recently, I was treated to lunch here and everyone at the table ordered the "Power Lunch" - clearly the best *value* at $16.  You get to pick 1 app among 4 options and 1 entree again among 4 options.  I think the dishes might be somewhat smaller than ordering straight off the menu (maybe) but I was definitely satisfied without the danger of food coma. Oh - I enjoyed my shrimp spring rolls (better not mess those up!) but my curry scallop was so-so.  I would have preferred the other entrees that others ordered at the table.
This place rocks.  Being in good company didn't hurt my impression of  this place, but putting that aside, Tamarine is truly superb in all regards. The ambience is terrific, and the food was simply outstanding.  In fact, it was so good that we ordered entirely too much and tried a bit of everything. You'll have to forgive the fact that I don't recall the exact names of the dishes.  We sat at the bar for 2 hours prior to ordering so give me a break. Between the two of us, we had this mushroom eggroll dish (fabulous if you really, really like mushrooms, which I do), the rice noodle and beef dish (terrific beef and fresh noodles with good flavor), some amazing lamb dish that was sweet and so flavorful with perfectly cooked lamb (order it medium rare), and a bass dish with a fresh watercress salada that was so good, it had you wanting more in spite of being stuffed silly.  FRESH as can be.  We also ordered a hamachi tartar - YUM!  (I told you we ordered a lot.) The seating arrangement is very nice with excellent lighting and good service.  On this day, we sat at the bar when we first met up but found that seating so comfortable and mood so good that we remained there to eat.  Given the amount of food we ordered, I expected to take up half the bar with our food, but it worked out nicely and the bartender always kept us loaded with drinks.  I would definitely recommend eating at the bar, which is rare for me as I find it stuffy, usually. I ate here on a Thursday night and parking was a bit difficult.  For your convenience, they have a parking garage in back but keep in mind that it fills quickly.  After about 15 minutes of surfing the area, I did finally find good street parking - but I got lucky.  Get there early to ensure you're on time, or else you might be very late.  If you're early, go to the bar and ask the bartender for his recommendation on wine, and knock 'em down.  He also makes one helluva Mojito.  :-) The cost, including tip, was a tad over $150 for two people by the time we were done, but like I said, we ordered a lot to get a taste of everything.  That cost included our 2 hour bar tab... I wish I could talk about the desserts but given the amount of food we ate, it shouldn't be surprising that we could not eat anymore.  But this is one place I will definitely be going to again, soon.  EXCELLENT!  Tamarine is appropriate for dates as well as family dinners and other gatherings of up to, approximately, 6-8 people, I'd say.  It's not really the greatest place for a meeting of many, many people.  But if you're wanting good food with good intimacy, lots of conversation and endless drinks - - this would be hard to beat!
Avoid ordering wine here.  I have never previously seen an upmarket restaurant attempt to sell for $50 a bottle of rose sparkling wine that would retail in a supermarket for maybe $3.99.  Sickeningly sweet, barely alcoholic; best described as blackcurrant cordial mixed with soda water. The food was passable; delicate flavours, deceptively small portions, attractively if impracticably presented, but nothing could really compensate for the appallingly bad wine, and we left with a sense of disappointment and no intention to return.
I am generally wary of Asian fusion places as they often take away the authenticity and jack up the price. Alas, this place is the rule, not the exception. Had dinner with the a friend after shopping around Palo Alto. While the decor was a little gimmicky Asian, it was quite lovely. A little early for dinner, we were seated promptly. Good thing as the place filled up quickly. Sharing the very long high table with other dinners (I guess it was put in for large groups), we are forced to overhear other people's conversation while missing our own. I had the clay pot cod. It was moist, tender but quite salty; also, the portion was small. Good thing I got the chili-lime aubergine on the side, which was slightly oily but overall tasty. However, I don't feel that it was worth $10! Service was fine, not outstanding but not bad at all. Overall, I feel Tamarine was overrated. While the food was decent, you hardly get much food for the price you pay.
Tamarine is good for work lunches/dinners, dates and just an all-around nice place to eat in Palo Alto.  Located on the edge of University Avenue, Tamarine is an Asian fushion restaurant that has delicious foods for a hefty price. Ginger Beer (4/5): Good!  It's not literally beer; it's a root beer, but better because it's somewhat sweet and totally delicious! $4/bottle. Steamed Bo Bia Rolls ($8) (2/5):  This reminds me of that dim sum bean curd dish.  If you're a dim sum connoisseur, I don't think you'll be very impressive: it kind of falls apart and it's really just dressed up bean curd with veggies (sauteed cabbage, jicama, eggs and mushrooms) on the inside. Salt & Pepper Calamari ($12) (5/5):  This is one of the best places for calamari (aside from Fisherman's Wharf).  It's big and lightly fried.  The golden batter is delicate and not overpowering.  The dipping sauce (cilantro emulsion) is really good-- I could probably drink it. :) Half Moon Buns ($9) (2/5): $9 for four tiny BBQ pork buns?  It's outrageous, but if you want your carb + pork + hoisin sauce fix, then you have to get it here unless you go over to Castro Street (24 hr dim sum) or over to some other Chinese restaurants off University that'll warm up leftover chao xiao bao.  The Buns consist of little sweet white breads with two or three pieces of FATTY bbq pork, a thin slice of cucumber and pickled diakon. The bbq pork has a lot of fat, so you might want to remove it with a fork. The pork buns aren't really buns.. they're like mini sandwiches and they're small... about 4" wide. Tea Leaf Beef (2.5/5): Fun to eat (and say!) because it's wrapped in a wild tea leaf.  I think you have to get used to the texture because it's slimy at first (because of the wrap), but the insides are yummy. Seared Scallops & Glass Noodles ($20):  This is the heartier of all the noodles.  They give a good amount of seafood, and the dish is lightly flavorful so you don't leave feeling really heavy as if you ate a heavy cream pasta.  Good choice. Wok Fired Garlic Noodles ($8) (2/5):  Honestly, this dish is good for what it is, but man... $8 for egg noodles with tons of garlic and butter?  Wow... I guess you really have to love garlic noodles. I know SF eateries that make even better garlic noodles that are less greasy. Papaya Salad ($10):  Really light and delicious because of the papaya.  I wish they gave more papaya though! Banh Mi Roti ($6):  If you're down for carbs, this is delicious!  The roti at Straits (on El Camino) is WAY better (soft, buttery, addicting), but it's good if you're craving roti.  Dip it in the curry sauce! Entrees - Shaking Beef (5/5):  Juicy, tender and cooked to perfection, the Shaking Beef is the most popular entree dish here!  It's really good and Tamarine pairs it with a nice mixed green salad on the side.  The shaking beef has succulent cubes of beef tenderloin seared and seasoned perfectly.  YUM - Clay Pot Cod (4.5/5):  Another winner!  You'll get one or two filets of Alaskan Black Cod caramelized in onion, garlic, molasses and spices.  It's really good, but I feel like it's not as filling because you'll get a little pot with the cod in a really rich sauce/broth.  You might want to order something else to go along with this because the flavor is intensely sweet and leaves you wanting to mix it up with something salty or savory. - Lemongrass Sea Bass (3/5): This is the lighter fish dish that's pretty good.  It wasn't very memorable or as tasty as the Clay Pot Cod.  You should try it if you want "less calories" but still want to stick with the fish dishes. - Sweet Potato French Fries (2/5):  Good as well, but Tamarine doesn't give enough fries for $4 per order.  It is what it is.  The sweet potato fries at The Counter or the sugar-coated fries at Wing Stop would hit the spot more if you're looking for French fries. - Hoisin Lamb Chops (4/5):  Another crowd pleaser!  I can't even tell it's lamb, and the meat falls off the bone.  Delicious! Coconut Rice (3/5):  Good!  You can totally taste the coconut and the roasted coconut flakes are for the win. Empress Rice (4/5):  Talk about calorie-packed!  This rice is delicious but SO dangerous!  It's made of sticky rice with a sunny-side up fried egg, leeks, ginger and garlic drizzled in a sweetened, thick soy sauce.  It's delicious!  It's like eating dense "fried rice" because everything is mixed up in it.  It's really heavy though-- it'll look intimidating when it comes out on the table, but it's good to share.  Has a nice flavor to it because of the sweet soy drizzle. Basil Tofu (4/5):  Can't really mess up fried tofu...You feel healthy because of the tofu and you get that good crispy fried flavor with a generous helping of basil.  It's good. After chatting with the waitress, I learned the top healthy menu items are: - Shrimp Spring Rolls, which you can order with tofu instead of meat (WAY overpriced! go to Siam Royal on University) - Steamed Bo Bia Rolls - Papaya Salad
Tamarine exceeded my expectations for upscale Vietnamese food. We came on a Wednesday evening and it was packed. Good thing I called earlier in the morning and they were able to squeeze in a table of 10 people for 7:45pm. The person I spoke with was very friendly and knowledgeable concerning the food. My boyfriend and I were treating out my parents and relatives who were visiting from France and it was their last night. I wanted to make the dinner relaxing so I pre-ordered. The person was able to help me decide which dishes would better accomodate us for sharing family style. Dinner prices are higher than lunch prices by around a couple of dollars. 2 orders of TAMARINE TASTER FOR 3: consisted of 6 eggrolls, beef wrapped in leaves (traditional Vietnamese appetizer), 6 pieces of spring rolls, and papaya salad. This was very tasty! The eggrolls were not drenched with oil or anything, the beef was cooked well, the spring rolls were fresh and full of good vermicelli and pork/shrimp, and the papaya salad was the real thing with marinated beef jerky. 2 orders of SALT/PEPPER CALAMARI: Large pieces of breaded calamari. It was evenly breaded and not too oily. It came with a clear fish hinted sauce. It wasn't the best calamari I've had but still good. 2 orders of BANH MI ROTI: Reminded me of nann. Do Vietnamese people even have this dish? But either way it was good with the 2 dipping sauces. A curry flavored one and a green beanish type one. The dough was crisp and a tiny bit soft in the middle. Yummy. 2 orders of HAY LONG BAY SOUP: There are only 4 wontons in each soup so we had to order extra to have 11 wontons. The broth was very good. Not too sweet coconut flavor with a hint of sour. Sounds strange but even my boyfriend who doesn't like strange flavors loved it. 2 orders of SHAKING BEEF: Very large beef cubes!! Seasoned and cooked well but medium instead of medium rare like I prefer at Xanh. Still very flavorful with watercress and red onions. 2 orders of TAMARINE CRAB & GARLIC NOODLES: Yes! Light noodles instead of heavy garlic noodles! These were those clear cellophane type noodles marinated along with fresh crab meat and giant cloves of garlic on the bottom of the claypot. I would totally eat these again! It was a simple dish but made very nicely. 2 orders of CLAY POT COD: A giant filet of cod marinated with garlic and fish sauce. The fish was cooked perfectly and moist inside. This was one of the favorites of the table. It is a little bit small to share so good thing we got more than one order. 2 orders of CITRUS BRINED PORKCHOPS: Delicious white meat filets on top of steamed cabbage and bacon. The flavor was not too salty and had a good balance. This was better to share because there were so many slices. 2 orders of BASIL TOFU: Cubed and fried tofu with basil leaves. It wasn't too special or anything. MUSHROOM MEDLEY: Crimini, shiitake, and shimmejii mushrooms in a claypot with coconut flavor. EMPRESS RICE: Japanese sticky rice with garlic, ginger, and leeks on top of soysauce and topped with an over easy egg. The server came over and mixed up the egg into the rice for us. It was a bit too gooey for me but a lot of people liked it. LEMONGRASS RICE: Lemongrass flavor with peas. COCONUT RICE: Jasmine rice cooked with coconut milk and topped with vanilla and coconut flakes. Ordered a bottle of some white wine from France which I forgot the name. That went nicely with the food more so than I would think red wine would but not that into wine so who knows. The service was very polite and friendly.  Our waters were filled regularly, plates and utensils changed, and crumbs removed at the end of the meal. Came to about $445 for 10 people and we had more than enough but you know Asians, they finish all the food no matter what usually. No dessert but they only thing that looked good was the banana beignets. My only complaint is that they doubled up on some of the items I didn't want them to but we ate it anyway so no complaints really. It would have been nice if the server went through the order beforehand instead of just serving us all of the food. But overall he was good but not as attentive as he could have been but probably because it was a large Asian family and he knew they wanted to be left alone. Also, I wish they had one menu for both dinner and lunch. They have the same items but are more expensive at dinner for no reason? I give this place 4 stars although maybe after coming here numerous times it might go down because I'll be used to it? Compared to Xanh (except in the case of shaking beef!!), Onyx, Vung Tao, Minh's, and other regular Vietnamese places..it sure beats them. I like the presentation and decor. There are multiple dining rooms and a nice bar area. But I haven't been to Ana Madara or Slanted Door so can't say if it's better or not. SEE PICS of all the food!! Yes..I am addicted to taking foodie pics.
I love watching people completely miss the curtain entrance and try to enter through the front windows almost 90% of the time.  It's hilarious.  We had a reservation at 6:15pm, but the first person didn't get there until 6:30pm, and we weren't ready to sit until 6:45pm.  I did appreciate how they didn't make a fuss at all about it and still honored our reservation.  Great start to service. Most to least favorite dishes (excluding dessert): Shaking Beef - Surprisingly really good.  The meat is cooked somewhere in between medium rare and medium and was so tender.  The onions were just barely cooked, almost raw. Half Moon Buns - I like their take on this.  They use really fatty char siu and pickled cucumbers instead of the traditional duck skin and green onions.  The buns were so fluffy and perfect! Pan Seared Hamachi - Center was cooked more than usual for being pan seared but it was still soft.  Unfortunately the asparagus and chanterelle mushrooms were overcooked and VERY soft.  The dish came out kind of lukewarm to cold so it must have been sitting out there for a while. Garlic Fried Rice - Only rice portion that's enough for at least 2 people.  Very aromatic and the garlic crisps on the top reminded me of the Filipino style garlic fried rice. Shrimp Cupcakes - I'm so disappointed!  After looking at all the pictures and seeing other tables receive this appetizer, I found it to be very bland. Ha Long Bay Soup - The fact that this soup is green just trips me out.  Also, it came out a lot more like tom yum soup and although it wasn't listed in the description, it tasted like there was a lot of lemongrass.  I probably wouldn't get this again but I did like the 4 crab wontons they included.  At least those were stuffed generously.  This portion is good for 3-4 people as a light appetizer. Dessert: Lemon Strawberry Parfait - I do not recommend this for sharing unless you want to dig deep into the cup and mix saliva.  We ended up pouring it all out on a plate which quickly decreases the appeal factor.  It's still good though!  The yogurt is very light in lemon flavor and the texture isn't too dense. Butterscotch Creme with Golden Blondies - Creme is good!  I can't imagine eating this all by myself.  The Golden Blondies are a nice touch and look like they'd be crunchy but are actually chewy. Now to finish off my review about service, it progressively got more lackadaisical.  Our waiter came by when we needed him to, but always a lot later than we wanted.  Even the busboy took one of our appetizer orders.  Maybe it was just this guy in particular.  I do like the decor of this restaurant... it's really hip like the food.  If you go on a weeknight, expect to see a lot of business people.
***POOR CATERING*** UGH!!!  We cater from Tamarine regularly for our clients and tonight there was a mishap with the company credit card and they would not release the food, as if we were going to rip them off. The food is ok, but as a vendor, customer service sucks.  The entire ordeal has been going on for the past 45 minutes and I'm going to get my ass handed to me when I serve my clients cold food.  None of my other vendors would insult me like this, and they got their $800 without tip.
Great food. Vietnam style but on the expensive side. Not bad for Palo Alto. Fairly clean and nice service. I like the beef and shrimp and vege dishes. We got there early for easy parking. Can be crowded.
Good food. Good selections. High prices. OK & slow service. Restrooms not clean at all. Need service... Read more 
Yummy food + Expen$ive price = Tamarine My girlfriend & I brought one of my good friends and his wife here to celebrate his recent promotion. The ambiance is very chic, and typical high-end Palo Alto, with beautiful people greeting you at the door. As we were a bit early for our reservation, the girlfriend & I, headed for the bar. She ordered a Mojito and I a "London Calling" which is an interesting gin, cucumber, slightly sweetened concoction ... very good (4.75 stars). Once our friends arrived, we were seated at a cozy table in the back room. Service was pretty attentive (about 4 stars). For dinner, we were all over the map ... we ordered Bahn Mi Roti (4 stars), Hoisin Glazed Ribs (4.5 stars) and Imperial Rolls (5 stars) for appetizers ... all of which were very good. I did find the ribs to be a bit "dusty", as they had a slight powdery taste. For entrees (though small plates) we ordered Pineapple Bass (4.75 stars), Hoisin Lamb Chops (5 stars), Shaking Beef (I didn't actually get an of this, as it disappeared so quickly), Cashew Chicken (4.5 stars), Curried Long Beans (2.5 stars), Coconut & Jasmine Rice (3.25 stars). After we were completely stuffed, and working on a nice buzz from the bottle of wine that we brought ($20 corkage fee), we ordered desert - Lava Cake (I didn't taste it) & Coconut Tapicoa (3.25 stars). All in all a very good experience! However, when the waiter ask if you want water, and you say "yes", be forewarned that he's bringing you $10/bottle flat (not sparkling), nothing special water. Our bill of $224.05 (before tip) had 3 bottles! Minus 1 star for charging for water, without a warning!
shaking beef good hili lime auberine just quality tastes and good food with drinks and enjoyed my last visit. Have a great bar menu for happy hoour rock stars garlic galore likey
I worked here for one night shortly after they first opened.  Just long enough to wear my little outfit, play hostess, and sample all the food at the bar.  Stars and stars for yummy food and a lovely space, minus some for the mix up in my start date that resulted in me not working there after all. . . . I LOVE that all the chefs in the back are women.
Thumbs down for over priced average Vietnamese food. Thumbs up for a cool zen ambiance. If Tamarine, Bong Su, and Vung Tau were in a bikini competition, Vung Tau will still win hands down. Nice try, T.
I absolutely loved this place. I went with my parents for an early (literally, 5:15pm reservation... it was the last one they had) Valentine's Day dinner and it was amazing. Yeah, I know, Valentine's Day wit my parents. I was prepared to be underwhelmed. But, I was wrong I started with a fantastic glass of pinot noir from the Russian River Valley, citrus pork lettuce cups and kobe beef pho. The fam had the PHENOMENAL giant shrimp in tamarind sauce. Spring rolls were fairly meh, not the greatest I've had... but it's a boring order. Also had the crab salad with tart grape tomatoes and avocado. Fantastic. I loved it. I also thought the vibe was really nice. Quiet, not too dark, lovely artwork. It was just a sparkly, shiny experience. I highly recommend it!
There are 450something reviews of Tamarine, so I'll try to add some value here by getting into some specifics. I'll start by saying that my wife and I have eaten dinner at Tamarine many times (most recently this past Sunday) and I think I can safely say that it's our favorite restaurant in downtown Palo Alto. RECOMMENDED DISHES The food is generally all very good, but here are a few of our perpetual and recent favorites. * Ha Long Bay soup - Dear lord, this may be the best soup I've ever had in my entire life. The wontons are fine, but the broth is insanely yummy... if they bottled it, I would chug it like a sport beverage. I order this every time we go; or rather, I did until last time, which was a mistake (skip the Ternion of Mushroom Soup, it lacks "oomph"). * Kaffir Lime Snapper: it's listed as a whole fish, but don't be intimidated, as they have kindly filleted it for you for easy eating. The fillets are crispy on the outside and tender in the middle. The tamarind sauce is scrumpy (tip: it runs under the fish, so scoop around underneath). * Sonoma Duck: This was a new one for us on our most recent visit, but YUM YUM YUM. Tenderlicious, with a thin layer of fat. If you're my wife, you trim the fat off. If you're me, you think it's a bonus (is there any fat tastier than duck fat?!). * Honey Roasted Quail: if you don't mind eating cute li'l birds, this app is really nice--the earthy flavor of the mushroom sticky rice stuffing goes really well with the quail's very slight gaminess. * Tuna Tartare: we don't eat too much tuna anymore due to concerns about heavy metals and overfishing, but if you're gonna do it, this is a good way to go. The veggies mixed in give it a bit of crunch and zing, and there's something fun (if messy) about scooping it up with the wonton crisps. * Banana Beignets: evil. On our most recent visit, we resolved "no dessert" before we left the house. Blinged-out cougars at adjacent 2-top ordered this and nearly broke our resolve, but we held out and are each a bit lighter for it. GUIDANCE ON DRINKS * Try any of the house cocktails that strikes your fancy; in our experience, the bartenders are skilled mixologists. But fair warning: sometimes the special drinks involve various preparations that they run out of from time to time. (I miss the old gingermint!) * Wine price is about double retail for bottles, which is on the low side for a restaurant of this caliber. Glass prices are about 1/4 that, and I'm guessing they're doing 6oz-ish pours, so there's no real penalty for by-the-glass, which is nice. * Having said that, I don't like the current by-the-glass wine list as much as what I remember from the past. I recall them having more rieslings and other interesting whites; on our most recent visit, I saw one "meh" riesling and 3 chardonnays. (Pandering to the unwashed masses?)  Also, most of the glasses are in the double-digits, which is more than I like to spend when I buy wine per glass. (Lest you think they are ripping you off, the $28/glass Domaine Weinbach Cuvee Ste. Catherine Pinot Gris is actually a comparative value--it retails for around $33 for a 375ml bottle, so the markup here is less than on most of the other wines). * The by-the-bottle list is more interesting, with some current vintage rieslings, some older rieslings, and a variety of other wines. A recent hit for us was the 2007 Merry Edwards Pinot Noir, which is a bit on the heavy side for a pinot, but went really nicely with the duck and the snapper. * The corkage is $25, so relative to the house markup you're winning if you bring any bottle that costs $25 or more. My ultimate recommendation on the wine is to go the BYO route, with a riesling, gewurtz, pinot, or other Asian-food-friendly wine. I'll certainly be doing that the next time we eat here. SOME NON-FOOD HIGHLIGHTS * Professional waitstaff * Nice decor, with changing artwork * Super close parking in the Webster/Cowper garage * Moderate noise level, especially in the back room * Reasonable table spacing * Cool bar for a drink or a light bite Hope you find this helpful & you enjoy your meal at Tamarine!
Four of us had a fantastic meal here during the week and if I'm ever in Palo Alto again, I will definitely go back.  The "chile lime aubergine," while a bit pretentious in name (seriously, I realize it's a Vietnamese restaurant and therefore French influenced or whatever but it's in the states.. it's eggplant) is one of the most delicious things I've ever eaten.  If I go back it will be hard not just to get two orders of that and call it a night. That said, the rest of the food was actually also quite good.  Basil tofu was delightfully crispy and well seasoned.  Wok Pho noodles were delicious and really nicely balanced with a good amount of veggies and meat.  Sake mushrooms and snowpeas were perfectly cooked -- meaty and crisp respectively.  I found the Lentil Duck to be a little too citrusy for my taste, but the texture was excellent and the citrusy sauce was a good addition to the accompanying forbidden rice.  Crab and garlic glass noodles were good, but watch out for the giant hunks of ginger that, in the low lighting of the restaurant, sneakily masquerade as crab... They serve everything family style and even when you're dining with a group that ranges from close friends to relative strangers, something about the atmosphere makes it easy to share food (and cooties).  It's a little pricey and I certainly wouldn't call much of it "authentic" but it's good food in a very nice atmosphere so... the price is appropriate, I think
So the our VP of Sales hooked us up this evening with Tamarine. What a treat and where to start.... For an appetizer I had the Half Moon Buns(basically a fancy Steamed Pork bun).  The presentation was very fancy but it tasted just as good as any Dim Sum place. Next I had to try the Kobe Beef Pho, which was awesome.  Broth was full of flavor and the beef was super tender. For my entree, I had the Shaking Beef.  YUM!  Once again, beef was very flavorful and tender.  The portion was a little on the smaller side. Overall, the food was very good but the prices are a little steep for the portions.
This is Rip-Your-Clothes-Off Good. I go to Sydney often where contemporary Asian is everywhere. The only problem is the flight costs $1,800 and a few days just to get there and back. Tamarine is closer, in Palo Alto and although expensive, I like just about everything about Tamarine. The atmosphere could be a tad less formal but that's minor really. We had the shrimp rolls, the Hamachi tatare, the Shitake mushroom soup, the Shaken Beef, and an imposing bottle of sparkling water in a tres cool bottle labeled "Antipodes". Everything was killer. Wicked killer, if you are East Coast. Although we were not drinking, they serve hard liquor and if it hasn't occurred to you: why can't we get great Asian food and a Martini? I mean, for Chrissakes. Asian food always means crap-ass wine and zero hard stuff. Tamarine was superb. It is one of the few Peninsula restaurants that could do well in the City which is high compliments. Check it out.
We had 2 apps, 2 entrees and 1 dessert. . . result Full and satisfied. Had the Calamari and Hamachi-Tartar. Tartar was great with chopped up onions, and something slightly crunchy and sweet like jiacama, cilantro, lemongrass, tons of flavor. The Calamari was good but I think I like it better w/o the batter fried. The cilantro emulsion was a very tasty dipping sauce. The dinner entrees said "small plate" but I thought it wasn't that small.  We ate the lemongrass bass. Nice portion actually. I like the side of noodle since it had sliced mango on top.  Nice touch as I like a little sweet.  The 5 spice duck was cooked very well, but it was just Okay.  We had two orders of jasmine rice. Rice comes in these cute baskets wrapped in a banana leaf. I was full but since the waiter slipped the dessert menu to us ever so cleverly. . . we shared the tapioca w/ passion fruit and lemon grass sorbet.  Sweet but not too sweet, ahh nice ending. Pretty pricey place, but food was good.
I really have to apologize to this place. When I first moved into Palo Alto and browsed the restaurants, I thought - another one of those fake asian food restaurants with over priced dishes! As time went on and I kept walking by the restaurant I realized there were ppl always packing the place! The restaurant is dark but the number of people going in and out was incredible. I asked a friend and found out its a hot place for business dinners. My roommate heard it was a rare Vietnamese fusion place, where the food actually tasted really good!.Then I thought, great now a very overhyped, still overpriced restaurant. So we went out and tried it on my birthday....and wait for it.... wow! So wrong I was!! The food was really really good. No overhype, its just as good as people say its is. Yes the portions are small, hard to get reservations, tons of business men packing the restaurant, cheesy waiters/decorations. However the food was really yummy. Apparently the shaking beef is really popular, but we ended up going for the quail appetizer, some beef skewers wrapped in nori, ginger steamed fish, and sweet coconut rice. Quail was small but lots of juicy meat on the bone, tasted like it was flavored with soy sauce. Beef skewers were so so, a little on the greasy side. Ginger Steamed Fish was really really good - big big portions, whole thing was deep fried and then sat in a really tasty soy sauce + ginger concoction. the best part though was the rice, so sweet and so moist and sticky!! It came in a cute leaf bowl. The above was plenty of food for two small asian girls to eat, and then take some home. I definitely say to try it out, and definitely try the different types of rice they have!!!
I'm always a little skeptical of the upscale Asian fusion spots like Tamrine. Especially when it's Vietnamese food since some of the most delicious Vietnamese spots I know of are run down places. They're all packing the same MSG into the food so I figure it's all the same. Anyway, I came here and was just disappointed. I got the tuna tartare for my app but it wasn't anything special. If anything, I've had better since the tuna seemed mashed instead of little cubes which is the way I think it should be. Got the duck as my entree which was okay. Not bad but not great. I was going to give this spot a 3 star rating because the food isn't anything special and it's pretty expensive but I decided to give it a 2 since my coworker who I came with ended up getting the ginger chicken which was just awful. You could probably buy chicken from Safeway and cook it in the microwave and get a better tasting dish. Like I said, I was very disappointed by this place and would recommend going to Three Seasons instead if you need to stay in PA. And if you can make the Trek, try out Xanh in Mountain View. Both of those are much better alternatives.
I really feel like Tamarine's quality has dropped recently, but it still remains as popular as ever. I don't know the exact schedule, but I do know that on a Friday at 5:30 there was a brilliant happy hour with all the appetizers half off. So for $20 total we had dinner (three apps for two ppl). And then we had like $50 worth of drinks. Those are some smart people over at Tamarine. i like the shaking beef, hate the prawns, love the tartare. and if it's not clear already, i love all the cocktails.
My girlfriend and i moved to an apartment a few blocks from Tamerine and have been eying it since the first time we walked by a few months ago. This Valentine's day we decided to suck it up and go check out Tamerine. When we called for reservations we found out that they were doing a special fixed price menu for Valentines day, $75. No thanks, got anything on the next day? Sure thing. We show up and walk through the goofy curtain to find the hostess stand occupied by three heavily made up girls in the exact same silk yellow tunic top thing that was either a halter top or single strap. It was long (down to about mid thigh) and had some sort of large red flower print. It looked like Fred Flinstone. Im not kidding. Do a google image search and you will see exactly what these shirts - err, blouses looked like. Not only this, but i felt they were a bit revealing and slutty looking for a nice restaurant. Plus, do you really need to have three hostesses huddled around the hostess stand? Anyway they say it will be a few minutes. So we wait. I look over to the bar and see the usual vain bar crowd that hangs out at nice restaurants and feels fine laying down $12 for a drink, as long as they get seen at a place like this and can put forth the image that laying down $12 for a drink you could make at home for $2 is no big deal. I could deal without the bar, but thats my feeling at most places that have bars besides sports bars, so that may just be by bias talking. We get seated in a few minutes and peruse the menu. We start with the calamari. It comes with a coconut lime sauce and is incredible. Easily the best calamari i've ever had. It lacks the chewiness that plagues most calamaris. The batter is light and fluffy and not over done. It was divine. Next up we got the Ha Long Bay Soup. The color of the soup (a pastel, kind of chalky light green) was a little bit off-putting but it was actually quite good. The crab wantons in the soup were not fried but steamed, making them more like steamed dumplings than wantons. This was the least impressive dish of the night, but it was still very good. Next we got the Hoisin Lamb Chops. They were out of this world. The flavors were complex, but perfectly balanced. It was cooked perfectly. I was glad we ordered it medium rare. It came with sweet potato fries, which were made from white sweet potatoes and were not seasoned at all. I was glad to see that they resisted the temptation to make them too sweet (i have trouble resisting that temptation when i make them at home). The bok choy served with the lamb chops was also delicious. For dessert we got a butterscotch pot de creme. The preparation was traditional, but executed perfectly. It was the perfect ended to a fantastic meal. I really liked that they set each place at the table with both chopsticks and a fork. Somethings, like the lamb chops, demanded a fork and knife. Others, like the calamari, were screaming for chop sticks. Most high end places with Asian influence stumble with this issue, Tamerine handles it well. Service was helpful and friendly. Though it was expensive when compared to other places on University, the food is far superior to anything i've had in the South Bay. I would sound like quite the yuppie to call this place reasonably priced, but i have paid much more for food that was not near as good as this. Bottom line: i don't mind paying a premium price for food that is innovative and fantastically prepared. This place fits the bill. I love it.
Love love the calamari and shaking beef. The location, service, and ambiance are great. Good for a night out. The only drawback is the receptionist. I wish they changed her or at least teach her how to be friendly and respect customers. She was rude to my friend and I but the manager was understandable. I won't stop going there though. The waiter and the good food made up for the poor receptionist.
Great food! Awesome Experience. Excellent service. Aside from that I don't know what I can say that would want to make you go here - but you should! I went here with a group of 5 for a birthday, and we were lucky enough to secure a corner booth!  We ordered a lot of dishes on the menu and did a makeshift family style feast.  I can't even describe how delicious the food was, from the Emporer's rice to the tuna tar tar, I'm going to go back here just because I want to try EVERYTHING on the menu. I ordered the shaking beef, my buddies ordered the caramelized prawns, some roti and of course calamari.  Before the meal came out, we were laughing it up and chatting our asses off, but when the food hit the table - not a word was spoken other than, "please pass this/that."  EMPERORS RICE FTW!  We took a break from looking down and inhaling our plates, only long enough to put the wine glass to our lips. I'm not a connoisseur by any means, but the wine our waiter had picked out to go with the dinner was amazing [and potent!]. Afterward we all sat around staring at each other wondering which dish was the best... It was probably one of the toughest questions anyone has ever asked me to be honest. JUST THEN - our waiter comes out and asks us if we want dessert?!?!? YOU FIENDISH BASTARD!!!  We could barely put anything else into our stomachs - but we all knew we had to try the dessert, because if dessert was as anywhere near as good as the meal we'd all kick ourselves for passing. My friend Fariza was the brave soul who ordered.  [When it arrived we all helped her out tho ( ^_^)]. My rating is for dinner, but I've also been here for drinks. Came here for late night drinks once, and the bartenders were cool and the drinks were well made.  Also the atmosphere was intimate but fun.  Definitely a date spot.  A big date plus - You won't run out of things to talk about here, because the around the bar and dining area are art pieces - and as I understand it they are for sale. If you look at this place from the outside you might be a little intimidated by the style.  I'd have to say, after going there a few times, its in-between dressy and casual... so im going to say.. fashionable?! Is that the word I'm looking for?, maybe not - just dress nice and get off your ass and go there now!
Excellent. I have been to Tamarine numerous times and will keep going back for more.  The atmoshere is elegant and chic without being pretentious.  Great location and easy to find parking. The staff is always friendly and knowledgeable.  The food is delectable and never disappoints. The lychee martinis are a personal favorite of mine.
Great food!  I loved the calamari, roti, shaking beef, empress rice, long beans, and banana beignets (excellent).  It wasn't as amazing as I thought it would be, but I gave it 4 stars since it's one of the few restaurants in Palo Alto that I liked.  Check out the artwork...some really good paintings. The service was a bit slow and I didn't like having a table right in front.  However, a fellow diner couldn't believe how comfortable the chairs were...?
Oh, this place.... Last and only time I was here was almost two years ago. I was here for a long, drawn out conversation over dinner with the current love of my life. The lovely topic was that we drive each other so crazy that we can't co-exist in any state mildly resembling peace, and that really, we can't do this to each other. We broke up and it was all very very sad. I still liked the food. That says something, doesn't it?
Compare to other modern, fusion, Vietnamese restaurants in the same league (namely, Slanted door, Three Seasons, Xanh), Tamarine stands out. The room is modern, chic yet intimate. The fusion food has more sophisticated blends of flavors than the others. It is a nice place for a date.
Personally I never take it as a good sign when I happened to be the only Asian customer insight at an Asian restaurant. OK, I get it, it's fusion, but the food here really isn't that "fusiony". Appetizers: The salt and pepper calamari was phenomenal. It doesn't sound special, but it really is very different from any calamari I've had before. It's fresh, juicy, and very white in color. DO NOT order egg rolls or shrimp spring rolls here. You can have far better ones at many cheap pho restaurants throughout the bay area at a fraction of how much it cost here. Entrees: A big let down. Lamb chop tasted just like soy sauce. The lemon grass sea bass tasted overcooked. Perhaps lemon grass and sea bass just doesn't go well together. The duck was kind of rubbery. The long beans were salty, greasy and nothing special about it. The portions were nice overall. Dessert: Tamarine kind of redeem themselves with their somewhat impressive dessert items. I had the coconut sorbet on some kind of flan in guava soup. It was sweet, creamy and tart at the same time which was unique and exotic. Very refreshing! The place was really crowded on weekend nights. Many people seem to see it as a "hip" and "upscale" place to be at. The setting and decor of Tamarine is kind of nice but nothing exceptional in my opinion. In fact, I think PF Chang looks fancier than Tamarine if you ask me. Tamarine is OK overall, but I'll probably take my money somewhere else if I want to splurge on some nice dinner again. P.S I understand it's a busy night, but I still find it annoying when the host told me "We need the table back by 7:45" before even seating us when I already made a reservation. Also, if your schedule is so tight, why is your service so slow?
Prepare thyself for a bold declaration: There is no beef dish on Earth that compares to Tamarine's Shaking Beef. Seriously. It's the definition of succulent, perfectly seasoned, and perfectly proportioned. This dish could turn a vegetarian into a carnivore, a carnivore into a strictly Shaking Beef-eating carnivore; it's that good. Similarly wonderful is the Empress Rice. Not as beautifully presented as the other rice sides, but oh so delicious (with the Shaking Beef). Otherwise, I was a bit disappointed in the calamari, and the duck was good, but duck isn't my favorite of all choices. A word of advice: make sure you've planned to linger over dinner at Tamarine. My date and I were there for two hours before we had to rush off, and we had to miss out on dessert, so next time we're going exclusively for that. Any dessert recs, anyone?
This space had been cursed for years before Tamarine moved in and delivered a culinary need in Palo Alto. Consistently excellent food. Most of the time I just let my servers order for me and I have to say  it has always been amazing. Great decor and an overall excellent atmosphere.
Sometimes I'm tired of the Palo Alto restaurant scene. So tired that I forget I hadn't eaten at Tamarine yet. In the past, whenever I've felt the itch for upscale/swanky Asian food, I'd spend my hard earned paycheck at the Three Seasons. The place was packed on Friday night, and I didn't even think to make a reservation. I get stressed whenever I have to wait, but luckily a seat at the community table opened up. The odd couple in front of us were swapping Scientology mantras. I totally think she was a gold digger. But yes, the community table is a prime spot for people watching. As far as the food goes, the tuna tartare, hoison lamb chops, and garlic fried rice were awesome. If it weren't so expensive, I'd eat here all the time.
Came here for a special event to celebrate lunar new year. There was a short lion dance around every table. Food: shaking beef and clay pot cod were both very flavorful and tender ha long bay soup- biggest crap wontons i've ever had. interesting sour and creamy soup. jasmine rice- tasted like regular rice Drinks: pear martini- tasted nothing like pear and was a bit strong in alcohol taste Bong su aperitif- sweet girly drink Service- food came at an ok speed b/c it was very packed night around 6pm. Service was friendly. Atmosphere- intimate, dim lighting, tables are a bit too close to other tables. Bill was $91 without tip. Definitely expensive, but dishes were yummy. Expect to spend about $100+. I think we ordered the least out of the other tables. You definitely won't feel full haha. Some of you might even feel hungry. I left with no overstuffed feeling.
Hopeful, yet disappointed.   The mediocre food, service, ambience, and experience did not meet my high expectations.  This is a wannabe-trendy quasi-asian fusion restaurant.  If you're reading this and haven't been to this restaurant, go on, try it, i know you will anyway.  It does have four stars and a lot of reviews, but the patrons are much like this wannabe-trendy quasi-asian fusion restaurant. I was immediately put off when i had reservations and was left waiting for almost 20 minutes while couples that arrived after us were seated.  What!  Are we not COOL (White and rich) enough? When we were seated, service was generally slow.  The waiter, to his credit, had a lot of tables but that doesn't mean i should have to suffer.    Anyway, food - Appetizers - Roti - 2 pieces, chewy, not too greasy, i liked it. Corn mush wrapped in banana leaf- skip it. Noodles - pho beef wok noodles - the best tasting part of the meal (which isn't really saying much).  It tasted basically like pad see ew that you would get at a thai restaurant, except cheaper and in bigger portions. Entrees - Clay pot cod - not as fresh as i would have liked and fishy tasting (c'mon use ginger or something!)  but the sauce had a nice mirin, sugar, sake flavor to it. Kum Quat duck - the duck confit was over done and bland and the seared duck tasted way too game-y.  The apricot sauce lacked execution. Overall ambience - boooring, trite, and if i may say, needs remodeling. As my guy said, this meal would have been good at a "regular restaurant."  So if you listen to my advice, you'll go to a regular restaurant but i know you won't.....
I don't know why I never rated this place.  Along with Evvia it is my favorite haunt in Palo Alto.  My hubby loves it, my parents can't get enough of it, all my friends love it too. It is one of the only places where you can sit down and have a civilized meal.  I love their flatware and china, I want to take those jade plates home someday!  haha. WIth regard to the food, we have a regular routine.  We always order the Ban mi Roti, spring rolls, and shaking beef.  And then another plate or two if there are more than 2 people.  The shaking beef is so tender and to die for. I also love coming to lunch here, the $16 course is a steal.  Their desserts are so-so, nothing to write home about.  The ambience is chic.  Thank god for Tamarine, if it were not here, I would be a dining refugee in Palo Alto!
overpriced food, overpriced Vietnamese food at that. food was good, nothing spectacular. I believe they have a sister restaurant, Vung Tau - that place if definitely more worth a hard earned dollar. ok - this may not be worth reporting but i really like their sparkling water, normally i prefer flat but the one they had was very refreshing. i must note, for dessert/chocolate lovers - you must try the chocolate creme brulee.
The food was all tasty, no complaints at all. We had: Hoi An Beef Roll Tuna Tartare Tamarine Prawns Shaking Beef Honey Miso Duck Coconut Rice + a few things I forget It's one thing to be expensive and serve a good portion, it's another to be expensive and give you very little. Tamarine falls into the latter. The small plate portions are just that - small. $26 for chunks of beef? So this is not a place I imagine most people would be able to afford on a regular basis. You're paying for the atmosphere, which isn't all that spectacular anyway. Great wine list and cocktails. Because we ordered a $170 bottle of Billecart-Salmon rose Champagne, waiter said he wouldn't card us but implied that he really should. I showed him anyway. I know we look young, but seriously. Inside is dark and sophisticated. Our table was somewhat close to the door and I felt a cold draft every time the door opened. And not the good "Coors Light Cold Activated Bottle Super Cold" kind of draft. I don't know if it was because our bill was so much, but they accommodated our complicated payment (certificate, and split 2.5 ways etc). We closed down the place shortly after 10 on a Friday night. Not a late night place, even though there is a full bar. I'm perfectly happy to pay a lot for good quality, much happier to pay very little for it, and quite averse to paying a lot for so-so or poor quality/value. Verdict: I'd come here again. If I wasn't paying for it.
I've eaten at Tamarine twice and loved it each time.  I was a huge Vung Tau fan when I lived in San Jose, which is much more reasonably priced, but it's a very different atmosphere and type of food.  I was a huge The New Bamboo fan before it started slipping (and I guess it's something new now).   A great shaking beef and a great squash curry. The service was good (took a while to get a check the first visit) and the wait staff even continued to be nice when I knocked over a glass of water .... I'll definitely go back!
This place is top notch. The menu was so impressive and mouth watering I had to let Joseph (best bartender ever but we'll get to that) order for me. When ordering he walked me through the menu and suggesting pairings. He shared with me that I should get some things vs. others because happy hour was coming up and they would be much cheaper then. Happy hour is the ultimate upsell and he was smart, knowledgeable and funny. If Tamarine had a tv to watch my sports I would have to add an imaginary star but Joseph, the super sweet hostess and Tamarine's exceptional menu and design deserve all five and EVERYONE should try this place at least twice during your visit. Shout out to the Four Seasons Palo Alto. When asking for suggestions Tamarine was an across the board favorite. I had no choice but to go.
Update 1/14/07: I just discovered that Tamarine's tea leaf beef rolls have ground pork in them.  What the hell??  There is nothing on the menu that would indicate that the tea leaf beef contains any meat other than beef.  While I personally don't have religious dietary restrictions a lot of my friends do and it's really not cool to blindside people like that.  I'm tempted to downgrade them  to a three... ___________________________________________ This is my favorite spot for dinner in Palo Alto.  I get grumpy if whomever I am dining with attempts to talk me out of ordering the Tamarine taste appetizer (seriously, I must have it, no arguments!). I've tried most of the things on the menu at one point or another, occasionally the dishes can be just a bit too salty for me, but over all, this the best restaurant on University Avenue.
Prime example of hipster suburbia.  Chilewich floors, bong su-esque windows (oh, they've got the same owners, no wonder), cool earthy paper light shades and packed bar when the clock strikes 6 on a weekday. 1/2 off apps for happy hour...  Tasty snackins. Roti triangles with Vietnamese pea mash and sweet curry dips.  Excellent hamachi tartare with caviar and cucumbers.  And mm deep-fried tofu with crispy basil. Classeh chic place in Paly.
We had a nice dinner with two other couples.  We dined family style, although the dishes seemed like they were more suited for people to order on their own. Favorites of the table were the clay pot cod, the shaking beef, long beans and the duck.  We also had the roti, imperial rolls, garlic noodles (could have used more garlic) and shortribs.  The boys were still hungry, so needed to order more noodles and the lamb. For dessert - butterscotch pot de creme, chocolate lava cake, panna cotta, coconut tapioca.  Expected more from the pot de creme.  The lava cake and tapioca were probably the favs. Our server was great and she was pretty attentive.  One note - we sat in the back room and it got pretty chilly.  And there is a parking structure behind it with an alley that leads to the entrance. Why only four stars if we really liked  it??  I think more because it was a bit spendy for the portions and I don't like being cold when I'm eating.
Tamarine is perhaps my favorite Vietnamese restaurant in the bay.  Been here for my birthday, valentine's day, girls get together, lunch w/boss, and anytime I crave those yummmmmies! Always consistent, impectable service, and delicious offerings. Can't go wrong with: Imperial Rolls Tamarine Prawns Shaking Beef Lemongrass SeaBass Empress Rice Hainan Rice So it's costly, but well worth every dollar.
I must say that when Asian fusion is done right, its a match made in taste bud heaven. Tamarine does almost everything right in combining asian flavors with western tastes. Some highlights from my dinner there: Salt & Pepper Calamari - Perfectly lightly breaded and fried. Super moist and fresh with just the right amount of crunch in the breading. The cilantro emulsion dipping sauce is heavenly. Clay Pot Cod - Melt in your mouth Alaskan cod with a perfect sauce all over it. Goes perfectly with a bowl of rice.. otherwise its way too salty on its own. Empress Rice - Wow.. it sounds like a simple dish but sometimes the simple ones are the best. Its got a poached egg on top that is mixed with the rice upon service. The rice itself is perfect.. soft, sticky.. with leeks and this sweet soy sauce all over it.. damn. The other dishes were just ok for us: Tuna tartare - There was something off in the seasoning of the tartare for us. It just wasn't working for me. Shaken Beef - Supposedly this dish is usually made better as I went with friends who have been here before. The beef was a tad bit overcooked as shaken beef is best when the beef cubes are rare. Overall, I had a good experience here although the prices are a bit steep for the portion sizes. I'm definitely going to drop by again if I'm in the Palo Alto area!
So it's unfair for me to judge this place because all I had was appetizers and drinks, but I don't care and I want to share my 2 cents. came here with a gf and had: - a pear martini: was suppose to have "pear" pulp or something like that, but tasted like a normal martini with lemon or lime flavoring?  it wasn't bad, but if i'm going to pay $11 for pear pulp that's what i want to taste! -roti with curry dipping sauce: roti was crisp, flaky, and delicious.  the curry dipping sauce was pretty tasty, but i think the one at layang layang is better...wasn't quite spicy enough for me.  they weren't very generous with the dipping sauce portion because i like to bathe my roti in the sauce, but the waiter was kind enough to give us more. -tuna tartare: a little on the bland side, they put cucumbers in the tartare (which i don't think is standard), usually when i eat cucumbers it's to cut the taste of something pretty flavorful, but there was nothing in this tartare to cut.  the tartare was definitely missing that x-factor. All in all, the ambience was good and it's probably a pretty nice place to take a date.  I am definitely open to trying this place out again and having a real dinner.
An upscale Vietnamese restaurant with romantic ambiance. Tamarine is the kind of place you could safely take your first date to. (Unless your date is Vietnamese. In that case he/she will probably be laughing at you.) The restaurant might seem contemporary but the food is surprisingly authentic. There are no fusion elements and very little creativity in the menu. The food was good. Ingredients tasted fresh and presentation was excellent. Of course, at this price range I really wouldn't expect any less. Vung Tau in San Jose is also ran but the same family that owns Tamarine. The food is just as good and the menu is more extensive. Eat there instead if you don't care too much about the ambiance. Save Tamarine for dates or business meals with clients.
I love the ambience for this restaurant, so I'd say 4 stars just for that alone.  Sometimes you just got to pay for ambience alone. The food is pretty good for fusion food.  I wouldn't get the pho again because you could pay way less money for pho at a regular pho restaurant.
Wow is all I can say.  Absolutely everything I tried was delicious.  If you go, you must get the pineapple salad and the won ton soup.  Mmm...  It's very crowded so I suggest reservations, but if you find yourself waiting its well worth it.
Amazing, exquisite flavor.
okay, this time, the papaya salad, clay pot cod and pho are amazing as usual! But today was my first time to have desserts here! the pumpkin flan and toffee pudding! OMG OMG! totally spot on!!!!!! hit my palate!!!!! no wonder!!!! I almost teared up!!!! they are both so heavenly fantastic!!!!!!! I am gonna go back just for dessert!!!!!!!!!!
Preface: One of the problems of writing about nearly every restaurant that I go to is that people notice if I forget to write about one. Such is the case with Tamarine. And so I apologize to my boyfriend for writing this review over two weeks after he took me here for my birthday. Review: My experience with Tamarine began with not being able to find the front door. The restaurant is easy enough to see right there on University, but they have the front door blocked by big black drapes, presumably to keep the cold air out. After we dug threw the drapes and found our way inside, I saw that Tamarine has a very pretty bar area with round booths and an open feel. Then we were taken to the second room, which was much more crowded, and seated at the end of a long row of tables against the wall. It wasn't too bad until a couple sat down right next to us, and the man proceeded to talk shop with his date for the entire dinner (your typical tech company chit-chat that made me feel like I was at work). Next time I'd request to sit in the bar area instead of the second dining room. The room was packed for a Monday night, but it looked like there were a few company Christmas parties there. In general, the crowd was older, 40s and 50s, so it made me feel young on a birthday where I am starting to feel less-than-young. Service was so-so, being particularly slow with taking drink orders. However, after we ordered our food, it improved greatly. Drinks: I was happy to see that they offered three German dry Rieslings by the glass, which I think is a perfect match for the style and variety of food that they serve. There were also a few specialty mixed drinks that looked interesting, and it looks like they have a full bar. So the food, which is what I would call fancy Vietnamese/Asian: Most of the menu is small plates, with a fair amount of salads, soups, and a few entrees. Overall, the food was interesting, well presented, and tasty. For an appetizer, we ordered the cinnamon prawns with avocado mousse. The prawns were interesting, but the mousse just tasted like guacamole, not that I am complaining. The crab wonton soup was a bit too sweet, and the lemongrass bass a bit boring. However, the Muscovy duck and the mango salad that accompanied the bass were delicious. The fancy rice was less than trilling, and I would stick to the plain jasmine or brown rice next time. The four dishes were just about the right amount of food for two hungry people. I was tempted to order the Vietnamese coffee, but they don't have decaf, so I had to pass. I also passed on the dessert menu as nothing was tempting enough. Summary: An excellent choice for a special occasion dinner such as a birthday. A few days afterward, my friend took her husband here for his birthday based on my recommendation.
Tamarine is one of the better restaurants in all of Palo Alto. It certainly qualifies as the best in terms of decor as well. The food is very good and the atmosphere is excellent. Service is always quite snappy and the staff is pleasant and helpful. If you have been to Three Seasons down the road, Tamarine is a step up in every direction; food, decor, service, and atmosphere. Such a step up comes at a price, though.
Almost 200 reviews?!?  What the F?  I thought this place was new... apparently, I'm just not trendy.  Sorry. Good modern Vietnamese cuisine, good decor, and good company always makes for a pleasant dining experience.  I ate here with my family the other night and we had the Sea Bass, shaking beef, the lamb, the tuna tartare, and some other things.  The service was excellent, and everything we tried was awesome.  The food is served family style, so be prepared to share.  It's ok, don't be greedy, just share. It was a little on the expensive side for the amount of food we got, but I guess it's ok to splurge time and again.  I say that a lot... maybe it's why I'm broke a lot.  Oh well... I hate to say this, I really do, but it has to be said.  When I took a peek in the kitchen, the chefs were  Vietnamese.  NICE.  This place couldn't miss, it had to be good.  Sure enough, it was pretty damn good.
The food here is really tasty, beautifully plated and the restaurant has a great atmosphere.  Try to black sesame creme breule - my reaction was, "WOW!  That is totally not offensive!"  I know it doesn't sound like a glowing review, but I definitely was frightened before I tried it.  The Ginger Crab noodles were amazing. Gas Rating: 2.5 The bill kinda gave me gas.  The food is good, but very pricey.  I did have some actual food-related gas as well, but nothing to write home about.
It was a late Friday night around 8:45pm and we thought we'd spoil ourselves and give Tamarine a try. To our surprise, we were seated right away and quickly served by our waiter. Throughout our meal the waiter and busboy were very attentive in filling our glasses with water and asking us if the meal was going fine. As we were eating, we would get a few crumbs on the table, but when it was time for us to change plates, out came our busboy with his table crumber at hand to wipe off all the crumbs! That is definitely a sign of great service! The decor of the restaurant was very nice too, it was very modern and trendy looking. The place could probably use a little more light, as I prefer not eating in an almost dark environment. *Banh Mi Roti - Slightly on the oily side, but delicious never-the-less. The red panang curry sauce was more of a coconut flavor than curry. It's best to eat this with your hands, but then you'll have to go to the bathroom to wash your hands.  Or use your significant other's silk shirt.  Whatever's more convenient! *Tamarine Taste - Definitely a must try. It had a great variety of their appetizers (papaya salad, tea leaf beef, shrimp spring rolls and egg rolls. The egg rolls were piping hot when we got them and were delcious, especially if dipped in their sauce. The shrimp spring rolls are same thing you get at your typical Vietnamese restaurant. The papaya salad was quite refreshing and finally the tea leaf beef was ground up into the shape of a roll and was pretty soft. It would be good if they added a tad bit more flavor to that. One more thing to note, about the wonderful service here. The boyfriend was allergic to peanuts, and they topped the hoisin sauce with peanuts. I let our waiter know and he quickly brought out another small dish of the hoisin sauce without the peanuts! *Clay Pot Cod - The cod was very delicious and very very very soft. It basically melted in my mouth! The sauce they cooked this in was very flavorful and slightly sweet from the caramelization. Further, they topped the fish with these fried crunchy little things (probably fish fat), and although probably not good food for me, I ate every single piece! *Empress rice - This was definitely a flavorful rice dish, so if you're looking for something to offset the flavorful entree dishes, I would just get the jasmine rice. The egg was cooked perfectly with a slightly runny yolk and placed on top of the garlic/leek/ginger fried rice. Our waiter broke up the egg and mixed the rice for us upon serving it. The bottom of the plate this is served in is coated with this really yummy sauce, so make sure you swish the rice around the bottom of the plate to get the maximum flavor! This was slightly oily as is many other fried rices, but definitely worth a try.
Superb.  We had the tuna tartare appetizer, which was delicate, just the right spicy, and presented beautifully in a cococut half shell.   On to the mid-course of mushroom soup, which was just outstanding.  Clear soup with different types of mushrooms, a little spicy, a little hint of curry flavor.  Fabulous.  The empress rice impresses as the rice of the gods....beautiful sunny side up egg on top of the most delicious sticky rice ever.  I was floored.  The desserts are also top notch. This ambiance is another joy of this restaurant.  It is sleek , elegant color scheme of dark wood and sea foam green, with Vietnamese art hung all over the walls.  It pairs with the presentation of the food perfectly. A very memorable and tasty dining experience is to be had at Tamarine.
Pricey but lives up to reputation! Went for the first time on my birthday and the waiter was extremely nice and helpful with suggestions! Definitely better than Three Seasons which used to be one of my favorites. Before I go into my favorite dishes, I highly recommend making reservations, the place was packed on a Tuesday night at 9pm. Apps: Scallops are to die for and I don't even like scallops! Perfectly cooked with a sweet corn sauce. Shrimp cupcakes were buttery and a treat. Main Dishes: Shaking Beef was great - a favorite of our table. Duck was perfectly cooked and came with a refreshing rice. Sea bass was a recommendation from our waiter and a great one! Very light and perfectly encrusted. Extras: I LOVED their sticky rice - it was delicious and could easily be eaten on its own. Dessert: Banana Beignets were soooooo yummy! They were the perfect size and really delicious! Things I wouldn't get again.... The spring rolls were pretty standard - if you like spring rolls, go ahead but if you pass on them, you aren't missing too much. The garlic crab noodles should be renamed GINGER crab noodles because they had an extremely powerful ginger taste - a little too overpowering but a great amount of crab! I really look forward to dining at Tamarine again - definitely a place to eat at for a special occasion or when you just feel like treating yourself to great food, great service and great ambiance!
Amazing Vietnamese food.  Quite pricey but worth the splurge on occasion.  They have the most delicious desserts.  I highly recommend the chocolate won-tons (sounds weird, but they're fabulous) and the molten chocolate cake.  So good!  The main couses are great too.  The fresh spring rolls are spot-on.  Go here in a group and order lots of different dishes to share. Atmosphere:  Quite posh.  I came here for lunch once when school let out early and got a couple nasty looks from neighboring diners.  Though the food easily upstaged them and I heartily enjoyed my meal.
I always have a great dining experience at Tamarine.  I always have great food - I am partial to the calamari appetizer, the shaking beef and empress rice.  Love the lychee martini. I won't pretend it isn't expensive.  It is.  I also won't pretend that it's authentic Vietnamese cuisine.  It isn't.  But, if you're willing to lay out some cash and you want a great meal (and don't feel like hoofing it up to the city), I highly recommend Tamarine. Also, they have half-priced appetizers at the bar for happy hour.  Not too shabby.
Every time I come to this restaurant the hostess's are less than cordial.  The food seems to be getting worse.  Also, I made a reservation and still had to wait 40 minutes to be seated.
Talked a friend of mine into coming here for dinner today.  We scored a walk-in for 2 at around 6 PM with no trouble -- the host said it would be "in the back," but who cares?  At least in the back you don't get bugged by people or have people constantly walking by your table to get to the back.  Yeah. We ordered roti, caramelized prawns, shaking beef, green beans and Hainan rice. Roti: Have I ever met a roti I haven't liked?  (Actually, I take that back, I don't like Straits' roti as much as other rotis I have known.)  But the roti here were tasty.  Little crisp triangles served with curry sauce and another sauce that was less identifiable -- I had way more than my fair share of these.  Yum. Caramelized prawns: My friend thought these were too spicy, but I think she's a spice wuss.  I was imagining these would be in a slightly more, I dunno, unctuous sauce, but they were fine -- they were not nearly as good as the shaking beef, though.  I'm not sure I've ever met a shaking beef I didn't like, either (except for that time I tried to make it myself -- I just don't have the wok skills).  The shaking beef here was very tasty and tender, and definitely deserving of "let's save a piece to be the last thing I'll put in my mouth at dinner tonight" status. On the side: The green beans were slightly overcooked and slightly cooled-down when they arrived at our table -- I guess those were made first and had to wait for the beef or the prawns.  They were still pretty decent.  The Hainan rice was a nice change from plain, though maybe ordering it was unnecessary given all the flavors going on in the dishes.  Rice doesn't have to try to compete, dude. We had room to split a dessert at the end, so we got the caramelized chocolate banana mousse cake with banana caramel.  This was pretty damn good.  I don't adore bananas enough to order this every day of the week, now, but it hit the spot. We paid about $45 each with tip (no booze). And now I want more shaking beef.  Yum.
I have the fortunate luxury of dining here while on expenses.  If this is the way you roll then it's FIVE stars all the way! Otherwise it loses a star cuz it's freakin' expensive. The food here is excellent!  Let's start with the appetizer: sample rolls and calamari.  The rolls were pretty good, not a strong stand out.  But the calamari was very good.  They used large pieces of squid instead of what you'd normally get at say, an Italian restaurant.  Nice to have the slight change up. For entrees we had: sizzling beef, lamb chops, duck, sea bass, carmelized shrimp, and the wonton soup.  All the dishes were terrific.  The wontons in the soup were filled with crab meat.  They definitely didn't skimp on portions in each wonton -- sadly there were only four of them.  The shrimp and the beef weren't particularly special for me.  They were prepared well, but they weren't unique.  You could probably say that about the sea bass as well, but the cooks did an incredible job with it that it was one of the stand outs of the evening.  Similarly the lamb chop was cooked to a medium rare perfection.  The fusion of the Asian flavors and a western preparation made the duck dish my personal favorite.
There is nothing else I can add to give credence to this place. Last Saturday, my kindred spirited girlfriend and I decided to break bread here post-Cantor Museum afternoon inundation. We enjoyed the Hibiscus Martini, the jasmine rice served on Banana Leaf, the silver noodles with the perfect spices, ahi tuna apps, the spicy green beans side and the large prawns apps. Our cocktails were followed by a few glasses of red, our service staff excellent, the crowd predictable:  well, during prime time dining hours, the droves of your typical rich suburbia and obnoxiously bejeweled yet plain-minded folks arrived, while my free-thinking mind soared in conversation. The venue is great.  A good sister of Bong Su of SOMA in the city, in my terms, it's even better than Bong Su.
The food is two stars.  The service is 4 stars.  The characters at the community table are 5 stars.  Seriously, the best dinner conversation I've ever had.  I'll be back for the table alone and hope that whatever I try next on the menu is better.
Fabulous food and ambiance.  First timer.   Will definitely go again and again.
Absolutely great food at a great value! My roommate raved about this restaurant and I have never been one for Vietnamese fusion but this place did it right. My evening's plan of attack: Roasted Quail and Ha Long Bay Soup for appetizers- the waitress kept stressing the importance of squeezing the lime over the salt and pepper which did make the difference when not eaten with the Quail and the Ha Long Bay was a nice little twist on traditional Thai Tom Kha Gai soup. Shaking Beef and Com Dep Halibut- Shaking beef was pretty good, but the Halibut was great! I'm partial to Ong Choy aka Vietnamese Water Spinach but the fish was cooked perfect and most but flakey. Side of Empress rice- the waitress raved about this one but I thought it was so-so and thought the entrees each had plentiful sides. **Enclosed some pics for those who would like to salivate... I would definitely recommend this as a nice second date place. I'll have to make it over sometime for the half off happy hours.
The ambiance of the place was very nice.  Perfect for a date or even a night out with friends. The bar area was happening and I liked the fact that they had enough seats for people to sit on. For dinner, we ordered the following dishes: * Sweet Potato Fritters: these were delicious with the right crispiness! I would highly recommend this dish! * Papaya Salad: this dish was fine but I expected it to be a bit spicier. It was topped with beef jerky which was a nice surprise. * Crab with Garlic Glass Noodles: this dish was different and very tasty...and they were very generous with the crab meat...but beware of the giant ginger pieces. I bit into one thinking it was crab meat :)! hehe * Honey Miso Duck: the duck was perfectly cooked...moist and non-fatty. * Clay Pot Cod: probably one of my favorite dishes of the night. The cod was light and very tasty. * Long green beans: this was probably my least favorite dish...didn't have much taste to them. For dessert we shared an order of the beignets which came with vanilla ice cream. For everything we ordered, the bill cost a bit over $100...which isn't bad for all the food that we ordered.  I would definitely come back here again.
Calamari w/spring onion and cilantro + Mushroom Soup w/lemongrass + Basil Tofu + Masala Lamb Curry + Garlic Ginger Crab Noodles + 3 bowls of rice + Banana Beignet ----------------------------------------------- = a whole lotta yum and the demise of my size (*ahem... 24 :D) waistline
Most of this food is based on Vietnamese recipes, and this is the best Vietnamese restaurant EVER.  And I grew up in Little Saigon in Orange County (this is that last time I will ever admit that)!! Tamarine has taken the best Vietnamese dishes and has made them EVEN BETTER than how they would traditionally be made by a Vietnamese mother cooking at home.  Everything is upgraded (e.g., catfish is swapped out for Canadian cod), and everything is absolutely amazing!!  I wish I could eat here every night.  Maybe I should move to Palo Alto...
I've only been during happy hour 5-6:30.  I sat at the bar but was very impressed with the fast service and how quick the food came out. Versatile and appropriate for a nice dinner for family, friends or coworkers.  Great atmosphere for cocktails or entertaining your date in when you feel like extending the night to enjoy more of their company. All the food we ordered were fresh and full of flavor: - Banh Mi Roti ( like roti prata) - Tamarine taste ( the appetizer plate that includes tea leaf wrapped beef, spring rolls, and mini egg rolls, and papaya salad) - Honey roasted quail stuffed with sticky rice - Hamachi Tar Tar Wash down with an ice cold Mandarin Mojito....can't go wrong...
I have to say the food here is always great. I love it so much, I've actually gone out there for take-out. I can't say the same for service. That's the only reason I gave it 4-stars vs. 5. Yummy, yummy, yummy!
The food was good, but it wasn't spectacular.  I liked that the restaurant was family style since we went with a big group, but the portions were pretty small, which was a bit of a disappointment, especially since it was kind of expensive. The decor and the service were both fabulous though.  They changed our silverware between courses and refilled our water at good times, which is a major plus for me.  The wait staff also knew a lot about the menu and were very friendly. I probably wouldn't go again, but it was a good experience.
With any ethnic restaurant, the key is to look inside and see 1. if there's ANYONE inside eating, and then 2. if anyone there looks like they are from the ethnic background of what the restaurant claims its cuisine to be from. I don't think I saw many "Vietnamese" people at the restaurant, but it was definitely impressive with its decor, menu, and service.  I had heard a lot about how good this place was (from my Caucasian friends) and was excited to go there for my department's Christmas party.  All the food we ordered was delicious... I don't know about authentic, but definitely good, and expensive.  It helps when you're not paying for the bill, so if you're date's paying, come here ; )  Since my boss was there, I ordered a virgin mango mojito... mmmm. I think they have a very reasonable lunch menu, and would be curious to check that out!
Went to Tamarine for a work-related event.  Server:  "Would you like red wine or white wine?"  Me:  "Yes, please!" Food:  4 stars.  We did the banquet menu, which consisted of the salt & pepper calamari, hoisin pork skewers, tuna tartare, ha long bay soup (ha long you want?  five dolla, good time), grilled quail salad, tamarine prawns, ngo om chicken, shaking beef, curried long beans, and chili lime aubergine.  Everything was pretty good, with the standouts being the shaking beef, hoisin pork skewers, and chili lime aubergine.  I didn't like the texture of the salt & pepper calamari, but it was still okay. Service:  4 stars.  Aside from the fact that the servers were aggressive in trying to get us to order more drinks, service seemed smooth throughout the evening. Atmosphere:  4 stars.  Although not as pretty as its sister restaurant up north, Tamarine is still a knockout, considering it's in Palo Alto.  The darkly lit, elegant and casual space attracts a nice looking crowd. Hits:   Shaking beef, hoisin pork skewers, chili lime aubergine. Misses:  Salt & pepper calamari, being too close to Stanfurd. If You Like This Place, You'd Probably Like:  Bong Su, Slanted Door, Ana Mandara, Le Colonial.
Food is consistently good here, and reasonably priced.  However, if you're looking for a more casual and slightly cheaper fusion Viet restaurant, then Vung Tau in SJ could be a better choice for you.  I heard these two restaurants are somehow related.  I like Tamarine, because it's a good place that  you can take your date, impress your business partners, family gathering or hang out with friends here. Tamarine is always crowded, so I highly recommend making your reservation early!  My favorite dishes are tamarine Prawns and sea bass.
Why do for the imitation when you can have the original? I had recently dined at Bong Su and had the chance to experience Tamarine for a birthday dinner.  Even before the day, the staff was extremely accomodating, willing to fit in a group fo 15 people when our initial group was 11.  The interior is gorgeous and unlike Bong Su, the hostess were dressed appropriately.  The decor was beautiful and it was soothing to be inside. On our side of the table we ordered the papaya salad, shaking beef, calamari, mango tilapia, and asparagus.  The tilapia was the highlight of my meal on this day! This place is pretty pricey.  Our bill was about 55 pp and it was crazy!   I believe, for just my husband and I it would make a nice dinner out.  Our waitress was wonderful, suggesting a very good wine and helping us order the proper amount of food.
Some awesome menu items: Ha Long Bay Soup - the crab is stringy and packed into wontons and the soup is hot and tangy - mouth is watering right now just thinking about it :) Kaffir Lime Snapper - If you can deal with the appearance of a whole fish, this dish is delish - also tangy like the soup, with a touch of spiciness. Shaking Beef - Cooked just right with the beef tender and juicy, but other than that you get what you'd expect with shaking beef Place is expensive but it's Univ Ave, so in line with the other upscale venues.
All-time super fabu local fave... great food, great art, great drinks... not-so-great prices but hey, you can't have it all! This is my wife's and my favorite restaurant in Palo Alto -- whenever we can get a baby sitter. Which actually brings up a point for us breeders -- kids are welcome but it's not really well suited for children, especially wee ones. But if you're looking for a great place for a special night, this is it! At least in Palo Alto...
apart from shaking beef and the cod fish - nothing else is really worth trying. DO NOT ORDER empress rice if you hate sticky rice. be prepared for a wet bowl of carbs drenched in black sauce. the food was either too sweet or too saucy for my family's taste, almost as if to musk its lack of authenticity for an asian flavor. way too over hyped.
Great atmosphere and great food.  Only con is that it comes with the Palo Alto price tag. Here's a tip (in case it hasn't already been posted): same family owns Vung Tau in downtown San Jose, which has been around long before Tamarine.  A lot of cross over on the dishes and Vung Tau is cheaper ;)
The only reason I knocked off the elusive (to most, but not to me) 5th star is because this place is damn expensive! The boy planned a Friday night dinner for us here at Tamarine. Of course, we yelped it at home before going, drooled over the posted pictures, browsed their website for the menu... Upon arriving, we luckily found parking in a matter of minutes only a half a block away from University Ave. The decor and interior of the restaurant was very clean and understated. Very lovely lighting. We ordered the following: Citrus Soft Shell Crab (best dish of the night- flavorful and crispy) Shrimp Cupcakes (I saw 'cupcakes' and I said YES PLEASE) Banh Mi Roti (delicious, but oily as heck) Kurobota Pork Prime Rib (deceivingly large plate, meat was well seasoned, but a bit too fatty for my taste, yummy Vietnamese spinach) Garlic Rice Very romantic date place, quiet enough for good conversation. Honestly just a bit too pricey for what was being served. Although our meal was satisfying and tasty, I have to agree with yelper KL C. who marked Tamarine's "food authenticity" as a C.
I LOOOOOOOOOOVE this place. The first time I came here, my taste buds just about curled up and died from pleasure. I especially recommend the tuna tartare appetizer, the shaking beef, the seared duck (OMG, soooo good), and the empress rice. I seem to remember there used to be this halibut which was pan fried and DELICIOUS but it no longer seems to be on the menu. Please, treat yourself to a culinary adventure by giving Tamarine a try. It's not cheap, but it's definitely worth it! This is definitely top of my list when I want to take someone out for a celebratory dinner.
I like this restaurant, but I don't love it. The ambiance is fine.  It has a dark and velvety, sexy night out kind of vibe.  There's a large communal table near the entrance, and a private back room, where I've attended a company party.  There's also a second room between the two, where I think it's most desirable to sit if you're on a date or having a night out.  This place does get loud, so beware if you're trying to have an intimate evening. The service is also fine.  Attentive, friendly servers who refill your water glass without asking and are enthusiastic about the offerings.  They can get a bit miffed if you don't want to pay extra for "still" or "sparkling," though. The problem is the food and what you get for your money.  I've tried pretty much everything on the menu.  Most dishes are adequate, and a few are standouts:  papaya salad and shaking beef.  The cocktails are also well-made.  However, I don't believe you get good value for your money, which for me is a dealbreaker. I have to compare this to Three Seasons just down the street, which has extremely similar fare (and does a few dishes better - the rolls, for example).  You get much better value for your money there, and it's easier to tuck yourself into a table upstairs and have some privacy, where at Tamarine you have none. I won't come to Tamarine unless someone else is paying.  This is always the hallmark for me of whether a restaurant is "worth it."
Tamarine's is another Palo Alto restaurant that I don't mind traveling from Berkeley to eat at, with a friend. They serve very good cocktails and several different infused vodka drinks. My favorite cocktail is the Asian Pear. It's so good. The menu is more fusion than traditional Vietnamese cuisine. But just about everything on the menu is very good. From the Shiitake & Shrimp Dumplings to the Crab & Garlic noodles, you will not be disappointed. The decor is very quaint and very comfortable. For lunch there is a 1 hr power lunch menu if you need to be quick. But I would stay for desert. I particular recommend the Bourbon Bread Pudding, and the fried Banana Beignets with coconut ice cream. But don't worry about not being able to taste everything on the menu; you will return to this Vietnamese gem, in Palo Alto.
A friend told me that this place was upscale Indian so I thought oh good check it out.  Turns out it is Asian fusion which makes it a good alternative to the proximate but pricey Three Seasons in Palo Alto. I thought the food here was better than Three Seasons, and the atmosphere a step cooler.  We were seated pretty promptly at a shared table in the middle where we were entreated to some pseudo datees discussing some less than shared conversation which does not bear repeating in mixed yelpany. The service was great.  Our waitress was grand which is quite a change from snobby Three Seasons where you feel like an ahole if you try to get in without a reservation. We ordered a yummy licorice tasting bottle of white wine which complimented our papaya salad with quite a generous, although not so flavorful helping of papaya.  The roti and curry was really good and a nice change from the typical menu.  Roti and curry is a wonderful dish in Southeast Asia but I have yet to find it on an American menu.  We also had the black cod which my friend loved. For dessert we had two yummy things.  a chocolate lava cake which was one of the better chocolate lava cakes out there.  Many restaurants will try this dish, but it is difficult to find a phenomenal one.  We also had a non chocolate dessert that I can't recall. The waitress really cinched this review by giving us a free to go box of spring rolls because the kitchen closed.  Isn't that nice?  A plus for her.  I would recommend this place for good atmosphere and good food although I do think Asian fusion is everywhere.
So it's one of my cousin's wedding and they decide to have the reception at Tamarin. I arrive with my family, dressed in a cute and stylish dress, and was immediately greeted with a wide, happy smile. It made me smile automatically. I mean, I was already in a happy mood because c'mon, it's a wedding! And my cousin's wedding! How can you not be happy?! The bride and groom looked utterly fantastic and one of the maids (yup, more cousins! :D) told us to help ourselves to the buffet and bar and to find a seat. The place was crowded and I saw so much of my family!  But I made my way to the bar for a glass of wine. The bartenders were really nice and helpful, describing the various wines that were hosted by the happy couple. Delicious wines, of course! Now, onto the food. DELICIOUS. I can't say it enough. A lot of them were traditional Vietnamese food with a modern twist and were presented so beautifully that I totally made a pig out of myself. I loved the different spring rolls they had, the papaya salad, the coconut rice, the scallops and shrimp,  the lamb and so many other dishes. The servers were courteous and were wandering around with plates filled with delicious food. Very helpful when we're standing in the back room around the table of FANTASTIC wines that the groom's father personally picked out. The attendants at the table were very knowledgeable and helpful, pouring whatever wine we wanted. I had an unbelievable time seeing family and eating fantastic food. The service was so great. When one of the kids accidentally hurt themselves, the bartender immediately got me bandaids for her. Luckily for her, her booboo was patched up and given a kiss of love by her father and then the tasty desserts came out! Mango or coconut ice cream, lemongrass tapioca, wedding cake, banana beignets, OH MY! If I was ever looking for a fantastic restaurant to host my wedding reception, this place would be at the top of my list!
We came here for our 1st wedding anniversary and loved it so much...food is top notch and service was impeccable. Yes it's going to cost us our first child because it's not cheap, but you don't go to Denny's to recall that special day you looked into each other's eyes and said, "shit, i love the hell out of you." Supposedly they were thinking of opening a location in SF, but haven't heard anything since. But yes it is worth the drive down for food. And yes, watch people walk up to the double door and try to open it. Tip: Make reservations! This is not a walk in and get seated place.
I shouldn't have asked. I really shouldn't have. Sometimes it's better not to know. We would have had a perfect experience here if I hadn't asked what were those crunchy and flavorful translucent bits on top of the clay pot cod (which was so good).... it turned out to be bits of PORK FAT! There's no mention of this on the menu. Nonetheless, the overall meal here was great: Shaking beef - so tender and tasty beef cubes over salad greens - 5 stars Clay pot cod (before I found out they were pork fat bits on top) - 5 stars Clay pot code (after I found out they were pork fat bits on top) - 3 stars. At least mention it on the menu if you are going to include pork fat bits! Service - 4.5 stars Atmosphere - 3.5 stars - some of the tables for 2 are just too close to the adjoining tables. I felt like I was part of the conversation in the table next to us. But nice atmosphere overall. Bottom line: Pork fat. Ew. I think my arteries are clogging as I type. But otherwise a really great meat at Tamarine.
My girlfriend and I came in here for a bite and some wine around 9:30, almost closing time.  We ordered a relatively inexpensive bottle of Rose which was fruity and tasty. They even cork it for you and let you take it home. We started off with the tuna tartare app which was spicy and the crisp of the chips was a great accompaniment to the mushy tuna. Then we ordered the hoisin lamb chops. Minus one star for the chewiness of the meat. We ordered it medium, and it came cooked right but the quality of the meat just didnt do it for me. I like my lamb to melt in my mouth. The hoisin sauce was tasty however. Minus another star for feeling like we were being rushed by our server. It wasnt 10 yet, but our server said we had to order right then because the kitchen was closing.
I've come here for both lunch and dinner.  Everytime we come here, there is always a long wait list.  If you are coming with 4 or more, better to call in or do an open table. The decor is very nice.  The place is roomy and quiet to do a group dinner or a romantic dinner. The food here is very good, but for the price, the amount is not as much.  If you are in a large group, be sure to order 2 of everything then.  I had their filet mignon dish, which was very tasty.  Bold sauce and tender beef chunks.  We also ordered the pumpkin curry, which was just ok.  Their coconut rice is to die for.  I love a good coconut rice and this place def has it.  Be sure to order it! It has a perfect firmness to it, like Jasmine rice, with a hint of coconut.  It's not drenched or anything like that.  The coconut was so light yet so satisfying.  I can probably just go there and order a big bowl of coconut rice and be happy.
high class food from a 3rd world country... only in America. I came here with my aunts, uncles, and cousins all from Vietnam to give them a taste of what high-end Vietnamese food tastes like and they all loved it. it's all about bang for your buck. you get what you pay for in restaurants and yes its a $13 for a bowl of pho... but its Kobe beef pho. soft, tender cuts of meat cooked to perfection in the heat of the broth. the Shakin Beef (aka Bo Luc Lac in vietnamese) was also well seasoned and tasted great. The Ha Long Bay soup was a very different flavor - coconutty with hints of lime... not sure if i was a fan or not but it did taste good over white rice. Tamarind Prawns - we're very well cooked but lacked a wow factor overall. I've had better ones in Seattle. perhaps a hint of lime and pepper could have brought out the tang of the tamarind more. the Emperor's Rice was outstanding. fried egg served over easy atop a sticky fried rice. easily the favored dish of our party as we had 5 orders of it. one let down was that the meals were described as "family style portions" as most vietnamese dishes are (per tradition) however... the portions were NOT family portioned to what i would consider family style. perhaps each serving a family of two adults and one child and needing to order at least 3 dishes. for that reason - this place is short of 5 stars. outside of that, the atmosphere is nice, the decor is tastefully done. the staff is helpful and quick. pricer than what Vietnamese food should be - but because they used fresh ingredients i'd come back again. no reason why i would pay $10 for a shot at the club but not $10 for a good plate of food!
This happened last year at Tamarine but I am still telling people this story so I figure it probably belongs on Yelp. A guy friend (who I thought might have liked me but I wasn't really sure if he actually did. I also wasn't sure if I liked him...you know, it was your typical When Harry Met Sally conundrum) invited me to go to dinner at Tamarine. I had no idea it was such a chic, classy, upscale place that  I started thinking, "Oooh is this a date?" But, of course, I played it cool (I think). Midway through dinner, a party of three was seated behind my friend. They were a slim, mildly attractive woman in her 50s in a black dress; an athletic-looking man also in his 30s seated to her right; to her left, a man in his late 60s who was a dead-on mirror image of David Crosby, very very portly with stringy long white hair. They didn't look like they knew each other that well so I thought maybe the athletic-looking man was the woman's boyfriend and she was bringing him to meet faux David Crosby, who is probably her dad or uncle or something. He looked about the right age. I was trying to focus on what my friend is saying and trying not to wonder whether this is a date when all that effort went out of the window: the woman had leaned over and started kissing the athletic-looking man! I mean it was no small peck either...she really went for it. I thought, "Eeeew. That's pretty tacky." Finally the woman stops kissing the athletic man, so I started trying to tell my friend why I was staring at the people behind him.   But he doesn't get what I'm saying because I'm whispering and trying to be discreet. Meanwhile, the woman leans over to faux David Crosby as if to fix the collar of his shirt -- but then, THEY started to make out like crazy! At this point I just stopped trying to tell my friend what was going on because I couldn't believe it. Scandal in downtown Palo Alto!!! I have to give the waiters props because they did not bat an eye. They just left the threesome-of-a-certain-age alone for a little while and continued the dinner service as usual. But who was in heaven? Me, of course! I could hardly wait to tell my friends. Well I feel a little obligated to mention the food: I remember it being very good, with pristine presentation, especially the different kinds of rice that come in little bamboo baskets. I would still very much recommend this place for a date, a nice dinner,  a nice dinner that you hope to turn into a date, or a nice dinner you still don't know if it was a date. Plus, a little scandal never hurt anybody.
Tamarine has awesome food! I started off with a Mint/Ginger drink made with rum, which was very tasty. Everything we ordered turned out to be really good, although the Quail was small and I wasn't too impressed with it (maybe it was just the idea of eating our state bird that I wasn't impressed with!). They had some really good salads on the menu as well as a variety of different entrees. Tamarine has a nice atmosphere and really great food as long as you figure out how to enter through the front door (which is blocked by a large thick black curtain).
OK, so, time for an update.  I absolutely adore the bar here.  The staff behind the bar are awesome. David and Gary  always recognize me and my girls.  I've come in back several times since my first visit since I don't like to take a first experience that is moderate as the overall impression of the place.  So, I'm updating my rating.  We have now met the managers and they all have been quite attentive to us when we come in.  While we had one off experience with a gentleman at the bar one night in September that did get handled evidently. So, if you're looking a place to go and hangout and chill.  Do make this one of your choices.
OK, so I went here with one of my best buds for my birthday.  For starters,  if you ever want a... Read more 
Street parking available (but difficult during dinner hours). Parking structures everywhere but with a two block distance. It was difficult to find the front entrance because it was dark and there was a thick dark curtain covering the doors...but once you entered: it's very lively. Good alcohol selections! Our reservation for 14 was at 8pm but we didn't get seated until 8:25pm (it's Friday night so it's understandable). We had a fun waiter "Sam aka Tony" with a great sense of humor. Food came out in decent timeline... FOOD: -coconut flavored crab soup - very tasty -tuna tartare - decent (but can you really go wrong with tuna?) -roti - on the greasy side but the curry sauce dip was good -papaya salad - hmmm...ok -cod clay pot - VERY soft BUT EXTREMELY salty. VERY small tho =( -shakin beef - tender and tasty!!! -curry something - it was good -all the sticky rice was good -side orders of spinach, garlic noodles, sprouts - good -Desserts: chocolate molten cake (Yumm) OVERall: food was decent and the wait wasn't too bad. BUT it is over priced vietnamese food. Hence, it only deserves a 3star
The place exudes a pretty good warmth and class. But like many other things, I'm afraid it's reputation precedes it... and it doesn't quiiiite live up to that rep anymore. Hugely popular, it was actually kinda hard to get a reservation for two... on a Wednesday night. But, sure enough, upon arrival there, the place was jumping. The bar was full and every table occupied. And, after only a short wait, we were seated at an OK table. I say OK, because of the popularity we were almost in other patron's laps. Not comfortable with that, unless I'm playing Twister. I prefer a little more space when dining. The food was... pretty good. But I was not blown away. In my opinion, though it's not really in he same genre, New Krung Thai kicks Tamarine's Asian-flair keester, but has a few less bells and whistles. And if it's bells and whistles that Tamarine's counting on, the service is not keeping up very well with the popularity. Our waiter was kind enough, professional eeenough (barely) and as friendly as he could be during his short stints at our table. But, in all honesty the price-to-taste-to-service ratio wasn't good. Sorry. The rep took a beating. I can see why some patrons swear by its unique-ness... but again, even middle-of-the-road E&O Trading (downtown San Jose) offers up cuisine just as good or better. I won't avoid this place... if someone said meet there for a business lunch or something, OK. Maybe. But for a special dining experience, nahh. I even suggested we go up the street after dinner and get a Timeout Pizza from Madison & Fifth to go! Here, the Shaking Beef was quite good. Get the ginger-laced rice with it. The Tea Leaf Beef and the Papaya Salad both had great flavor. And the Imperial Roll left a pretty good impression too. But much of it needed heavy doses of sauce or seasoning at the table. Bland was too often the initial thought. I think that's what happens when a restaurant feels the need to be too careful. And that's kinda understandable. But, then again, this is supposed to be quasi-exotic fare, so... add that zing!! Everyone mentions the price, but I guess I'm getting a little numb to the notion. That's the way it is... and the way it should be at an upscale restaurant. I don't think the prices were too outta line here. I do think though that the rep can only sustain for so long. If the place is that popular (and it is) then the food and service better match up... and soon. It had the feel of ... OK, there are a lot of people here, make the food edible on the conservative side, get it out of he kitchen and serve it, as efficiently as possible. But with that equation, so goes its flair. NEXT!!
I haven't eaten here for about a year or so, but I had a great dining experience. Food was delicious, a little bit expensive. Great ambience. Great service. I would definitely come here again if I could. They also have a private room in the back. It looks like a good size for a birthday dinner party or so. Of course, I would call and inquire their specifics. Much much better than Three Season Vietnamese fusion restaurant a few blocks away. Actually, don't even compare the two because Tamarine is SO much better than Three Seasons in quality of food and service.
Great food, great ambience, great service! Their food, although claimed to be upscale vietnamese, tastes like chinese+korean, or Asian fusion.  It's best to go with a group of 4 so that you can order a few a la carte dishes to share along with rice. Their service is also superb... I heard the servers are mostly actor/actress-preps.  The servers are very well educated.
Delicious food. The service is awesome especially if you sit at the big table next to the bar. Thanks for the great evenings there. Looking forward to the new items on the menu.
GORGEOUS. Gorgeous food, interior, everything. If you must have dinner in Palo Alto, dine at Tamarine.
High end Vietnamese. Hands down my favorite restaurant in Palo Alto.   This place is dangerous for me because I tend to want to eat everything on the menu. The decor is beautiful.  I think I like the idea of their "communal" tables over the actual implementation. The food is to die for.   Catfish skewers.  Crab Soup. Hoisin lamb chops.  Shaking Beef.  Enough said.   This restaurant is meant to be enjoyed family style. Good specialty cocktails, wine list and knowledgeable, friendly bartenders. I like to eat at the counter as well as at tables.   It can get crowded.
Upon entering the restaurant, my friend and I were greeted by the most amateurish and condescending blonde host I've ever encountered. No, really.  She inquires whether or not we have reservations [mind you it's just a hair after 6pm and not too terribly packed yet] we reply no.   This is where the attitude really starts.  This MAYBE 19-20 year old then passes us over to the second host, who while a bit better has no more personality than a surf board, and leads us back to a group table. [this is a long table they have by the bar that they just seat people at]  It just means you'll be sitting next to someone as if at a bar - only you can look across to the person you with] Anyway.. our waitress comes over and is extremely pleasant and friendly. [Our saving grace, because frankly I was completely appauled by our first interaction]  Everyone else on the wait staff was really helpful - so our night improved. We ordered the calamari and hamachi tartare for an appetizer. Both were AMAZING. I expect to enjoy the hamachi the most out of the two only to find that the way the prepare their calamari and the dipping sauce that was paired with it, far surpassed the hamachi. For dinner we ordered the Tamarine garlic noodles and crab. The crab was tasty, the noodles were so-so. Mainly because of the overwhelming ginger taste. I HATE ginger... plus I mistook two HUGE ginger roots for crab.  We also ordered the shaking beef [super tasty] and two types of rice [red and jasmine].  The red was excellent. Similar to a spanish rice. We also ordered dessert - the bananas beignet[sp] and the seasonal sorbets [GREEN APPLE (wow), lemon-lime or something like that, and mango -banana].  Both were extremely tasty. Both the glenlivet and the sapphire tonics we each had were served stiff. A plus, but boy did they catch up with us. All in all, it turned out to be a good choice.
Went here for the first time on a date. I swear every man was wearing a collared shirt, which was kinda hot. The ambiance was great. Dim lighting and spacious tables. It got a little loud but that was because there was a huge family style table of 15 in back of us. I wouldn't call this a romantic place just because it was dimly light, but rather a great place to eat out and dress up. The food was amazing. We had the hamachi tartar which was incredible. It was not overloaded with hamachi but rather, had a great mix of everything. We had the lemon grass rice, which was a great side and was something new than having regular jasmine rice. We had the clay cod pot and the mushrooms. Great balance, not too much and not too little. Great Asian fusion food, great ambiance, and service.
When most places describe their food as fusion, its almost always seemingly sound more attractive than the end results.  Sometimes it's a difficult line to walk as one needs to highlight the accents of both cuisines and not make it just a mish-mash. Tamarine does a wonderful job of keeping the Vietnamese portion of their food as a home base while reaching out to neighboring cuisines to add that extra layer of flavor. Some of the memorable dishes include their crab dumpling soup, the steamed halibut with black bean sauce, and their Vietnamese Beouff. A quick tip: Definitely make sure you make reservations for dinner as the restaurant gets extremely busy!
I've been to Tamarine many times, and have always been really pleased by the food and solid service. If you've been to Bong Su in San Francisco, Tamarine is her suburban cousin - a bit less edgy with an older crowd - but lovely to be sure. Cutting to the chase, the best dishes: black cod, shaking beef, lamb chops, roti, papaya salad, tuna tartare. The biggest disappointment: glass noodles with crab. Like Bong Su, Tamarine features some great cocktails - the sake-tini is fresh and fun. They also boast an extensive, power-packed wine list. Finally, if you like tea, they have some great ones here - I recommend the vanilla bean black tea. Dessert is a lot better than you'd probably expect from a Vietnamese restaurant, but you won't die if you skip it. The butterscotch pot de creme is good, and I think less rich (in a positive way) than some similar varieties at other restaurants. My one and only gripe is that after the end of our meal for a 9:30 reservation, we felt very rushed out by the staff (not our waiter, however). It was 11:30 - which for a table of 4 who had drinks, appetizers, entrees, dessert, and tea - seems reasonable, and certainly expensive enough, to have cut us a little slack.
Came here again on a random Wednesday night with an 8:30PM reservation. We had to wait around 15 minutes for a table which was somewhat annoying, but I guess I'm overlooking that because again, the food was stellar. For starters, the calamari was excellent. Nice pieces of octpous with a great batter. Much better than your seafood joint. Main courses included the empress rice, shaking beef, and clay pot cod. I wouldn't deviate from these three as they're all fantastic dishes. The black cod just melts in your mouth and the sauce goes really well with rice. The beef is really tender and not dry at all. Definitely make a reservation for dinner. If I were to recommend a nice place to eat in Palo Alto, this would be it.
Incredible food - can't believe it took me 5 years of living in the Bay Area to come here. As others... Read more 
I love this place.  Yes, it's expensive vietnamese food, but it's also very tasty.  I tend to stay away from some of the "classic" vietnamese dishes on the menu like the rolls, I can get that in San Jose much cheaper.  Tamarine excels at "fusion." The wild boar used to be the standout dish.  Now I like the empress rice, lamb chops and all of their noodle dishes.
Unfortunately, this place has gone downhill since my last raving review. The quality of food just isn't as good as it used to be. Even the shaking beef, which used to be out of this world, doesn't do it for me anymore. The wait time is still long and what should be a 1 - 1.5 hr dinner turns into a 3 hour experience. We were forgiving the first time it happened because anyone can have an off-day, but now it's a consistent occurrence. Also, on our most recent visit, they never boxed up our coconut rice, which I specifically requested. Too bad I only realized it after I got home. So minus 1 star for that.
I've been to Tamarine a couple of times and tried different things on the menu and had a great... Read more 
I have to admit that I am very hesitant of upscale Asian joints. Usually because they are really bland (Vietnamese: Citronelle), or just plain bad ("Chinese:" P.F. Chang's). After many years of driving by this place, I finally tried it for lunch today. I will give this place a 3.5 and here is why: The ambiance is great. I love the decor. Service is great as well. Our waiter was friendly, but genuine; not over the top fake. We ordered: Lemonade -the real deal, not the syrup filled kind in the grocery store. Papaya salad - this was okay. Maybe I'm just not into papaya salads. It had a good amount of flavor. Wok pho noodles - This was pretty tasty. A little sweet as well. Sea bass - I only had a bite, but it was tender and seasoned well. Shaking beef - filet mignon marinated in soy sauce/garlic, etc. The meat was cooked perfectly. Tender and medium rare like I asked. Seasoning was great. But the spinach salad underneath did not go well together. Had they been separate, it would have been fine. This dish was $21 for a small piece of filet mignon cut into cubes. Given the easy marinade, I'm sure I could figure out how to make this at home. Hainan rice - this was okay. Keep in mind the rice here is sticky. I like drier/long grained rice better. (chicken stock, garlic) Festive rice - this had tons of flavor. I really enjoyed eating this, even by itself. (turmeric, ginger, cinnamon) Chocolate wontons - they used real bittersweet chocolate which is great because that is the only chocolate I like. They also added a bit of banana which always goes well with chocolate. I could do away with the mint. I didn't like it with this combo. These were okay but prefer butternut squash wontons. And chocolate wontons are SO easy to make at home. $8 for three? Not worth it in my book. Presentation was great. So why the 3.5 stars you ask? Because I can't see myself paying this much for decent Vietnamese food if I can just go to other restaurants that cook the food just as good (if not better) for half the price. (Total bill was about $92 for three people). What you pay for here is the ambiance and pretty plates/presentation. I may go back if my friends feel like it. Decent food but I don't think my stomach will be screaming to go back.
My experience was probaly 3.5 stars, but I'll give them the benefit of the doubt. As others note, the interior is well done. I was a tad annoyed they seated us at the row of tables all squished together when 2/3 of the back room with real tables was open, but not enough to move since we had cocktails delivered. Its definately a good place for a a date, dress up night, or other occasions. I need to either there again for a 2nd sampling before I am completely sold, but its solid bet.
Big fan of Tamarine as I always have a great meal here and really enjoy the atmosphere and ambiance of the place.  I like Tamarine just slightly more than its sister restaurant Bong Su up in SF.  But both continue to have a strong line-up of starters, great cocktails and solid entrees. This is another one of those places where I could order the entire appetizer menu and be totally satisfied.
Whoa! Asian fusion food that doesn't suck.... Being an asian...its quite rare to find an asian fusion restaurant that you feel is worth the typical inflated prices.  Often times, the food is dry and flavorless.  So as you can tell, I was quite skeptical of eating at Tamarine the moment I heard it was an asian fusion restaurant. However, I was pleasantly surprised after I ate here.  The food portions were just right and wasn't too heavy.  As with many reviews, the "it" item to get here is the shaking beef.  Meat was moist and now chewy as most beef dishes.  It felt like it was melting in your mouth.  Other notable dishes that I had was the Banh Bap and Empress Rice.  The Banh Bap was actually one of the bigger hits with me particularly.  Something about the combination of the pulled pork and corn really hit the spot for me.  I probably could've been eating this all night and still be a happy camper.  =) One thing I do have to call out was the service.  Although I can't remember the name of the waiter, he really helped improve the dining experience.  Finding a good server who is knowledgeable about their menu is hard to find.  He knew the items and made some great recommendations and based on our party size. The overall experience was great with fair prices.  For the party size we had (8 ppl), the venue was nice and comfortable.  I can also see this place being nice for a date night if you're looking to impress someone special.  Kudos to you Tamarine!
I was lucky enough to be treated to a work-related team-building dinner here (read: not my pocketbook).  Nonetheless...the food and ambiance were fantastic. Highlights: exquisitely tender shaking beef, simply amazing grilled, juicy smokey perfectly cooked lamb, fantastic fried calamari I could not stop eating... fragrant rice served in individual servings of cunning little banana-leaf-lined baskets ... The off-notes - the giant prawns were perhaps, not the freshest they could be; and some co-workers complained that the fried banana beignets tasted as if they had been fried in recycled fish(?) oil ...(I had a taste, thought the flavours savoury and fine...). Perhaps my memory is a bit hazy due to the excellent wine that flowed (hooray, wine-savvy boss! hooray, expense accounts!) a bit too freely, but indeed, this is definitely a type of place I'd recommend to friends.  I want to go back with the boy and we will definitely seek out sister restaurant Bong Su in SF.
Hands down one of the best restaurants in the Peninsula and easily the best Vietnamese in the SF Bay Area! You cannot go wrong with any item on their extensive menu.  Among my personal favorites are the Shaking Beef and Wok Pho Noodles.  They compliment their dishes with an impressive wine selection and drinks from their stylish bar. Am I the only one who feels like I'm at a swanky high-class restaurant in  Las Vegas when I dine here?  The design is gorgeous and rich, the service is phenomenal, and the ambience is very tranquil and chill... just my style.  Tamerine is pricey, but definitely worth the experience.
As someone who has lived in Asia for the past twenty years, I was pleasantly surprised by the tastiness of the food at Tamarind.  Some dishes like the sea bass were excellent; others like the empress rice and string beans were a bit heavy and over-complicated.  Sommelier knew his California pinots and made an excellent recommendation. Restaurant was packed on a Monday night, which is always a good sign.   Would go back for tasty, not necessarily most authentic, Asian fare.
Cod in the clay pot = why are you so amazing? Even the rice was distinctly delicious, and typically rice is just rice. Pricey, but nice environment if you get to sit in the back room -- the front area, particularly around that communal table gets quite noisy during peak dinner hours. I want to try its sister restaurant in SF, Bong Su.
I can't tell the difference between Vietnamese cuisine they serve here and the Chinese cuisine they serve at Sino or Straits, but hey, I'm not complaining. Nice ambiance, nice service and yummy food.  Especially the jasmine rice wrapped in lotus leaf. *Drool*
Two words: Empress Rice. Holy cow. I need to add that to my "last meals on earth" list. Awesome fish dishes here - lemongrass bass, claypot cod, mmmm. Things that bum me out about this place: - I can never use opentable for a reservation. I don't know how opentable works, but my guess is that the restaurant gives a certain amount of reservations to opentable. Needless to say, I can never get a table through opentable; I have to call, leave a message, and wait for someone to call me back. Lame. - Their drinks are weak. My favorite drink of all time, lychee martini, is served here. But man, I could drink 10 and still walk home, in heels. I always have to say, "Next time, can you tell the bar tender to not make it so "sweet?"
I was last at Tamarine 3 years ago and the only impression it left was that it was quite expensive for what you get. The food was ok, but definitely not memorable. At this price point, you'd want to have better recall of the evening. Anyway, I was back for a work function. The service was quite good and the food was...ok. Again, nothing spectacular and nothing you'd want to spit out. Some of the food highlights: Shaking beef Fish in clay pot Sea bass (I think?) with lemongrass Lowlights: Uneven appetizer sampler - fresh roles were boring, but green papaya salad with beef was interesting and tasty, though a bit salty. Fried rolls were total throw-away. No flavor at all. Calamari - not good at all. Had an off-taste. Unless someone insisted, I don't see coming back. Nothing here is that interesting.
It's always packed. Always expensive there. Always too laud people are there. Yet it's always great!!
One of my favorite restaurants in Palo Alto. We've been here to celebrate birthdays or when we want to have a good meal and drinks. Tamarine has a cozy ambience, but their tables for two are a bit too close to each other.  That's probably the only negative I have of the place. Regardless, their food is wonderful.  I love tartare and theirs is  good.   We always order the Crab and Garlic Noodles, Shaking Beef, and Tamarine Prawns.   The food is served family style. For a nice night out, this is a good choice.
Are you in your 50s and have a penchant for animal print?  Or are you in your early 20s and on an awkward Match date? Then this place is for you!  Don't get me wrong - other types can go here too, but they will be in the minority, probably finding themselves dodging the random perfume spritzes from the cougars in the corner. OK, I like the food, but it's too expensive and totally not Vietnamese. The roti, nothing like any roti I've ever eaten before, is the oiliest, most fried, but most DELICIOUS thing ever. The shrimp cupcakes not only have an awesome name, but taste like Cheetos. That's not a complaint at all. The Empress Rice cooked its OWN egg. How many dishes can say that? A few things did bum me out, like the dry tofu with burnt basil leaves and the cost of the bill. Also, I'm not a big fan of the Palo Alto scene, with its awkward single-and-loving-it vibe, so I'm not likely to return.
My girlfriend and I came to Tamarine with high expectations.  The location was certainly inconspicuous with only a lighted sign on the outside.  However the decor inside was clearly decadent and made me reminiscent of NY restaurants with the option of "shared tables".  We started our dinner with a sparkling pear cider and a peach sangria which were both very good  and proceeded to order the following: *Banh Mi Roti:  Pan Fried Wheat Bread served with red panang curry sauce *Hobo's Purse Soup:  Cabbage Dumplings of Pork, noodles in a chick broth *Pineapple Sea Bass:  Whole Fried Filet served with a black bean and ginger sauce *Ginger Caramelized Chicken *Hainan Rice:  Rice infused with Chicken Stock *Coconut Tapioca The first two appetizers were delicious, the soup was especially good and reminded me of a good, authentic home soup.  The Main Courses, however, were a disaster.  The Pineapple Sea Bass and the Ginger Caramelized Chicken were both a huge disappointment in that the flavors were off and didn't seem to go together.  Perhaps the worst was the hainan rice in which they steamed with a piece of licorice on top, infusing the entire pot of rice with not the chicken flavored promised, but the licorice!  Talk about an absolutely disgusting combination of flavors! The only thing that saved the meal was the dessert in which the coconut tapioca and mango icecream literally saved my rating of this restaurant. If you want good Asian Fusion which is worth the $30 some dollars you pay per dish, go down the street to Three Seasons Restaurant where all the dishes are delicious and memorable!
Last minute reservations and the staff was very accommodating to our needs. I called in to reserve a time on their voicemail and was immediately called back with the next available time slot. The restaurant is located on University Ave and right on the strip so it is close to shopping, bars, etc. It is a mixed crowd- everything from young tech people, to "mature" couples sipping on wine. The crowd seemed a lot older than most other fusion types of restaurants I have dined at which I don't mind. We have never dined here before so we totally winged it based on our own tastes.  We ordered the following: Meal for two: shrimp spring rolls tamarine taste kobe beef pho tea leaf beef tuna tartare kaffir lime snapper empress rice Dessert : fried banana with coconut ice cream Drinks (2 each) sangria/ mango mojito If you are curious, the meal was not too expensive at around $190 (including tip) total for the both of us. We ordered a lot, small portions, but we were absolutely stuffed afterwards. Food was excellent, service was even better, and the ambiance was very romantic even though I was eating with my dear friend. I think she enjoyed her meal as well, but we ate it way too fast. I have no complaints. I'll come back for more soon.
went there for the Lemon grass martini,which my friend keeps raving about but found out that the drink was discontinued now :( :( The waitress-Tammy was so sweet and got us a close substitute. We had the ginger martini and it was really good. We had the Roti Prata,garlic noodles and Tofu basil...the tofu basil was superb. I surely liked this place.Thanks Tammy
Over priced for the amount of food. Service was fair and they seemed a bit pretentious.
I happen to be a big fan of South Asian cuisine and Vietnamese is one of my absolute favorites.  Tamarine is a fairly 'high brow' restaurant (even by Palo Alto standards) that can come off a bit snobby considering the area's laid back atmosphere, but never fails to serve absolutely outstanding dishes.  The Shaking Beef is one of my favorites and is succulent and very flavorful.  Try the Banh Mi Roti (flat bread with a curry dipping sauce), the calamari, or the spring rolls as appetizers.  You can't go wrong with any of them.  My wife's favorite is the Crab & Garlic Glass Noodles which come with generous chunks of succulent crab (be careful not to bite in to a big chunk of ginger, though!). Aside from being a little overly 'shiek", the only real downside is the price.  Definitely on the high end with the total bill coming out to around $80 for us including appetizers, entrees, and one drink each. Regardless,  I decided to give Tamarine a 5-star rating anyways.  The food is absolutely amazing and it's a pleasure to dine there even if my wallet is significantly lighter when I leave.
Nice atmosphere, quiet and calm. Seated promptly walking in on a Tuesday night. Mainly Americanized Vietnamese food, good size menu, lots of selection. Shrimp Cupcakes were tasty, prawns were good, had nice coconut flavor, slightly salty but still good. Crab and garlic glass noodles reminded me of filipino noodles but better because of he crab. Peppercorn Hanger Steak was cooked perfectly. I would definitely go back.
The first thing you notice when you walk into Tamarine is how beautiful the place is.  From the rough hewn surface of the jade bar to the smooth paneling and art on the walls, you immediately feel like your someplace special. Even with a reservation you may have to wait a few minutes, so you may as well make yourself at home at the beautiful Jade Bar.  The cocktail menu has plenty of tasty concoctions to fire up your taste buds before dinner.  I recommend the Asian Pear Bellini.  Served with a cinnamon-sugar mix on the rim, it sets off the flavorful mix just right. I opted for a table in the private dining room space, though everyone sitting at the large communal tables in the front room seemed to be having a great time, some even with the total strangers sitting next to them.  The private dining space has wonderful ambiance with the slightly dimmed lights. Food: We started with the hamachi appetizer which was absolutely delicious.  A brilliant blend of soft fish and thin section of crunch pepper.  The bits of citrus fruit added a delightful sweet/tart note that really pulled the whole dish together nicely. After that we split the King Crab Soup and the Shaking Beef.  Incredible.  The soup was full of succulent seafood and the shaking beef was so tender and delicious it practically melts in your mouth.  Presentation was solid, flavor and texture were singing in perfect harmony, and the whole experience was superb.  I simply cannot wait to return to try more from the mouth-watering menu.
We hosted a work event here recently and organised a set meal to keep things simple for the 20 guests. We were seated separately in the back of the restaurant behind a large velvet curtain. First impression is that it's very dark and sexy, the best way to describe it. Drinks were pretty awesome, there was a cocktail with chili in it, watch as it might burn your lips. Cocktail selection was decent and I was happy with the gin. The Bahn Mi Roti and Shrimp Cupcakes were great starters, the cupcakes are made with coconut milk so are a little on the sweet side but I prefer that. Honey-Soy Roti Chicken was excellent, it was tender and slightly spicy but balanced out with the sweetness of the honey. Service was fine and I have no idea about cost since I never saw the bill.
If only the prices weren't so high I'd give it a 5 star. Vietnamese food just shouldn't be this expensive. Yes, it's got a fancy flair to things but if you go to sunnyvale the same dishes without the formal interior would be about 1/4th the price. Nonetheless if you have an important business lunch or dinner, this is the power spot in silicon valley. You'll find every Venture Capitalist, and entrepreneur scoring a free dinner from that VC eating there. The seabass is awesome, the shaking beef, and coconut rice are all good. I don't think I've had a dish there that I thought was meh. I really like the papaya salad as it's traditional vietnamese style, banh mi Roti has a great curry sauce to dip in that I try to get every drop of.  Dont' forget to order the garlic noodles. Get reservations though, it's pretty much always busy.
Great food!!! My husband's lamb chops were very well cooked. I had something vegetarian which was very tasty as well. Ambiance is perfect for a romantic dinner :)
This place rocks and is my favorite restaurant, and the food here is exceptional with excellent service. They are beautifully presented in the center of the table. Steamed rice comes wrapped in a banana leaf. The entrance to this place is sometimes hidden behind a thick curtain, giving you a feeling of entering a forbidden domain. It's upscale asian fusion done well. You can enjoy fairly private dining or join a communal table and meet new people. The chopsticks feel nice in your hand, some sort of smooth hardwood. The dessert menu is a bit fussy. Walk off the amazing prawns and grab dessert down the street.
Tamarine is an upscale restaurant. The food is exquisite vietnamese. You don't get large plates of food, but what you get you will like, so get a bunch of plates and share. Don't miss the calamari appetizer with the divine lime dipping sauce!  Try the Shaking Beef and the infused rice. The bar has a great selection of wines and martinis.
I'm not sure why it is but Noveau/French inspired Vietnamese food in NorCal just doesn't cut it for me. I guess after being exposed to so many good places in SoCal it might be unfair. On the flip side SoCal traditional Vietnamese cuisine is not as good as it is in NorCal. Yin and Yang I guess. Anyways, for the prices, I can't justify coming back here. The food is only ok and the portions are quite small. They definitely do one thing right which is target the Palo Alto audience. Nice decor, well desgined space, it just reeks fancy. The same family own/operate Vung Tau in San Jose & Milpitas, which is one of the best traditional Vietnamese  restaurants of all time. I had hopes for Tamarine and it just didn't live up to expectations.
I went to Tamarine on a Tuesday night and I was surprised at how crowded it was. Our table wasn't ready yet so we headed to the bar for a drink. Tried the mojito -- it was good but maybe because I've been craving one for a while. I actually think Cheesecake Factory makes a better mojito. We ordered quite a bit -- papaya salad, shrimp cupcakes, wok pho noodles, shaking beef, some chicken dish I forgot the name of, and jasmine rice. It would have been nice if our waitress told us that would be more than enough for 2, especially after the looks we got from other diners sitting next to us, haha. The papaya salad was excellent, just like how my mom makes it at home. The shrimp cupcakes were actually a variation of a traditional dish from Hue. I find it amusing to see how they completely change the names of dishes, like shaking beef, but I guess that helps spare people the trouble of trying to pronounce foreign words. Both dishes were delicious as well. I wasn't a fan of the chicken dish; I'm picky with my meat [I don't like dark meat] so maybe that's why. The wok pho noodles were disappointing because 1) they were definitely not pho noodles -- they were chow fun noodles, and 2) chow fun is a lot better at Chinese restaurants for less than half the price. The service was excellent -- our waitress came by to check up on us enough where it wasn't annoying, our water glasses were kept full, and the food came out at a reasonable time. For a nicer dinner out, I would definitely come here again. And I would definitely make sure not to order enough food to feed a whole family!
Had dinner here with my db and his family (Christine T. included) and I was pretty impressed last Saturday. What a wonderful dining experience.  I wanted to order so many things!! Si glad we dined  in a group, so I was able to sample everything.  All the dishes had great flavor, I didn't find one I didn't like.   Service was friendly and attentive.  I'd definitely go back for a nice romantic dinner with my db. :) I did notice they didn't have decaf coffee, I kinda felt bad  for all the decaf coffee drinkers. OH!  Tamarine really should redo their doors, I keep seeing people try to open the wrong doors (something I woud've done) or at least put a big arrow to show where the real doors are.
Came here on a company-sponsored dinner due to raving reviews from fellow Yelpers! :) Salt & Pepper Calamari - 4 stars - Big portions, nicely flavored - not too salty, perfectly cooked! Soft Shell Crab Rolls - 4 stars - Reminded me of soft shell crab in a Japanese restaurant with a Vietnamese wrapper! Delicious! :) Papaya Salad - 3.5 stars - I'm usually not a huge fan of papaya and I must say this salad tasted okay. It was slightly spicy and had a strong sesame oil taste. Tamarine Prawns - 4 stars - Perfectly-cooked 5 prawns over a bed of crispy noodles. Lentil Duck - 3 stars - I'm used to duck being very greasy with tons of fat. This duck was lean and skinless with a taste of citrus... Basil Tofu - 4 stars - I am usually not a huge fan of tofu. This dish definitely put my preferences aside as it was delicious! :) Service was great although the waitress was slightly MIA after our food came out. She also seemed a little stunned when we told her that we were okay with water, ie no alcoholic drinks! We had expectations that it would come out to $50+ per person and was pleasantly surprised when it merely came out to be ~$40/person after tax and tips!! :D
From the moment you walk in, the service is great. We were welcomed with smiles, so it was a nice first impression coming in through the hidden doors. Seriously, we walked past the place trying to find the entrance. Luckily there was a man walking in past the curtain-like entrance that hid  a glass door. The restaurant was almost packed at 6:30pm on a Saturday night. We made reservations and were seated promptly. Our server was pleasant and attentive. We ordered the Banh Mi Roti, which was good, but not great. I was expecting a roll of bread or something, but it came with two thick pieces of roti and a red curry? sauce. Shaking beef- Really good, you can really taste the garlic and soysauce, and the salad that comes on the side is delicious too. Honey-Soy Roti Chicken- this was good, but not as good as the shaking beef. It was perfectly cooked and seasoned, and came with a medium-spicy papaya salad, and sticky rice. Peach Sangria- Delicious. When the server brought the food to our table, he placed everything in the middle, and we each had an empty plate in front of us. I guess it is like a family style meal. For two people, an appetizer, two entrees, side of rice and a vegetable dish would suffice. Next time I go, I will order more food! Since we weren't completely full off the meal, since portions are small, we grabbed some dessert elsewhere.
I always passed by this place since it's the first noticeable restaurant on University...and I'm officially a fan! I liked the ambiance. A bit trendy but still modern and elegant. This place is packed, even on weekdays.... their food options were good, and you can get away with spending very little..or plenty. There are a variety of dishes, and I suppose if you go tapas style, you're going to end up spending a lot. Out of the variety of dishes, my favorite was the Clay Pot Cod. It was melt-in-your-mouth buttery and very savory. Delicious and looking forward to coming again soon. Starters are $8-12 Soups Noodles: $10-$20 Entrees: $15-30
I came here with the bf for dinner. We were very pleased with the outcome. We started off with the tuna tartare and salt & pepper calamari. For entrees, we ordered the lemongrass seabass, shaking beef , brandy peppercorn duck and wok fried garlic noodles accompanied with coconut rice and jasmine rice. Food was delicious and service was pretty decent.
Does anyone else remember it as Tam's back in the day (circa 1997) in Milpitas?  This is an upgraded, contemporary, more westernized version of my old favorite. It was surprisingly crowded for a Wednesday night, especially since it's located on the quieter end of University Ave.  Unfortunately, this also meant service was less polished than ideal.  Food came out at a good pace, but it took us about an hour to order our entrees (the point when we were pretty much done with our appetizers). I'd definitely recommend ordering some appetizers for the table.  Unlike at most other Asian restaurants, I think it's better not to order entrees family style here.  They're more portioned to be done individually, and at least in our big group, everyone had such different taste preferences. We started with the half moon buns, which were like the buns from peking duck but stuffed with char siu pork, which wasn't overly fatty.  The scallop fritters had a nice crust outside, but the inside had some hollow spots.  Roti was crispy and fluffy in the right places, but the curry sauce was a little on the heavy side.  The papaya salad was my favorite, which was light and thinly sliced young papaya, topped with sweet dried marinated shredded beef - it was refreshing but had a lot of flavors and textures to it. As for sides to share, the garlic rice is greasy but so flavorful.  The presentation of the jasmine rice is also special in a wrapped up leaf.  Garlic noodles were standard.  The brussels sprouts are the most amazing - caramelized and sweet, topped with bacon, no bitterness at all. I ended up getting a salad for my entree, which was the nha trang salad.  Unfortunately, my scallops and mussels were substituted with a lot of calamari, which I'm not a huge fan of, and I wasn't informed ahead of time about this.  The clay pot cod looked really good, and I remember they did clay pot dishes well at the old place, so maybe I should have gone for that, instead. I didn't expect for Tamarine to be anything like the original Tam's that I loved so much when I was in high school.  Food here is definitely solid, and everything tastes pretty clean and authentic despite the lively contemporary atmosphere.  Had the service been less spotty that night, it would have made the experience much better.
Excellent food.  Probably some of the best in Palo Alto.  I've eaten here numerous times.  You really can't go wrong with anything on the menu.  My favorite is the calamari appetizer--the lime dipping sauce is amazing!  Chic, intimate ambiance.  This is definitely a great place to take a date. However, I feel compelled to give this place four stars instead of five because its overall price performance is not what it could be.  Don't get me wrong:  the food is good.  In my opinion, though, the prices are a little too high and the portions are a little too small.  The entrees are served on "small plates"--and, when they use that term, they aren't kidding.  If you go to this restaurant hungry, you'll have to order quite a bit to feel full. If you want a slightly more economical restaurant (but still relatively nice), I suggest Straits Cafe, which is just down El Camino Real.  It serves Asian (specifically, Singaporean) food and its ambiance is nice.  Overall, it's comparable to Tamarine, although it's a tad less chic.  Go to Tamarine if you're looking to impress someone. Also, you might also consider Three Seasons Restaurants, which is nearby.  It, too, is a trendy Vietnamese restaurant.  I've only eaten there once, but the food there was also excellent.  If my memory serves me correctly, the prices there are just as high as they are at Tamarine, but the portions are a little larger.  Three Seasons's physical space is a lot larger than Tamarine's (or seems to be), so the atmosphere there is a little less intimate than it is at Tamarine.
Taste. Chew. Grin. Drink. Leave happy and without $$$ regret. That's all I really want from a restaurant and Tamarine delivers. This contemporary Viet restaurant is my new PA fave. Read the other positive reviews here for better details on the food. The culinary aspects of the many fine dishes have been described in full. I can only add that the service here is terrific. Thanks to Kevin, Robert and the staff that night. I'm intrigued by the unflattering reviews. Most seem to be by people who have very few other reviews and no photos, making me think they signed up just to diss.
2nd visit was last weekend (1st visit was pre-Yelp) and really enjoyed ourselves.  We were a party of 7 celebrating my BIL's bday so I was wondering if we were going to have to order double of everything.  We didn't have to but we did order many different items.  Everything was tasty.  Service was good.  Atmosphere was perfectly festive. Of what we ordered, I remember the pork skewers, roti and the cod as the standouts, IMO.  Oh and even though I didn't order one, I did also enjoy my sips of the Vietnamese coffee. If I'm ever in Palo Alto, I sure wouldn't mind returning to Tamarine.
Tamarine has some great dishes and great wine selection.  We went on a friday night and it was extremely busy but the bartender was kind enough to save a spot for us in the bar.  For our first time there, it was a great experience with the food and pairing of the wine that the bartender selected for us.  We will definitely go back !
Great dining... Its pricey, but worth every penny... everything on the menu is good... Try the flavored rices... its definitely a treat enough said...
Tamarine is one of those rare places where the food honors the promise made by the fantastic decor and service.  It's run by the same folks who run Vung Tau in San Jose, but with a cal-fusion focus which no doubt allows them to jack up the profit on the dishes.  Regardless, while it's no House of Nanking, I've had much worse food for much more money. If you're with timid people who are afraid of trying anything Asian besides General Tso's chicken, Tamarine is a good way to introduce them to Vietnamese cuisine, which has many cultural influences from India, Asia, and Europe.  Once they're hooked, take them to Vung Tau, which has a much broader menu for much less money. Another reason to go here is for the people watching.  If you want to take someone to a place that encapsulates the Silicon Valley experience, take them to Tamarine.  Nestled in downtown Palo Alto, this place is full of VC and Internet millionaires as well as their wannabe pretender counterparts (the real millionaires dress in cheaper clothes).  Even if you don't rock the SV lifestyle, you can still get a taste of it at Tamarine.  Just be sure to keep your iphone turned on and in a clear holster on your belt, otherwise you might be busted.
I hated eggplant. And I hated Vietnamese food. Then my parents dragged me here... TOTALLY love both now! Well Vietnamese food not so much but eggplant yummm.. That's kinda all I remember about the restaurant. And nice relaxing ambience. They did a funny birthday song for me too.. but they gave us the wrong check and insisted it was the right one. Oh well I didn't care, I was enjoying my yummy dessert. I'd come back again if only for the eggplant haha
I get Vietnamese food almost every day from my parents.  So I am rather picky with my Vietnamese food....but one restaurant in San Jose, Vung Tau is my favorite.  Tamarine...is a step above Vung Tau catering to a different ambiance and I guess..to Palo Altoans ..(yeah I just made that word up).  Anyhow....I recommend this restaurant for a dinner out with some friends...we did family style and ate a WHOLE lot of food and were super stuffed once we made it to the nearby bars ;) Salt & Pepper Calamari - tasty, spicy, deep fried goodness! Shrimp Spring Rolls - nothing too special, basically same old good stuff you can get at any decent Vietnamese spot Wok Pho Noodles - rich in flavor, chinese brocolli is my favorite accent to this fried noodle Tamarine Prawns - big prawns! great sauce Beef lovers - order the Shaking Beef and the Grilled beef rolls Also...the most selections of rice I have seen! Brown, Jasmine, Hainan (ginger), Cocunut, Red and Empress (garlic)... Pricier than Vung Tau in San Jose but great decor and good service!
Beautiful setting.  Delicious food presented beautifully.  Our server was attentive and was very pleasant.  What stood out the most was that she seem to really enjoy what she was doing.  Very well versed and took great pride in ensuring we were happy. Our group has the family style meal.  For appetizers, we had the Bahn Mi Rotti, Calamari, and spring roll.  Great choices as the food were delicious.  For Main, we had the Aubergine with Chili sauce, Shaking Beef, Ginger Chicken, Bass, Prawns, and Duck.   We also ordered the Coconut rice, brown rice and Hainan. They were all wonderful and the flavors married nicely.  For dessert, majority had the Vhalrohna Pot au Creme, I had the banana beignets, and another had the apple tart.  Delicious!  All of our plates were cleaned up and everyone was happy! Vietnamese Cuisine to a hip and modern way!  Will definitely recommend!
Setting:  It is deceivingly big inside, lots of room.  Can't tell from the outside.  Nice bar.  Nice clean bathrooms.  If you're lucky enough to get a window seat you've got the best in the house.  There are a few nice paintings here and there. Food:  A bit pricey for small plates, but fairly good tasting.  Family style is pretty much the way to go.  A group of 6 of us ordered 4 appetizers and 6 entres, and that was enough.  With 2 orders of desserts and a couple of drinks, it cost us ~$45/pp. Service:  Our waiter was very cool.  He was very helpful, very funny, very involved (remembered names, who were allergic to what, etc).  He made the birthday girl of the group very welcome.  Plus, they accomodate to the number of people present (for example, if the dish has 4 pieces, he will have 6 made;  or, if there are 3 egg rolls, he will cut them in half to make 6; etc etc).  We took forever in there just chit chatting coz we felt very welcome, felt like home.
I can never really appreciate expensive Vietnamese food. Whether it's Slanted Door, Anise, or Tamarine. Don't get me wrong, Tamarine's food is solid - just not worth the money. Why don't you try Vung Tau (Tamarine's sister restaurant) or Le Cheval for half the price? :) The decor certainly is nice (warm ambiance) and the service is tip top. Our food came out in a very timely manner and my waiter suggested the perfect lemonade + mango for me. Also, it was Father's Day and we had no trouble getting reservations or being seated. Perfect. My parents weren't impressed and neither was I. But, if you're into chic Asian fusion joints, this may float your boat.
Haven't had such a GREAT meal in a long time....but...haven't spent $55 for dinner in a long time either. Real similar to Three seasons but price is about 25% higher. We've oredered the salt & pepper calamari, Tamarine sampler plate, shaking beef and lemongrss seabass.....they are all very delicious and sizzling hot when arrived at your table. Next time I would skip cocktails & desert. Very very little alcohol in my sake-tini and the desert was just so-so. Real romantc ambience for dates.
Just stop....I would seriously not pay rent to eat at Tamarine!! A bit pricey but seriously every dish is amazing!! Great place to try something new and unbelievable! I'm a generally picky eater but this place makes me want to try everything! The staff is also wonderful... professional and knowledgeable in the menu, always ready to help direct your order! P.S.  The calamari, empress rice and shaking beef are INSANE!!
Very strong four stars for Tamarine. Ate there yesterday and the food was interesting, tasty, well presented, and I love the fact that you can eat it "family style," without feeling like a slob :) Modern and pretty laid back atmosphere too, while managing to retain a classy, more upscale feel. Perfect place for a romantic dinner date, or a nice lunch with friends/colleagues. Taro Root Rolls, Tea Leaf Beef, Shrimp Spring Rolls & Papaya Salad for starter were a perfect starter. The Shaking beef was delicious, and the Tamarine Prawns were super succulent.
I love when everything is perfect. This place was terrific, great atmosphere, great service, and fantastic food.  We walked in and at first I thought 'oh here we go with some yuppie place with overpriced bland food'...boy was I wrong.  I will pay up for grub if it's worth it (and surprisingly this wasn't as bad as I thought it would be).  caveat: 1 fish eater, 1 vegetarian. Started with the roti and the corn in banana leaf (they make it with pork regularly, but did it vegetarian...a lot of the entrees have a vege option).  Both were outstanding...the corn was like a sweet mash, with little pockets of hot green chili.  Roti: i love this dish anywhere i go and i dont think you can screw it up. For mains I got the seabass.  My gf got the tofu starter and a pan fried garlic noodle dish.  The sea bass was insane!  I HATE the way American restaurants prep fish...basically a bake/broil with butter.  blah.  This was seared with a curry spice, and blew me away.  Now I hate tofu, and I kept eating my girlfriends tofu dish, and her noodles.  Both were great. So far a 5/5.  Now for desert: chocolate lava cake and a pote de creme.  Lets just say 7/7. I would say Slanted Door would be competition for a place like this, and I was disappointed to say the least with Slanted Door.  For quality of food (priority #1), this place hits the spot. Total bill including a beer and non-alcoholic drink was $90.  Will definitely be back over and over. Update: just went again (you have to run tests in duplicate at the minimum): as fantastic as the first time.  How do you cook your seabass?!?!?!  It is one of the BEST cooked fish dishes I've had (the other being at Delfina).  I love this place.
Short and simple, I agree with all the 3-star reviews.
Excellent food, hit-or-miss service, and some incredible cocktails make this place near perfect. Tamarine is often overflowing with people and more often than not there is a ridiculous wait for a table. This is a great place to fill your belly when you're feeling patient and want quality girly drinks.
Five-star food at five-star prices.  We loved every bite, but our lunch for three came in at $90 including tip.  And that's without drinks.  So I can't give it five stars because that's reserved for the awesome food that's better than the price. I found the restaurant here on Yelp, so I knew I should order the Shaking Beef ($22) and the Tamarine Taste appetizer sampler ($14).  My parents thriftily went for the "lunch special" - choice of one of four appetizers and one of four entrees for $16. Service was attentive but not pushy, well timed.  A birthday was at the table next to us; the waiter brought out what looked like a beigenet stuffed with ice cream. We were too stuffed for dessert but it sure looked like it was worth trying! I was impressed by the range of vegetarian options - the menu has asterisks next to the dishes that can be prepared veggie.  Nice. One last thing - we showed up at 1:30 on a weekday and walked right in, but it sounds like reservations are recommended.
Depending on your point of view, I could either rate this a 4 out of 5, or rate this a 2 out of 5. I'll explain why... 1. If you don't know much about Vietnamese cuisine, and you're looking for a place with good american style service (meaning they have good service and manners) along with the decor and atmosphere, this place is pretty good. Great date place, great decor, great service, food is not bad (not great either but you'll see below why I say that), kinda expensive, but overall a good place to take a date as they have a full bar and somewhat a wine list. 2. Why did I rate this a 2 out of 5? Basically really good Vietnamese food exists in San Jose at a fraction of the cost. As I was eating, I kept thinking to myself that compared to what's locally known in San Jose, this place food is not that great, and maybe 4X the cost. If you're willing to eat and could do without the decor, without the service and manners, and simply want to eat great Vietnamese food at a reasonable cost, I highly recommend eating at someplace like Vung Tau or something in downtown San Jose. You're bill will be like 1/4 the price and I promise you the flavor will be right on...just my $0.02.
Strong four stars for tamarine, if I could I'd give 4.5. I wasn't wowed enough with the service to give it a 5. I absolutely loved one of the speciality drinks, the shaking beef was delectable, and the lemongrass sea bass was amazing. If I were going to go again, I'd likely skip the Ha Long Bay Soup. It was just a little too rich for my personal taste, but I would recommend it to others. The Tamarine Taste (appetizer) was good, but again, I'd try something else before ordering it again. Of anything in the appetizer, I liked the taro root rolls the least. The only downside is the closeness of some of the tables, you can really hear the conversation around you quite well. I'd definitely go back with out of town visitors/business.
Wonderful experience. Seems like Palo Alto is the place to find great eats. I don't think ive been to PA and eaten at a restaurant where i have disliked yet. Had reservations here for me and the bf's 19th anniversary. Started out with the TEA LEAF BEEF, hella good! The tea taste was pretty strong though but it was still very flavorful nonetheless that you probably dont even need to use the fish sauce that comes on the side. My bf ordered the CRAB & GARLIC NOODLES which were really good too. The noodles were like the filipino pancit noodles but the shredded crab meat that was served on top of it was a little on the dry side. I could tell it was frozen, but its all good. I ordered the GINGER SOY CHICKEN which came in a pot and the sauce had a slight hint of spiciness to it, which tasted well with rice. The food here is served family style but don't let your eyes deceive you! When the food comes out, it looks somewhat small in size, but when you start eating, it actually is ALOT of food! We ended up taking our 2 dishes home with us even though we shared it. There are some interesting specialty cocktails on the menu also that you should definitely try. Service was good and ambiance was nice and casually romantic. Only thing i thought could have been improved was the presentation of the dishes. The plates came out kind of plain like the food was just put on a plate and sent out. Oh! And this place has pho on the menu?! Idk, i thought that was funny but it got me curious so i might have to come back and try their kobe pho. mmmm!
"Make me beautiful!", my friend exclaimed at the MAC counter at Macy's in Stanford Mall. Secretly she didn't want to look like the artist in all black though because that lady had 5 pounds of make-up on her. Fortunately, I bought my own make-up bag from home to scrape the layers off of my face so I would not look like a drag queen. After two new sexy black dresses from the clearance rack at the women's department for the MILFs, a couple hundred dollars of unnecessary MAC make-up, curling my hair at Bloomingdale's restroom, and two purple and black dramatic racoon eyes, the four of us were ready for a girls night out at Tamarine. I honestly have never spent so much effort on any other date for any man. We had so much fun tonight eating at this elegant Fusian Restauant in honor of Women's Day. Two of us are single without kids so it would not be fair to have dinner for Mother's day. I coined that Friday night as Women's Day with all of the girls dressed in tiny black cocktail dresses. I love Vietnamese food (yes, I am a little biased) so it is very nice to be able to finally find a place like Tamarine besides Xanh Restaurant to dress up. Tamarine also owns Vung Tau in San Jose so they incorporated some of their signature dish here: sour Tamarine shrimp.  The difference is that you only get 6 shrimps (half) for the same price. Overall, for the location and atmosphere, Tamarine is reasonably price. This is my second time dining here and we came back because Ngoc Ha really enjoyed her birthday celebration here last fall.  I wanted to order the delicious sweet potato fries, Tamarine shrimp, coconut rice, garlic fried rice, and tuna tartar with chips again. We added the delicious fresh papaya salad (since we didn't order the sampler this time),  basil tofu, and deep fried calamari.  They simply poured a brown hoisen sauce on top of the cubes of deep fried tofu ;  it was a very disappointing dish. The crab glass noodle is decent but I would like to try the garlic noodles next time. We should have ordered the shaken beef instead of the calamari because I felt like we were missing protein. My favorite dish was the bamboo shoot since the sesame seeds beautifully enhanced the flavor and texture. There was no time for dessert because we had to rush home.  I looked back at the empty seats near the wooden long counter when we exited the dimly lit building and thought it would have been fun to loiter at the full bar. What does it mean to be married/divorce with kids? It means rushing home instead of lounging with the owner of Xanh in Mountain View (there goes her chance of meeting Prince Charming) after dinner and changing back into your frumpy day time white dress in the car on the way home on 101S so your anxious hubby doesn't have a heart attack. It felt like we were in high school again, staying out late (even though it was only past 10:30pm) and sneaking home after a night of mischief. My other friend had to pick up her three girls from the babysitter.  The guilt was killing both of them. I sat in the back of the van and quietly shook my head in disbelief. Marriage comes with a lot of obligations, compromise, and commitments but this scene was ridiculous and definitely comical.   I think I am starting to appreciate my single status; I can go back to Tamarine whenever I want without asking anyone for permission. Nha, this one is for you, "Cheers to all of the single ladies!"
Pricey but good.  I like the shaking beef and lots of veggie dishes.  More water spinach please.  Same owners of Vung Tau in downtown SJ.  They also have a full bar and carry Duvel Belgian beer, yum! This place is trendy and the bar is a pickup joint but it still is relaxing unlike Strait's Cafe on Santana Row.
Overall a nice place. We ate there 6 months ago, now to recall that experience, the only things I remember are: 1 Waitress was wearing a unique green dress. (very green, very unique). Not sure why though.... 2 Appetizer sampler was very special, in a good way.... I just love those little rolls. 3 Environment was nice..... Well, just nice, but not impressive because I dont remember anything about it 4 Food was probably nice too. But I dont recall anything about the food either. So it's a very nice place if you are on a date (a bit noisy though). But I wont go there regularly. Under same category for me with Strait's Cafe on Santana Row.
Tamarine is our go-to place in Palo Alto. The ambiance reminds us of being in NYC -- cool yet comfortable, with a hip urban edge. The food is consistently good. Our favorite dish is the shaking beef -- amazingly delicious. The appetizer sampler is a great choice, too. If they replaced the chipped dishes and had friendlier hostesses at the podium, I'd give it 5 stars.
awesome food and great ambiance. LOVE LOVE LOVE their lemon grass martini's. If you have not had one you should ! The food is fresh and the staff are very friendly. I would surely go back.
